

			     Icarus' Wing

			   by Brent Baccala



			 for Bruce, who knows
		      we learn from failure more
			  than from success




I'LL KEEP THIS NOVEL ABOUT REAL PEOPLE
I'LL NOT GET LOST IN "IVY TOWERS"
I'LL REMEMBER THOSE WHO DO THE HARD WORK
I'LL THANK THEM FOR BEING SO KIND TO ME
GOD I PRAY INSPIRE THIS WORK
MAN I REMIND OF ITS ERRORS
THIS BOOK IS A HISTORICAL NOVEL
THE BODY OF THE WORK IS FICTION.






T - 691 days

It was a brilliant hack.  It topped the one
in college, when the net-news server was
configured to refuse the student lab.
They'd recompiled the server, altered so
that after printing ACCESS 5 DENIED
the program would accept posts anyway,
went in as "root", dropped the raw binary
straight to the drive, and used it daily for
six months until the system staff updated
the whole install.  But then they were just kids.

Burns parked in the employee lot, behind
the water fountain's dancing white froth display
and meter-high "Chesapeake," the k's
back cast a sailboat's mast, and its whole visage that
of whitecaps breaking on the bay.
Chesapeake Computer Corporation -
world's largest router manufacturer,
A-list stock darling of the dot-com-ers,
high priesthood of the Internet who built
sleek metal semaphores humming away
on backroom metal racks of I S Ps
around the world, that same one-word logo
emblazoned on the case of every one.

He strolled into the lobby like a favorite son
into his father's restaurant, breezed
past the rock garden and the potted palms,
blew off the break room, its Phillie cream cheese
bagels and stocked 'fridge, jogged right at the conference rooms
and entered a two-story cave
partitioned by a hundred cubicles -
his life, ten hours a day the last six months.
These steel and fabric walls held Chesapeake's
true wealth, the coddled technocrats who built
the company's flagship products from caffeine
and white-board markers.  Wisely management
consigned itself across the street.

The key card was real; Burns was totally
legit.  A roaring economic boom
kept restaurants, book stores, golf courses and concert halls
jam packed with twenty-somethings who
had never flown economy in their
lives.  Every other car on College Avenue
was a Mercedes, or a B M W,
or a Land Rover.  Chic
restaurateurs provided their patrons colored Crayons and
blank paper place-mats to
brainstorm slick new proprietary server architectures while
waiting for hundred dollar lunches.  Programmers
were hot, and Burns' qualifications made
him a genuine find.
A white board talk was his job interview;
the background check non-existent.
He quickly got the run of Chesapeake,
concerned far more with the next million-dollar order than
deploying any real security against an inside hack.

Today, the cubicles were largely deserted.  As
he slipped into his, an attractive femme
in 'business casual' race-walked past.
A product specialist skilled in trade show acronyms,
Samantha Pride was always ready to
remind "her" programmers the obvious.
When Burns had quit this job, he would not miss
"Top of the morning, there, Burns," or
"Big talk today, Burns," or
"Got a cable loose, Burns," or

"System goes down today, Burns!"

"Wouldn't miss it for judgement day,"
he muttered back without turning around,
propelled his chair against the terminal stand,
repressed his anxiety and logged in.
The main development computer, scheduled for
a hardware upgrade, would be shutdown in less than an hour.
His e-mails, mostly notes from various employees turning the
day's outage into an excuse for a holiday weekend, offered
no reason to change plans.
He logged out, shouldered his laptop case
and headed for the server room.

Back in the early 70s, those halcyon
days when spam came in cans and porn
sites were on Gay Street, Brian Kernighan,
inventor of the UNIX system, demonstrated that a compiler, which
converts source code into
the bits and bytes that actually run the machine,
could alter covertly the programs it compiled.
What's more, if the compiler is itself compiled
(and who would write a compiler from scratch?),
a virus is born, propagating from one
compiler version to the next,
altering programs at will
and effectively disappearing in the billions of
bits on a hard drive.  Such a virus is particularly
effective on closed, heavily customized systems, like those of
router manufactures wanting their custom software to take
advantage of their custom hardware.  Chesapeake.

Burns keyed the server room door and walked in.
Above an elevated floor that covered a haylon
fire extinguisher system were floor-to-ceiling arrays
loaded with switch hubs, firewalls, RAID arrays,
and a 10,000-BTU air conditioner to dissipate the heat.
A UPS on the roof could power everything for an hour.
A brand new multi-processor system sat, unpowered and silent,
while
several workers chatted leisurely amonst themselves,
awaiting the announced shutdown time.

"Hey, Burns, what's up?"

'Red' Briwom specialized in diving
into stalled projects and getting them finished by pounding out code.
Burns, really more a designer than a programmer, respected Red
for his staying power with the boring tedium the finicky machines
imposed on their masters.

"I've got to get this optical interface installed."

"Well, write your own timesheet, but I'm hitting the bay.  Sure you
don't want to come?"

On the one hand, an afternoon of sailing was a tempting proposition, and
Red had a thirty-six-foot Catalan.  On the other hand were the weeks
spent designing and writing his laptop's "screensaver";
the hours spent drilling 
dozens of varients on a thirty-second procedure; the flowcharted contingency
plans on an encrypted hard drive; his roommate waiting back at the
apartment with a network link and two phone lines.

"No, thanks," Burns said without a hint of deceit in his voice.
"I gotta get this done."

He crossed to the other side of the room, where he was working on a
tricky install of a new high-speed optical interface in one of the
test machines.  Somehow, he just couldn't seem to get the settings
right.  Once set up, he emailed his roommate, "How about lunch?"
_I'm_in_the_server_room._ "Sounds fine," came the reply.
_Everything's_go!_

Forty five minutes later, with the main system shut down and half its
components spread across a table, two of the three technicians were
out of the room, one to the restroom and another to retrieve a
power cable from his desk.  Burns sent another email, "Let's try
Bogart's."  Back in the apartment, Marc Mercuriou skimmed down his
list of local restaurants and the names they translated into in their
code language, then picked up the phone.  A minute later, the third
tech was called out to answer a phone call from someone who had
already hung up by the time he got there.  Burns had contemplated
taking a shot of J.D. that morning to steal himself for this moment,
but designed that he had to be absolutely sober in case _anything_
went wrong.

Nothing went wrong.  He practicly sprinted across the room as soon as
the door closed.  The situation was almost ideal;
one of the scenarios he had drilled for.  The new machine was still
unpowered; the hard drive installed but uncabled.  Burns
connected a data cable from his laptop to the drive, then plugged in a
custom-built cable that could briefly power a server's drive
from the laptop's battery.  He hit a three-key sequence on the laptop,
and ventured a glance at the door.  Nobody.  The laptop beeped.  He
killed the power, disconnected both cables, and dashed back across the
room with his laptop.  The hack had taken less than 15 seconds.
What would become one of the world's most infamous hacks
had taken less than 15 seconds.
"Let's shoot for
happy hour instead," he emailed Mercuriou, who read the message with a
wry smile that soon broke into a broad grin.
It would become one of the world's most infamous hacks.
It would be one of the world's most infamous hacks.
It had taken less than 15 seconds.

Burns preserved appearances by consuming another half hour to
'finally' finish the optical interface, then left.  Buoyed
by an air of invincibility, he floated back out to the
parking lot, tossed the laptop in the back seat, fired up a
sneak-a-toke cleaverly designed to look like a cigarette, cranked the
tunes and floored the rag-top all the way home.


T - 370 days

"The routers run the network; hell the routers _are_ the network.  You
control the routers, you control the network.  I'm telling you,"
Mercuriou concluded, "this thing is like super-hack."

A silence fell over the house trailer, punctuated by a single word
from the only other person present, waiting in the kitchen for a
teakettle to boil while slowly shaking his head in admiration.

"Burns."

From his perch on the couch, Mercuriou nodded in assent.  In his late
thirties and a shade under six feet tall, his cheekbones betrayed the
mixed features of his hybrid Romanian/Irish ancestry.  A white
T-shirt, khaki shorts, and tennis shoes comprised the
undistinguished attire of Burns' roommate.
What differentiated him more were the
subtleties - a refusal to allow a television into the apartment; an
hour each day, timed on a stopwatch, devoted to reading Latin; a
framed letter of rejection from the University of Chicago.  Like his
paternal ancestors, who had decended from the Scythian plains to
ravage the heart of the Roman Empire, he was fiercely loyal to his
friends, determined to conquer the unconquerable, undetered by any
temporary setbacks in his plans, and absolutely convinced that he
would ultimately win.

"We had to wait four more months to make sure it got into their
production system.  Burns got sick of the job and quit after two, but
it didn't matter.  They've been shipping it for about six months now."

Victor Antonov, watching the teakettle in the kitchen, was
nearly ten years older, heavy set with a bristling
mustache that often covered a mischevious smile.  They had met in
college, when Mercuriou was an eighteen-year-old freshman in love with
classical literature and Vic was finishing medical school.  Marc had
briefly dated the future doctor's cousin. The courtship had foundered;
the friendship had lasted for almost twenty years.

"So what's the point?  Why?" he asked as the teakettle began to
whistle.

Mercuriou puckered his lips, then answered with a single word.

"Mars."

"Oh, man, not Mars," Antonov exclaimed almost involuntarily as he
rolled his eyes, sighed deeply, then slowly poured the water into a
pair of ceramic mugs.  _Not_Mars, he thought, _not_again_..
Walking into the living room, he had to return to the kitchen for
teabags, as the mugs contained nothing but hot water.  Meanwhile,
Mercuriou, continued his prepared explaination.

"Burns' got a plan, and I think it'll work.
Spaceflight is perfectly doable, that's been
demonstrated over and over for almost fifty years, 
The problem is money, hell, the problem is
always money.  You can't fly without money,
you can't ride without money, no money
means no electricity, no house, no food,
hell, they sell bottled water now for
a dollar a pop and half the planet can't
drink the crap that comes out of the tap,
next thing'll be bottled air,
you won't be able to breath without money!"

He paused.  The explanation degenerating into a familiar tirade.

"Well, now we've got money," he concluded cynically, producing a wad
of fifty-dollar bills and fanning them on the table like a deck of
poker cards, then picked one up and examined it with the air of a
conosuir.  Vic stood in the doorway to the kitchen, staring directly
at him, the tea forgotton.  Mercuriou leaned back on the couch and
returned the gaze.

"Let's just say that there are some Keno systems out there that are no
longer completely random," he replied to the unasked question.

"Marc, this isn't like you, you're not a thief."

"Well, maybe I've changed," the younger man answered, the words dry
and emotionless.

He paused, and now switched his tone of voice to that of a teenager
stammering to explain a 2 A.M. party to his parents.

"I'm going to Mars, Vic!  I need the money!"

At this Vic sighed, handed one of the mugs to his old friend and sat
down across from him.  The trailer exhibited the domestic disarray of
a single man.  A small siting room to the right of the door was
partitioned from the kitchen by a small counter.  Beyond the sink and
its clutter of dirty dishes, a sliding door lead to a small bathroom
and then to the only bedroom on the far end of trailer, where a gray
cat had disappeared as soon as a stranger had entered the abode.

"Mars, huh," the doctor muttered.  Mercuriou wasn't joking, that much
he knew.  He thought back over the years he had known Marc
Mercuriou.  If he had learned one thing about the man, it was that he
wouldn't undertake a project if he didn't think he could finish it.
He'd sit and do nothing before undertaking something half-baked.  On
the other hand...

"Why are you doing this, Marc?  Is it about Mars... really?"

Mercuriou didn't answer.  He hadn't expected the question and didn't
have an answer.  The doctor broke another awkward silence as
his curiosity got the best of him.

"Can it really work?" he wondered aloud.

Mercuriou shrugged.  This question he was prepared for.

"Well, we should be able to milk this hack for millions, maybe even a
billion or two.  But the money won't make a difference if we can't
overcome the technical problems."

"And can Burns overcome them?"

"He says it's a crap shoot... one that I'm willing to take.  Hell, what
else am I going to do, take my stolen millions and retire on a beach
somewhere?"

Finally, he elicited a smile from Antonov.

"Why not?" the doctor asked mischievously, his grin bristling under
the moustache for the first time.

"Because I'm not even forty yet!  Speaking of which, old man, what
have you been doing up here in these hills, anyway, early retirement?"

Vic chuckled.

"Let's go take a look."

They walked out into the high summer of the New Mexico mountains, hot
and dry, a day that made the Latin scholar wish for a convertible, a
surf board, and the P.C.H, before Southern California had been paved
over by twelve-lane highways and built up by pre-fabs that looked like
they'd been dropped down from the sky in a game of Tetris.  He paused
and inhaled deeply, saving the aroma of desert flora.
_Warm_smell_of_colitas,_rising_up_through_the_air...

Mercuriou's Toyota and Vic's Jeep were the only vehicles in sight,
parked next to the trailer at the end of a long driveway that wound
along between a high cliff rising to the left and a dry riverbed on
the right.

Vic lead him around the back of the trailer, down a dirt path through
the scrub to the door of a second trailer some distance away.  It
looked much like the first one, except that all of the window curtains
were drawn.  Closer inspection revealed that white drywall backed the
curtains, making it impossible to see in or out.  Vic used a key to
take a padlock off the door and led the way in.

An overwealming smell hit Mercuriou - skunk.  Inside, the trailer had
been stripped of its original furniture and fixtures.  The main room,
some thirty feet long, was lined on both sides with plastic tubs
raised about a foot off the floor.  Inside the tubs were perhaps a
hundred potted canibis (marijuana) plants, each sporting a bushy top of their
distinctively branching five-part leaves.  Two rows of grow lights
hung down from the ceiling on chain links that could be adjusted in
length as the plants grew upward.  They ran off a timer, which also
periodically turned on a pump that flooded the tubs with liquid
fertilizer from a child's toy plastic pool in the corner.  An air
conditioner hummed in the window, and a dehumidifier discharged into
the pool the water it condensed from the air.

Vic selected one of the mature buds, broke it off by its stem and
passed it to Mercuriou.  It was top-quality marijuana, never packaged
or pressed, covered with tiny white crystals of the psychoreactive
drug tetrahydrocannabinol.  The guest nodded his head in appreciation,
not really sure what to say, then finally mumbled some kind of
complement on his friend's carefully maintained operation.  Vic
selected another, similar bud, popped it in his mouth, and motioned
for his guest to do the same.

"I told you," the doctor wryly noted, "You should quit smoking...
It's bad for your health!"

Mercuriou grinned.

"So you eat it, like brownies?"

"Sure.  But why fool around with brownies?  It's better fresh, just
the way the Great Spirit made it.  I've got some AIDS and cancer
patients I take care of for free, and then there's the guys who pay
that keep this place running."

Another hour of small talk found them back out in front of the cars,
now well intoxicated.  Mercuriou was ready to leave, but still waiting
to see if his old friend would join his venture.

"I'll play their money game," Mercuriou was saying.  "I'll get
out there and 'hustle', I'll 'compete', I'll rip and claw my way to
the top, and when I get there, I'll turn around and ram their
capitalist system right back down their throats." [CA]

Vic bowed his head and struggled with conflicting emotions.  He had
always loved the way he felt years younger in the company of
Mercuriou's brash bravado, but felt now like a father seeing his son
drunk for the first time.

"How often do you pray, Marc?"

Mercuriou guffawed.

"Right now, my only prayer is that Burns can figure how to get this
thing into orbit... literally!"

"I'll need some time to think about this," Vic concluded after several
minutes of silence.

Mercuriou nodded his assent and left.  He couldn't help but feel
disappointment as he drove off down the dirt road.  What had he
expected, really?  Maybe for the first time since he and Burns had
dreamed up the hack, he really thought seriously about how crazy the
whole scheme was, and realistically how slim were the chances of
success.  _We're_just_a_bunch_of_lunatics_in_an_apartment_who_keep
reinforcing_each_other's_insanity. Yet he has no intention of spending
the rest of his life the way he spent his last ten years, fumbling
around from one dumb thing to another while a court settlement ate all
his money and his best ideas sat as notes on a hard drive.

"Fuck it," he said aloud as the car reached the paved road and he hit the
gas.  If Victor Antonov didn't want in, he'd find another doctor...
and another horticulturalist.

Almost at the same time, Vic was still standing in the New Mexico sun,
watching the driveway Mercuriou's car had long since disappeared down.
The dust had settled, and nothing disturbed the scene now except the
buzzing of insects. [what kinds of insects?]

"This," he said in a low voice to nobody in particular, "will require
a vision quest."


T - 355 days

The entire eastern sky was lit a brilliant red hue, as if a frosted
pane of red glass had been slipped in behind the mountains.  Eyes
closed, wrapped in a light Indian blanket, Vic calmly awaited the dawn.  A
bright yellow light pierced out from a gap in the mountains and began
to widen into the orb of the sun.  Though conscious of the light, Vic
put off opening his eyes.

One of his favorite spots for prayer and meditation, the desert canyon
looked from the air like a single massive stroke of white slashed
through brown hills by a giant's hand.  Pristine granite boulders were
strewn out fifty feet on either side of a spring-fed river.  Cactus
and scrub covered the surrounding land.  Amid patches of sandy beach,
swirling pools and murmuring cascades were two-foot diameter logs
wedged between boulders twenty feet above the water line, mute
witnesses to the torrential storms that, once or twice a decade,
filled the arroyo with the raging waters that had carved out this
canyon over the centuries.  The water was drinkable, and a gentle
breeze often discouraged insects.  There were flat rocks to lie out on
in the sun, and shady crevices to evade the heat during the peak of
the day, not to mention the ample bathing spots in the cool river.

Vic had put this off for weeks, inventing one excuse after another why
he couldn't do it just yet.  He had to let his clients know he'd be
gone for several days.  He had to find someone to take care of the
cat.  There was something on TV he wanted to see.  The moon wasn't the
right phase.  He wanted to finish the novel he was reading.  It was
already too late today.  It was still pretty early, he could putter
around for another hour or two before leaving.

The truth was, though Vic had decided to undertake a vision quest, and
knew intellectually that this was the course he wanted to follow,
neither was he looking forward to spending several days in silence and
solitude.  He had done this before, and knew what he was getting into.

Vic opened his eyes, turned around and looked east.  The sun
was the distance of a man's fist over the horizon.  The doctor
rearranged his blanket so he could contemplate its orb, then
closed his eyes again.

_So_Marc_Mercuriou_wants_to_fly_to_Mars_.  Vic turned the thought over
in his mind for the hundred-and-first time.  He drifted back over the
years, the college parties, the philosophical debates, the night Burns
drove home on three hits of acid, the computer program, the lawsuit,
the expulsion.  His head snapped back up.  Had he been sleeping?
He wasn't sure.  The sun hadn't moved, or had it?  Perhaps it
was infinitesimally higher in the sky.

_Marc_Mercuriou's_flying_to_Mars_.  Vic practically laughed out loud.
What really were the chances?  Yet Burns was involved, so who could
say?  Mercuriou was involved, too.  A pair to draw to, those two were.
And they say they've got some kind of super-hack, no, that he could
believe.  With Burns involved, they probably really did control half
the Internet.

The sun creep higher and the desert began to heat.  Vic unfurled
himself from his blanket and spread it out as a ground cloth.  He
thought of all the stuff he could be _accomplishing_ right now.  He
needed to transplant those seedlings, and take more cuttings.  The
fence along the riverbed still needed to be repaired after the storm.
He could be making lasanga for lunch, ahh, lasanga, he could go back
now and least have it for dinner.  Drive into town for the noodles,
tomatoes from the garden, cheese, he needed cheese.

Vic physically shook himself.  _What_are_your_priorities?_ Is it the
perfect baked lasanga or _discerning_the_will_of_God_, or the Great
Spirit, as Vic prefered to call him?
_Some_people_go_through_life_for_the_lasanga_.

Had the sun moved?  He wasn't sure.  _We_waste_so_much_time_.  Of
course, after a while, you realize that you wouldn't actually be
accomplishing any of those things, but rather filling the hours with
all the _distractions_ - television, food, drugs, games, books,
talking, walking, driving, cleaning.  Out here, alone, you realize
_This_is_how_long_a_day_really_is_.

Vic stood up and stretched.  The strict Indian vision quest required
not only fasting and sleep deprivation, but was also done naked and
confined to an area no bigger than a jacuzzi.  Of course, the strict
Benedictine monk arose at three in the morning to pray, and the strict
Buddhist drank no water after sunset.  Vic fasted and meditated
through the night, but was clothed and allowed himself a somewhat
wider leash.  He skipped down to the water, hopping from boulder to
boulder, then striped naked and bathed.  The stream was still cool,
and the morning breeze imparted a definite chill, but in this place,
the rushing arroyo was a luxury Vic indulged.  Emerging from the
stream after a time, he laid naked on one of the boulders, waiting for
his skin to dry.

_If_you_go_, _you_might_never_come_back_, his own voice practically
spoke in his head.  _Well_, _no_, he thought,
_one_day_I_won't_come_back_.  One day he might be driving down the
highway, or walking to the store, and in the next moment meet the
Great Spirit.  Or perhaps he would go like some of his patients,
linguring, faltering, fighting death every step of the way.
Just not like his father, please God, not witless and lost
in his own home, surrounded by the family he thought were strangers.
_We're_all_going_to_die_, he thought.
_It's_how_we_live_that_defines_who_we_are_.

The sun was now halfway to its zenith.  Slowly, Vic dressed, then
returned to his blanket.  Perhaps later he would indulge himself in
another bath.  Hunger was present, but by now, his third day here, it
manifested itself more as fantasy than as a physical need.  Piña
colada.  That's what he wanted - a piña colada, made fresh from
coconuts and pineapples, pureed in a blender with only a dash of rum.

_Mars!__He_can't_be_serious_.  Yet he was.  Vic had known Mercuriou
too well to suppose he was joking, too long to imagine he was insane,
and too...

Or maybe not.  His encounter with Mercuriou had been shocking.  How
much he had changed!  [ But such was life. ]  They were like children
who had grown up in a nursery, with cartoon wallpaper and colorful
mobiles, and only occasional flickers of a distant fire glimpsed
through the window.  _Men_with_guns_on_a_cruise_ship_.
_A_protest_march_.  _Soldiers_patrolling_a_street_.
_Protest_marchers_burning_a_flag_.

They had emerged from the nursery to find the house engulfed in
flames, and there was no way out.  Many gave themselves to the fire;
many assumed that houses were meant to burn, that's why they were made
of wood.  Some had cowered in the basement, or taken refuge in the
game room.  Some tried to fight the fire.  Some jumped.

_Where'd_you_hide,_Vic?___The_smoking_parlor?_

Without moving, Vic looked to where an iguana had just scampered
across one of the boulders and darted into a crevace.  Life!  The
great mystery!  All around him, the plants, the animals, the algae on
the rocks along the riverbed, all alive!  All part of some greater
consciousness!  What would an iguana know about Mars?  Yet both were
here, the iguana and the red planet, somewhere in the sky.
_We_know_as_much_about_life_as_the_iguana_knows_about_Mars_.

Was it noon yet?  He wasn't sure.  He certainly hadn't brought
a watch.  No, the morning sun still falted the zenith.

_What_else_am_I_going_to_do?__Take_my_stolen_millions_and_retire_on
_a_beach?_

_What_else_are_you_going_to_do?__Live_in_a_trailer_and_grow_pot_
_in_the_mountains?_ Vic
sighed.  His own life certainly hadn't turned out the way he had
expected it.

_I_wanted_to_be_a_doctor!_ The thought burst upon him with a flash of
anger that was gone as fast as it had come.
_Did_the_snake_want_to_be_a_belt?_ he wondered.
_Did_the_fish_want_to_live_in_the_water?_
_Did_the_cow_want_to_be_a_steak?_

Vic's train of thought shifted to the one time in his life he
had been in a slaugherhouse.  The hundreds of cattle passing
through a shoot to be stunned and butchered.  An assembly-line
of death.  _We_don't_always_get_to_be_what_we_want._

What did he want?  Did it come down to that?  Maybe it wasn't about
the Great Spirit after all, maybe it was about Victor Antonov...

He awoke with a start.  The sun was visibly into the western sky.  How
long had he slept?  At first he felt rage at himself for sleeping,
then disappointment, then resignation.
_I'm_sorry,_father.__I'm_not_a_kid_anymore._
He lay back down on the blanket and slept.

The sun was setting when he awoke.  He sat and watched it slip down
behind the mountains, until shade came to the arroyo, then watched the
light retreat up the slopes until only the summits were in direct sun.
Vic felt depressed.  _If_I_were_up_there_,
_I_could_still_see_the_sun._ Finally the sunlight was gone, leaving
only a blue sky that deepened into purple, then black.  Crickets and
frogs trumpeted the night.  A rattlesnake slithered silently across
the still warm sand.  Here, away from the city lights, stars began to
emerge.

_The_stars!_ Could there be life out there, too?  How could there not
be, in such vast reaches?  Was the Great Spirit only for this world?
Was there a different Great Spirit for every world, every sun?  And
the Greatest Spirit that transcended all?
_Who_knows?__This_is_dogma._

Dogma.  The bastard son of religion raped by logic.  The
psuedo-science of devising laws that govern a game we do not
understand.  For all the paucity of science, at least the physicists
demanded that all their math eventually predict something real.

_Space._ Vic gazed up at the sky.  Blackness filled with light.
Thousands of ragging thermonuclear fires, tiny lights in their various
shapes and patterns, many subtly hued and interspersed with dim
nebulas.  Orion loomed overhead.  Nor was the sky still.  Not only did
the stars shift through the night, but the lights of airplanes high
above passed slowly across the constellations and the occasional
unannounced meteor would flash past in a fraction of a second.  A
satellite transited overhead, clearly visible, still illuminated by
the sun.

_So_what_now?_ Vic didn't expect a booming voice from the heavens, or
a dramatic vision, though such things had been known to happen.
Usually, these quests ended in a quiet determination, a clarification
of priorities, a sense of a direction forward.

_It's_how_we_live_that_defines_us_.  How was he going to live?
Growing pot in the mountains?  Twenty years in the big house with
Mercuriou?  Blown to bits in some goofy launch attempt?

_What_if_it_works?_ It was almost impossible.  How could something
this _crazy_ actually _work_?  _Crazy._ Yes, _crazy_.  Maybe he was
ready for something crazy!  He grinned, closed his eyes and tried to
empty his mind, tried to open himself to the Great Spirit.

_I'm_sick_of_being_sane!_ Vic practically lept to his feet at the
thought.  Why be sane?  Why not do something _crazy_?  What's the
worst that could happen - death?  No, jail would be a fate worse than
death.  Death he could handle.

Vic chuckled, this time aloud.  _Look_at_yourself_.  A trailer full
of marijuana plants and you're worried about _jail_?  Well, yes,
acutally, he was.  _Ahh,_to_hell_with_it._

If he went with Mercuriou, it might be a long, long time before he
returned to this place.  _Or_ever_.  He looked around - the rushing
water in the arroyo could be heard but not seen.  Dim outlines of
rocks and scrub bush surrounded him.  This land was beautiful.  Did he
really want to part with it?  Locked in an airconditioned tube for who
knows how long? _Some_people_go_through_life_for_the_lasanga._

Orion had crept into the western sky.  To the south, a jet airplane
crossed to the east.  Vic cast his mind to it.  Most of the passengers
were asleep, or trying to sleep, trying to catch what sleep they could
in the jet-lag abbreviated night.  In the dimly lit cockpit, the
pilots would be guiding the plane along a jetway, marked only by radio
beacons and coordinates on a chart, looking to a colored radar display
to see what was in front of them, and occasionally peering down into
the darkness below, maybe wondering if anyone was looking back up at
them...

Morning came.  Vic had fallen asleep again, and awoke before dawn.
Was there light?  Yes, the eastern sky was just beginning to brighten
and he could just make out the arroyo.  A day had past, another had
come, and Vic had made his decision.  He would not fear death; he
would not fear jail.  Nor would he keep living in a house trailer,
puttering back and forth to his hydroponic garden.  He stood up and
stretched, then slowly rolled his blanket and started down the trail.
Though he was looking forward to the company of people again, he also
knew that he would miss this place.

He looked back at the arroyo, regretting that he hadn't returned to
bathe.


T - 350 days

In 1998, John Pople became the first man in history to win a Nobel
Prize for writing a computer program.  It was called _Gaussian_, and
it numerically simulated Schroedinger's equation, the defining
physical equation for explaining the complex interactions between the
electrons and nuclei that formed atoms and molecules.  _Gaussian_, and
programs like it, made it possible to analyze atomic structures in
much the same way as numerical simulations of Newton's gravitational
equations made possible the analysis of planetary movement in solar
systems.  For hundreds of years, scientists had sought the holy grail
of a purely mathematical theory to explain the entire physical
universe.  Like two teams of hunters closing on an elusive prey from
opposite directions, physicists and chemists had pursued this common
quest, the physicists drilling down deeper and deeper into the
mysteries of the atom, the chemists measuring and categorizing dozens,
even hundreds of properties of the myriad array of chemical
substances.  In the early decades of the twentieth century, physicists
like Planck, Schroedinger, and Dirac developed the quantum theory that
could finally explain the layered construction of atoms and molecules,
but it remained for the development of the digital computer to
actually solve those equations for any but the simplest of atoms.  For
the first time, physics was beginning to correctly predict the
physical properties of matter that until then had only been understood
empirically by chemists.

"Bloody hell!" exclaimed the young South African as he smacked the
side of the computer monitor with his hand.  Burns walked over behind
him.  He was wearing a tee-shirt a student group had made in
college.  Emblazened across the top was the Generalized Stokes
Theorem in its most abstract form.   "It's not magic," read
the caption, "it's MATH 462."

"I'd kill this program, but it already died!"

"Remember, this stuff's primitive," Burns calmly noted.

"Yeah, yeah," Alister Compton muttered, pushing his chair
violently back from the table.

"No, really.  Ever seen that video of the Tacoma Narrows bridge
collapse?"

"No, I don't think so," the young man replied, the disgust still evident in
his voice.

"Well, maybe it wasn't a big hit in South Africa, but if I saw it once
in high school, I saw it half a dozen times. [CA] The designers didn't
calculate the wind load right on this suspension bridge, and it
finally ripped itself to pieces in a light gale.  Now we've been
building bridges since Roman times, and still occasionally screw one
up and drop it in the river.  We've been building computers for less
than fifty years.  That's why the technology moves so quickly, because
it's so primitive.  All of it - _Gaussian_, _Windows_, _Mathematica_,
the web - fifty more years from now, people will look back on it like
we look at the Collesium today - how the hell is it still standing?!
How did they build it with just ropes and levers?!  How did they do
quantum mechanics with floating point numbers that don't even form a
mathematical group under addition?"

"It's just so _stupid_!  One bloody semicolon at the end and the whole
night's run wasted!  Why can't it just stop and wait instead of
deleting everything?!"

"Because we're trying to build the Empire State Building with pickaxes
and shovels!  We can stop and try to invent a steam engine, and while
we're at it invent voice recognition, personal robotics, on-demand
video and the car that drives itself.  Or we just plow ahead on the
one thing we really want to get done.  It's triage.  You've got ten
times more casualties than surgical staff.  You've got to pick your
battles real carefully, or you'll never get anything done; you'll
spend all your time rushing from one problem to another."

"You're talking about how primitive we are?" a new voice interrupted.

"Vic!" Burns exclaimed, turning away from the computer as Mercuriou
walked up with the doctor.

"Hello, Burns!" the physician greeted his old college housemate with
an arm clasped around the shoulder and a handshake.  "Marc told me all
about this, and I wanted to come see it for myself."

"This is it!", he exclaimed, waving his hand all around him.  "The
'Crap Shoot', that's what I call it!"

His wave encompassed a twentieth-centry physics gamble for a chemistry
breakthrough of the first magnitude.  He sat again one wall in a
garage with an attached house, which he shared as an office with a
team of a half-dozen young programers.  They were armed with a
parallel-processing system of more than a thousand computer
processors, which required so much air-conditioning that it was housed
in a seperate location; this was only their programming site.

They were looking for a new type of liquid rocket fuel.  Many liquid
fuels, such as liquid hydrogen, were cryogenic and required elaborate
cooling systems to keep them refrigerated well below freezing.  NASA,
for example, kept the space shuttle's rocket fuel stored in a
specially built underground tank, and only pumped it into the
shuttle's external tank the night before launch.  Worse, even most
efficient liquid fuels had rather poor specific impulses, that crucial
ratio between the force generated by the propellant and the force
exerted on it by gravity, and also rather poor specific volumes,
resulting in the need for very large tanks to contain the propellants.
Solid fuel propellants performed better, which is why the space
shuttle used a pair of booster rockets to help propel it into space,
but with the severe drawback that they couldn't be simply throttled
back or turned off like liquid fuel propellants.  Burns wanted to
develop a liquid fuel that would remain liquid at room temperature,
eliminating the need for elaborate cooling systems, and that would
have a specific impulse and specific volume rivaling the best of the
solid propellants.

"We've also got a test site in an industrial park," Mercuriou
explained, which was true.  After the computers predicted melting
point, boiling point, ionization energy, chemical potential,
thermodynamic constants, and a dozen other predictions that may or may
not be accurate, the next step was to actually create it.  Again, the
computers were asked to compute more and more predictions for the
possible byproducts and derivatives of the compound in question, then
reacted in simulation by more programs to find out if such-and-such a
combination producing such-and-such a result would actually proceed
forward in reasonable time at some specified temperature.  Since none
of the software was more than a few years old, really, and since it
crashed constantly, and produced bizarre predictions like its
continued, stubborn belief, much to Burns' great alarm and dismay,
that kerosene would react with hydrogen peroxide at a specific impulse
of 298 without the presence of a catalyst.  So the only way to find
out if any of the predictions were even remotely possible, they had to
test them, and Burns set up both a well-stocked chemistry lab and
eventually a small rocket engine on a firing range.

The three men retired to the main part of the house, or more precisely
to its kitchen.

"You pay for all this with your lottery winnings?"

Mercuriou shook his head as he answered.

"No, we have a new investor!  Ever heard of Keystone Securities?"

Antonov thought for a moment as he produced three large casserole
dishes he had brought in from the car and turned on the oven.

"Isn't that the brokerage firm that went bankrupt a few months ago?"

"You know, I think you're right!"  Mercuriou wagged his finger and
exclaimed with a grin.  Antonov did not smile.

"So, Doctor Vic, what have we got here?" Burns wondered, taking the
lid off one of the casseroles.

"Lasagna!"


T - 313 days

A round of applause greeted Burns as he stepped to the podium.
Mercuriou had just finished a glowing introduction for his college
friend, and an audience of mainly reporters politely applauded the
chief technical officer of the latest high-tech startup with a big
invention.  NASA, the American space agency, had just awarded them a
major contract.

"Could you describe, in layman's terms," one reporter asked, "exactly
what N-1033 is and what makes it different from conventional rocket
fuels?"

"Sure," Burns answered, warming to the technical subject, and
launching into a well-rehearsed answer.  "First, let me answer the
first part of your question.  N-1033 is a very, _very_, large molecule
with a molecular weight just over 20,000.  To put that in context,
water has a molecular weight of 18, and table sugar has a molecular
weight of 342.  This doesn't mean that a beaker full of N-1033 is
exceptionally heavy, it just means that the molecules themselves are
very large, and thus very heavy, and it doesn't take as many of them
to fill that beaker."

Burns paused to select a computer graphic from the tablet in front of
him and display it on the projector screen behind him.  It showed a
three-dimensional model of his invention, a molecule of the rocket
fuel known as N-1033.

"Geometrically, N-1033 is a large, spherical cage of carbon modules
than form a shell around a core dominated by nitrogen and oxygen.
These nitrogren-oxygen bonds release a great deal of energy
when they break, which is, in fact, exactly what makes nitroglycerine
such a powerful explosive.  We use nitroglycerine in the manufacturing
process.  It's the carbon shell on the outside that protects the core
and keeps ten-thirty-three from simply exploding.  However, when you
raise the temperature several hundred degrees above room temperature,
the carbon shell _does_ break apart, and releases the fuel mixture
inside.  Furthermore, due to the spherical shape of the molecule, it
remains liquid at far lower temperatures than you would expect for a
molecule of this size.  In fact, it's liquid at room temperature, and
these are the properties that make it such a good fuel - it doesn't
require an oxidizer because it's already got oxygen in it; it has a
high specific impulse, which is the most important measure of the
efficiency of a rocket fuel; and it's liquid at room temperature and
thus doesn't require elaborate refrigeration techniques."

"Now, for the second part of your question, I've really already
answered part of it - what makes N-1033 different from conventional
rocket fuels is that the molecule is so large and complex, while
something like the space shuttle runs on liquid hydrogen and liquid
oxygen, which are two of the smallest and simplest molecules that exist.
But more than that, what makes ten-thirty-three, as we've gotten used
to calling it, so different is how it was designed, and I did use the
word _designed_.  We started off with a list of requirements for this
fuel, some basic design ideas that included a carbon shell with fuel
inside, but then used computer programs to simulate the equations of
quantum mechanics and thus try literally thousands of different
combinations to find one that would work.  We actually found many
possibilities that looked like they would work, that's why this one is
numbered ten-thirty-three, but all of the earlier molecules were
rejected for one reason or another."

#if NOT

"What kinds of reasons led to the rejections of those molecules?"

"Well, the single biggest reason was synthesis.  It isn't enough to
just have a computer telling you a molecule is stable, even if that's
true, and sometimes it isn't, but then you actually have to be able to
construct the molecule.  You do that the say way you construct any
chemical substance, which is by a series of chemical reactions that
produce a series of intermediaries and finally gives you the thing
you're after.  Such a series of reactions is called a
_synthesis_pathway_.  We used the computer programs again to predict
various possible synthesis pathways, and a lot of them turned out to
be implausible.  The single biggest thing that sets N-1033 apart from
N-1, or N-2, or N-1032, is that we were able to develop a twenty-three
step synthesis pathway starting with graphite and nitroglycerine that
ultimately produces N-1033."

#endif

Mercuriou, seated now in the front row between a NASA program director
and Burns' empty chair, had tuned out the press conference and was
deep in his own thoughts.  _Now_the_real_work_begins_.

"Captain?" Burns interrupted.  "I mean, Marc, you want to answer that
question?"

A chuckle went threw the audience.  Some thought it amusing that
the CEO was called "Captain".

Marc walked to the podium and pulled Burns aside to 'consult' with him.

"What was the question?"

Burns grinned.

"They want to know again about our patent intentions."

Mercuriou nodded as he turned back around to address the audience.

"Not only are we not patenting N-1033, but we're publishing pretty
much everything we know about it, including the complete synthesis
pathway we use.  Of course, right now we're the only company that has
a production process, so it was fairly easy for us to win the NASA
contract, but I hope in the near future you'll see N-1033 being widely
manufactured and used."

"I frankly don't understand," one reporter asked.  "If you get a
process patent you'd be able to dominate the market for this fuel for
years to come.  Doesn't your company need the money?"

Mercuriou grinned.

"We have ample funding from private sources.  I guess you could just
call it my humanitarian streak."

After the press conference was over, one of the NASA managers
from the front row walked to the back of the room and found
a woman wearing blue jeans, tennis shoes, and a faded blue
T-shirt.

"So what'd you think?" he asked.

Andrea Yeats thought for a minute before answering.

"The engineer seems to really know his stuff, but the CEO strikes me a
con artist."

"Well, he's a capitalist, no doubt about it, but this stuff is no con,
we've tested it!  I'm telling 'ya, Andrea, you should get back in the
program.  This new fuel's gonna revolutionize spaceflight!"

"That's OK, Kyle, my problems are here on Earth."


T - 312 days

Andrea had spent the night in Kyle's guest room, and when the NASA
manager left for work in the morning, Andrea rode with him.

"You give me such a fright, a single woman, hitchhiking!"

"You put your faith in God, Vic.  And you tie your hair
up under a cap and and lose the miniskirt!"

Vic's relationship with Andrea Yeats was purely platonic, but the
thought of the ex-astronaut in a miniskirt brought a grin to his face.
He pulled up to a bus stop and got out with Andrea to open
the trunk and retrieve her bag.

"OK, the city bus goes into Houston from here.  Sweatheart, find the
Greyhound station in the city."  He pulled five twenty-dollar bills
and handed them to her.  "Just humor me this once and take the bus
home!"

"Thanks, Vic," Andrea said, giving him a hug.  "You're my best friend.
I love you."

Vic nodded and got back in the car before answering.

"I love you too," he replied quietly.

"Call me when you get home!" he called out the window as he drove
away.

Andrea took the next bus to a downtown transfer station, then headed
into one of the older and more run-down sections of Houston and found
a hundred-year-old Catholic church, Saint Andrew's, that occupied
almost an entire city block.  Built of stone and with metal bars on
its windows, it could have been a prison except for the cross mounted
on its steeple.  Walking around back, she found a rear entrance,
bearing a colorful sign, "The Franciscan Fryer".

Entering the building, she found herself in a white tiled dining room
populated by collapable tables and chairs with a half-dozen men
preparing the room for lunch.  An erasable whiteboard near the door
proclaimed "Today's Specials" in pre-printed type and below,
handwritten with a faded black marker, "The Usual".

"We don't start serving until eleven o'clock," a black man unfolding
chairs told her.

"Well, I'm just looking for Brother Dunstan," she replied.

"Oh, he's probably in the kitchen, then," he responded, and
motioned to the rear of the room, seperated from the kitchen
only by a long serving counter.

Behind the counter, she saw a port-bellied man in his late forties,
with balding hair and a worn apron covering the brown habit of a
Franciscan Friar, muttering to himself as he stirred a steaming kettle
on the commercial stove that dominated the rear of the kitchen.

"I'll come back at eleven," she said after a moment's hesitation,
but it was too late.

"Andrea!" exclaimed the chef, now looking out towards the door.

"Hello, Dunstan!" she exclaimed.

"Oh, Andrea!  What a joy it is to see you!"

"Thanks," she said and walked between the tables, past a serving line
just being setup and entered the kitchen.

...

"Well, you know, I had somewhat different expectations for this place.
I'd wanted something more like a restaurant, you know, that would also
serve as a soup kitchen if people couldn't pay, but Andrea, we
couldn't pay the rent downtown!"

"That was down on Market Street?"

[Does Houston have a Market Street?  I have no idea.]

"Right!  I mean, a lot of people did pay, but usually only just enough
for their own food, you know, and then with those who didn't pay or
couldn't pay, well, we just couldn't afford the rent.  It was a nice
location, there, but we had to leave.  I prayed about it a lot, well I
worried about it a lot, and then this place turned up!  The rector
here said we could use the church's kitchen for free, and Andrea, you
know, it's been a real blessing, because I try to keep the place open
seven days a week, and you know, on Sundays now so many people stay
after church for lunch that it's really helped the church, you know,
their social life, and I get regular donations now from the
congregation, well I don't know what I would have done without it!"

Andrea watched the workers finish setting up the tables and chairs,
then shared lunch with Dunstan just as the first customers, mostly
homeless men, came in.  The food, especially considering its meager
pretensions, was excellent.  In addition to fresh baked bread, coffee
and orange Tang ("you know, a man in the congregation works for XXX
and they donate the Tang mix"), the lentils were made in a soup with
just enough tomatoes and onions to season it well, and the tuna salad,
replete with chopped Granny Smith apples and stuffed into the freshly
baked bread, was one of Dunstan's signature dishes.

"Can you stay until Sunday, I'm making stuffed peppers, you know, I
always like to do something nice for the congregation?"

"No, I'm heading back to my family's place in Iowa today.  I just came
down to visit Kyle Becker, he had a new project with NASA, some
people have developed a new rocket fuel."

"You know, I heard about that on the news!  They say it's quite
revolutionary, is that true?"

"Yes, it certainly seems to be.  I don't know all the details, but
Kyle's quite excited about it."

"Well maybe we'll have one of our oblates flying back into space,
ehh?"

Andrea shook her head vigorously.  "Not a chance."

As she was leaving, she quietly took one of the envelopes from the
holders on each table.  It was blank, except for a quote from Matthew:
"When I was hungry, you fed me."  She put the four remaining twenty
dollar bills she had into the envelope, sealed it, and slipped it in
the drop box on her way out the door.  Taking a city bus to the
northern extremnities of Houston, she walked to Interstate 45, sat her
duffle bag down beside the onramp, and began waiting for a ride.


T - 138 days

Alister Compton puzzled over the messages on the screen in front of
him.  He wasn't supposed to be in here, but the presence of a
mysterious computer on the network had first attracted and then
consumed the attension of the young chemist hired to research and
improve the simulation programs being used to develop Burns' new
rocket fuel.  Twenty years old, with matted blond hair, Alister had
left South Africa to study abroad and decided to stay and find a job
after graduating with a double degree in chemisty and physics.
Robotics Research was his first job after college.

He had taken the job because it had challenged him to hone his
knowledge of numerical simulation of quantum mechanical systems well
beyond what he had studied as an undergraduate.  Burns had hired him
not only because his academic background matched what he was looking
for, not only because he had graduated so quickly with a double
degree, but also because the young man had a natural aptitude working
with the computers that were so critical to the project's success.

Yet now that aptitude was begining to land the young South African in
trouble.  He had noticed that Burns or Mercuriou periodically used a
computer that was kept completely isolated from the rest of the
machines on their network.  His inquires about the machine had been
vaguely dismissed.

Yet Alister fancied himself a hacker, and had trained himself to read
keystrokes over people's shoulders.  Burns had carelessly allowed the
young chemist to watch him login to the 'dumper', as the computer was
called, and now Alister had used to password to enter the system
himself and began looking around it.  It contained dozens of files
written in assembly language, which was about as close as you could
get to the machine's underlying architecture without dealing directly
with the bits and bytes.  Alister rarely used assembly, and didn't
bother trying to understand the arcane instructions contained therein.
Instead, he looking at the machine's accounting records, which showed
one program used more than another other on the system.  Alister
ran the program.

A new window appeared on his screen.  On it, brightly colored graphics
portrayed a cue stick deflecting billard balls into a neat square.
Each ball contained a number - sixteen, then thirty-five, then four.
Alister recognized it almost immediately.  It was a Keno game of the
type you might find in a casino.
_What's_all_this_secrecy_about_a_game_, the young man wondered.  Then
the bottom of the screen caught his eye, where the machine displayed
the current date and time.  _What_the_hell!?!_


T - 137 days

"What did he see?"

Mercuriou asked the question without turning around to face Burns.
Instead, he leaned back in his chair with his back to the engineer
and watched a rain storm pelt the office's plate glass windows.

"He ran the program," Burns replied.

Unbeknownst to Alister, Burns also had a completely seperate computer
monitoring the connections to "dumper".  Although the login sessions
were encrypted, they could at least be tracked and logged.  Each
morning, Burns ran a program that verified that the login records
matched the packet traces recorded on the network.  In addition, there
were accounting records that recorded the beginning and end of every
program, and they were duplicated on the other computer.

"Did he understand what he saw?"

Burns thought for a moment.  The pelting rain was the only sound in
the office.  Mercuriou watched the streaks of water sliding down the
glass.

"Probably.  He's pretty sharp."

"So Alister knows we're up to something; he just doesn't know what,"
Mercuriou concluded, leaning back in his chair and watching a rain
storm pelt the plate glass windows behind his desk.  Burns nodded.
Mercuriou sniffed, then chuckled, then finally broke out in an awkward
guffaw.

"You think this is funny?" Burns asked.

"I think it's hilarious," Mercuriou replied, swiveling around in his
chair.  "Our whole operation is made possible by your super-hack of
Chesapeake, and now along comes this twenty-year-old kid who hacks
_your_ network!"

Burns grinned at the thought.

"By the way, did you see this?"

Mercuriou handed Burns a two-day-old copy of a major financial
newspaper.  It was folded back to page four, which contained a brief
announcement that the government investigation into the bankruptcy of
one Keystone Securities had been expanded into a criminal affair.  All
that was publicly known was that the investment firm had gone bankrupt
after a computer malfunction had frittered away more than a billion
dollars worth of securities in a single weekend of frenzied automated
trading.  Outraged investors were demanding to know how such a 'bug'
could have passed undetected, and industry analysts speculated that
Keystone would become a test case of corporate liability for computer
errors.  Burns read the story while Mercuriou thought over the problem
with Alister.

"This could be serious," the engineer concluded as his returned the
newspaper.

"Oh, it _is_ serious.  They'll eventually catch up with us."
Mercuriou leaned forward on his desk, and tapping his
forefinger against the clock there.  "There's a countdown clock
running on this launch, just like with NASA's, T minus
whatever-the-hell, only we don't know what time it is.  At some point,
that clock goes to zero, and we better be ready to launch when it
does."

"It's not going to be today," Burns replied.  "We don't even have all
the engines finished yet, and as you very well know, we don't have
enough ten-thirty-three."

"Well, we better get them finished, we better get all the payload we
need down to Site Y, we better make sure that as soon as we've got
enough ten-thirty-three then we've got a launch capability."

Burns shifted testily on the couch.  Mercuriou was preaching
the choir, and the engineer didn't like being told what he
very well knew.

"That's all fine," he answered, "but despite offloading the
ten-thirty-three production, we've still got way more work than hands
to do it."

"OK," Mercuriou continued, more thoughfully, "you keep telling me you
need more help, and one of the big things I _haven't_ be able to
provide you is help with all these computer hacks you want done.  Now
can Alister do that for you?"

Burns thought for a moment, begining to follow Mercuriou's line of
thought.  He had known Alister for almost six months (check
chronology) now.

"He's sharp, real sharp.  One of the best technicians I've got, and
yeah, it looks like he can hack, too.  The real question is,
will he hack for us?"

Alister is called into the office.

"Close the door," Mercuriou directed and the young man complied.
Burns began speaking as soon as the door closed.

"There was an unlogged connection to 'dumper' from your workstation
last night at 9:43 PM.  It was encrypted of course, but it looks like
it lasted almost an hour.  Know anything about it?"

Alister's face flushed red.  He had been avoiding Burns all day,
feeling uncomfortable ever since his un-authorized excursion of the
night before.  There seemed little point in trying to deny the
obvious.  Card key records of entry and exit from the building would
place him in the office last night at that time, and his workstation's
own accounting records could probably be mined for evidence to support
the hack.  Anyway, it was curiosity that had driven Alister; he wasn't
a natural liar.

"Yeah, I've seen you type that password a few times and I wanted to
see what was on that machine."

"You've seen me type the password?"

"Yeah, I read it over your shoulder."

Silently, Burns thought about when that could have happened.  Mecuriou
snickered.

"And what did you see?"

Alister shrugged.  An awkward silence followed.

#if maybe

"It's like tomorrow's lottery numbers today"

#endif

"OK," Mercuriou cut it, "so you know there's some kind of hack going
on.  You may suspect that this is a front operation of some kind.
What you haven't figured out is the truth, let me assure you.  Sit
down."

Alister planted himself in one of the two vacant chairs in the office.
Mercuriou got up out of his and walked to one of the windows.
He was conscious that the success or failure of his entire plan
hung on his next words and actions.  His mind flashed back
to college, to one of his most energetic professors, scrawling
"RHETORIC" across the blackbord in foot-high block letters.  Turning
around from the window, he faced the young chemist.

"This is a manned mission to Mars," he stated calmly.  "I'm the
commander; Burns is chief engineer."

Alister looked from one man to the other.  Sitting comfortably in the
Mercuriou's office, he couldn't imagine that the man in the swivel
chair was a space captain, or that the pot-smoking hacker reclining on
the coach was a chief engineer.

"Yeah, right," he replied as he got up out of his chair and started
for the door.  "And I'm Mother Theresa."

"This is no joke," Burns informed him.  Alister stopped halfway across
the room.  Both of the other men appeared absolutely serious.

"What I saw on that computer last night was no space shuttle."

"You saw the Kansas state Pick Five daily lottery drawing," Mercuriou
stated in a tone of voice Burns might have used to declare that
gravity manifested itself as curvature in a four-dimensional space
invarient under Lorentz transformations.  _Establish_credibility,_ the
blackboard had read.

"Of course, you could have turned on the TV and seen the Kansas state
Pick Five daily lottery drawing," Mercuriou continued, walking forward
and consciously dominating the space of the room, without approaching
close enough to impede on Alister's space.  _Performance_art_.

"Except that you saw _tonight's_ Kansas state Pick Five daily lottery
drawing."

Alister looked from one man to the other.

"So, what, you've hacked a state lottery to pay for a Mars mission?"

"Not even close," Mercuriou answered.  "We could hack every state
lottery out there and might barely have the money to put a
communications satellite in orbit."  _Impress_your_audience_

Mercuriou waved his arm in a sweeping gesture that including the
desk, the chairs, the office, the computers.  The truth slowly
started to dawn on Alister.

"You mean all this is stolen?  I mean hacked?"

"Stolen," Mercuriou answered.  "That's the right word.  All of it.
Every penny."

Only the rain could be heard.

"Now, we could have moved to Arruba and spent the next ten years sipping
piña coladas on the beach," Mercuriou continued.  "We could have
bought a restaurant, used it to launder the money, and then sat back
and let someone else run it.  We could have checked out of this great
society here and done whatever the hell we pleased." _SELL_THEM!_

Alister had made it back to his chair and sat down.

"Instead, we've decided to do something that'll make a difference, and
something that this man is uniquely qualified for," Mercuriou waved to
indicate Burns, then continued.  "We decided to see if we can't really
move this space technology forward, come up with a spacecraft fuel
that works, and works well, that will really let people do what Robert
Heinlein just dreamed about, quit piddling around in Low Earth Orbit,
and _fly_to_Mars_.  Learn to grow your own food in orbit!  Make your
own clothes!  Mine the asteroid belt for the minerals you need!
Design your own computer chips up there!"

LITTLE MORE HERE

"And _to_hell_ with whatever all these people back on Earth think.
That's what's we're about.  And that lottery you saw last night is
just the tip of the iceberg, trust me, you have _no_idea_ how big this
hack is."

Mercuriou turned his back and walked to the window.  _Challenge_them_

"OK," he continued in a low voice, "so it all sounds too wild to be
true.  Fine."

He turned and looked Alister straight in the eye.

"Take a look at our launch facility.  Then tell me I'm full of shit."


T - 131 days

An entire side of the two story warehouse was taken up by large
stainless steel tanks, interconnected with various machines by a
complex system of plumbing that ran across the ceiling.  Various
blueprints, rulers and small engine components were spread across a
series of tables arranged haphazardly throughout the room.  A
discarded rocket engine, with a large crack down one side, lay propped
against the far wall.  About five latinos, busy working on one piece
of equipment or another, ignored the two Caucasians as they entered.

"This is where we're building the rocket engines," Burns explained.
"The entire nozzle and combustion chamber is fabricated as one
monolithic piece, and a lot of the plumbing, too.  First, we cut
cross-sectional patterns out of ceramic fiber and stack them up to
form the engine shape."

He led the South African to one of the large tables as he spoke.  On
it were bits and pieces of a black fabric that looked like course wool.
Next to the table was an automated cutting machine controlled from a
computer on the table.  A large roll of the fabric lay on the other
side of the machine, and one the workers was supervising it as it ran.

The cutting was done by an industrial laser in a moving mount about
two feet above the table, its beam pointed straight down at the sheet
of fabric laid flat on the table beneath.  The laser moved left and
right on a thin horizontal beam that moved forward and backwards, all
under computer control.  The net result was that by positioning the
horizontal beam with one servo motor, and positioning the laser along
the beam with another, the computer could aim the laser at any point
on the table below.

"Don't stick your hand in there!"  Burns joked.

The laser was cutting a piece of fabric as they approached, and the
smell of burning fiber wafted up into the air as a thin but steady
stream of smoke rose up from where the pencil-thin red light touched
the black fabric.  The laser moved slowly around the pattern, cutting
a thin line through the fabric as it went, its position indicated by a
red dot on the computer screen on the table to its left, which showed
a graphic animation of the pattern being cut.  The cuts were a
concentric series of near-circular gray lines, and the areas between
the lines were colored yellow and green on the display.  As they
watched, the computer completed cutting one of the lines.  The laser
shut off briefly as it repositioned to the next line, then turned on
and began cutting again.

"The yellow areas are discards," Burns explained, kicking at a pile of
scrap fabric underneath the table for emphasis.  "Each of the green
areas is a thin cross-section of the rocket engine.  There's 231 of
them in total.  They get stacked up in order in this graphite mold."

He walked past the laser cutter and showed Alister a large, solid
black casing covered with soot.  Rectangular on the outside, it opened
in two halfs to show the outline of a rocket engine cut out within.

"After a complete set of fabric cross-sections are in the mold, we
close it, compress it down, and put it in the kiln."

The kiln was a shiny steel tank that reached nearly to the roof
of the building.  Much of the facility's plumbing came into it.
An entire side of the tank swiveled open to reveal electric
heating coils, as well as various valves and gauges.

"We turn on the kiln and start pumping hydrogen and MTS gas into its
bottom."

"MTS?" Alister asked, unfamiliar with the acronym.

"Methyl trichlorosilane.  It's stable at room temperature, but starts
reacting with hydrogen at about a thousand degrees Celsius.  Decomposes
into silicon carbide and hydrogen chloride.  The silicon carbide is
deposited as a solid into the gaps between the carbon fibers; that's
why we use such a course fabric.  It's the silicon carbide we're
really interested in; it's stable until almost 3000 degrees Celsius,
and that makes it ideal for rocket construction.  Once the entire
fabric has been filled in with silicon carbide, we shut down the
kiln, crack open the mold, and take out our new rocket engine!"

They walked towards the rear entrance of the building, where a pile of
black ceramic pieces lay against one wall.  Burns picked up one of
them and handed it to his student.

"That's what it looks like when it's done.  If you look closely,
you can just barely see where the fabric was layered, but it's
really hard to tell."

Alister took the piece in his hand.  It was heavy and dense, smooth
and curved on its front and back surfaces, with ragged, sharp edges
around the sides.  Several larger pieces in the pile were clearly
broken parts of a rocket engine, and Alister concluded that the entire
pile had once been an engine as he tossed the piece back.

"What happened to that one?" he asked.

"It blew up when we test-fired it," Burns replied.  He continued his
explaination as Alister looked at him sharply.  "The Mexicans didn't
do a good enough job of aligning the fabric pieces.  They learned the
hard way."

They walked out the back of the building onto the flat dirt mesa.
Burns continued straight ahead, towards a black rocket engine mounted
horizontally and aimed away from the complex, across the empty expanse
of scrub brush.

"This is the firing stand.  We test each rocket after it's finished.
We just fired this one this morning."

They walked around the rocket.  Laid on its side, it was about equal
in height to the two men.  Alister peered into its business end and
was surprised to see what appeared to be fan blades mounted on a shaft
that extended out into the nozzle from the combustion chamber.  The
blades, along with the shaft, were made from the same black ceramic
material as the rocket itself.

"I've seen these fan blades on jets, but I didn't know rocket engines
had them," he noted.

"As far as I know, this is the only rocket design that does.  See,
one of the problems with liquid-fueled rocket engines is that you need
to inject the fuel under pressure.  That implies a pump of some kind,
and the rocket exhaust is the obvious thing to power it with.  Most
liquid-fuel designs syphon off some of the exhaust into turbo pumps on
the side of the rocket.  I played around with that, but it was a huge
pain.  So I decided to just stick a simple turbine in the nozzle and
drive the pumps with that shaft."

"So you, like, designed a whole new engine yourself?"

"Pretty much."

"Why didn't you just use an existing design; wouldn't that have been
simpler?"

"Well, yes and no.  A lot of this stuff is new, like the ceramics, for
example.  When they designed the space shuttle engines back in the
70s, they didn't have silicon carbide, at least not like this.  That's
one of the reasons they didn't put turbine blades right in the exhaust
stream - the materials couldn't handle the heat."

"So what did they use for materials?"

"A lot of the early rocket designs used copper, beleive it or not."

"Copper?  Wouldn't it just melt?"

"It does if you don't cool it.  They used copper because it conducts
heat so well.  So then you have to surround your engine with cooling
pipes and pump either water or liquid oxygen or something through 'em
fast enough to keep the metal walls cool enough so they don't melt."

"No shit?"

"No shit.  And then there was the turbo pump design - they used metal
blades, and _they_ had to be cooled, so you ended up putting little
holes through middle of the blades so you could run cooling fluid
through the turbine fan...  It gets to be a real pain."

They were now walking back towards the building complex.  Alister was
feeling a bit overwealmed, but Burns kept talking about rocket engine
design, continuing on about how he had used an array of 256 computers
to simulate the heat transfer properties of the engine in order to
design its mounting arrangement.  Apparently the silicon carbide could
get quite hot.  The young South African had basically tuned out of the
conversation, but realized at that moment that the pot-smoking
American was absolutely the most brilliant engineer he had ever met.
Finally Mercuriou walked up, his facial features hidden
behind a pair of dark sunglasses.

"So what do you think?  You in?"


T - 93 days

Burns suggested a 747 for a manned launch vehicle, and Mercurio had
adquired one on lease from a company that specialized in mothballing
jumbo jets that the air carriers didn't want anymore.  The leasing
company let the airplane go for a fraction of its value, partly
because it was insured against air disasters and partially because of
the expected ease of recoving the airplane in case of a default.  They
would eventually go bankrupt, partially because of their unexpected
inability to recover one of their aircraft once it had been launched
into orbit.

Burns started by dropping the aircraft's engines out of its nacelles
and replacing them with rockets.  He had carefully designed the rocket
engines so that four of them could lift a 747 into orbit, while a solo
engine could lift a significant mass in an unmanned cargo module.
Next, he converted the entire main body of the aircraft to hold
N-1033, leaving just the bubble on top the plane pressurized for the
crew.  At the rear of the bubble he fashioned an airlock, opening
directly upward.  On top the airlock hatch he placed a hydraulic
mating adapter, and another one on the nose of the aircraft.  He'd
reworked the plane's plumbing system, too.  Most of the work had been
done by illegal immigrants working under Burns' supervision.

All four men - Burns, Mercuriou, Victor and Alister - now stood at the
base of the aircraft, parked behind the warehouse when the rocket
engines had been assembled.  Burns had just declared the 747 ready for
spaceflight.

"We still need more cargo modules," the engineer explained, "and a lot
of equipment in them, but the 747 is fueled and ready to go."

Mercuriou was practically ecstatic.  For the first time in more
than two years, he finally felt he had a real option for the day
the feds came knocking on his door.

"Do we have a name for the ship?" Alister wondered aloud.

The four would-be astronauts looked back and forth amonst themselves.

"I think our captain has an idea for that," Vic stated.

Mercuriou cleared his throat.

"You've heard the story of Icarus?"

"Some greek hero?" Alister guessed.

"The son of Daedalus," Mercuriou explained.  "Father and son were
imprisoned on an island by an evil king, so the father built wax wings
for them to escape, but Icarus flew too close to the sun, his wings
melted, and he fell to the sea and died."

"Great," Burns reacted.  "That's just what want - fall to the sea and
die!"  He bust out laughing.

"We're not going to fall to the sea and die," Mercuriou replied.
"But there's no other Greek character that so defines what we're
trying to do - escape the prison of this world."

"I think it meshes rather nicely with the insanity of this whole
venture," Vic wryly noted, the grin barely visable under the mustache.

"OK, then _Icarus_ it is."


T - 17 days

"I'm inclined to say the thing looks like a front operation, but that
doesn't make any sense, either."

Kneeling down by the Deer Tounge lettuce she was transplanting,
Dr. Andrea Yeats, electrical engineer, one-time space shuttle
astronaut and now private gardener, continued to read the
sheaf of papers in silence.  Standing over her, Kyle
Becker continued to talk on, half to himself.

"You were right about Mercuriou, too.  I don't believe a word that
comes out of the man's mouth anymore."

Picking up her spade and gloves, Yeats stood and started walking down
the garden row, past the XXX (lettuce) and back towards the main
house.

"There's no question that this stuff works."

"Absolutely none," Becker answered.  "We've tested ten-thirty-three
extensively; it's everything it's cracked up to be.  That's what
doesn't make sense about it.  They're not trying to sell us the
Brooklyn Bridge.  We've actually got the goods in hand, heck, we've
still got about a hundred liters of the stuff over in Building 17."

Yeats continued to read and walk.  Following, Becker ruminating on.

"They're not trying to get any money out of us, either.  They've got
the contract, and we've paid them a little, they've ramped up to make
massive quantities of ten-thirty-three, but we just haven't seen any
of it.  I've thought they might be selling it overseas, but I can't
figure why or how.  They evade all of our inquiries.  They always
claim to be having production problems, and that they need more time."

"Production problems," Andrea echoed, continuing to look at the
papers.  "No way.  Not with the quantities of nitric acid they're
consuming.  They've already been shipped enough to fuel three
conventional shuttle launches."

Becker nodded in assent and admiration.  He knew this as well, but
only because he had first calculated the quantity of nitric acid
required to produce a a kilogram of nitroglycerine, looked up the
energy released by a kilogram of nitroglycerine and compared that to
the energy consumed by a shuttle launch.  Yeats had performed
basically the same estimate in her head.  He had come to her
for a reason.

Leaving the gardening tools on a table by an outside sink, Andrea led
the way inside, where her elderly mother was coming out of the
kitchen.  Eighty-six and sharp as a wit, she carried a tray with a
large pitcher and glasses on it.

"Kyle, would you like a nice cool glass of lemonade?  I just finished
squeezing the lemons."

"That sounds great, Mrs. Yeats," the NASA manager replied, as the two
of them sat down at the dining room table.

"Use Equal if it's not sweet enough for you; it dissolves in cold
water better than sugar."

"It's fine, ma'am," he replied, sipping from the glass.  "A little on
the tart side, but that's just the way I like it."

"Andrea, if you think you can glean anything from those papers, be my
guest.  If you want to see ten-thirty-three in action, go see Wilcox
down in Houston, you can fire up a rocket in a test chamber.  But bottom
line, I think somebody's got to go out there, see their production
facility, talk to these people, figure out what the heck's going on."

Yeats was shaking her head.

"I'm not a detective, Kyle."

"I don't need a detective, Andrea.  I need someone who understands how
this technology works and isn't going to be put off by a bunch of
techno-babble from these guys."

Andrea sighed deeply.  She had left NASA for a reason, and had no
desire to be drawn back in.  This particular assignment looked like a
quagmire.  Still, Kyle was her best friend, and we were taught to
_give_to_all_those_who_beg_of_us.

"All right," she relented, "I'll go."

Barely able to conceal his joy, Kyle beamed with delight.

"Great!  I've got everything set up.  You'll be a special consultant;
you can use your NASA I.D; I'll advance you all the expenses.


T - 2 days

"So what's your name?"

Andrea glanced over at the hitchhiker as the rental cruised
down the Interstate.  She had picked him up at the 
last onramp.

"Howard," he replied, finally.

"Howard?"

"Yeah, Howard Stern."

Andrea grinned.  She fired back with a slight varient on one of her
favorite jokes.

"I used to listen to your show every morning... until my roommate
left for work."

She glanced over at her passenger.  Not even a smile.

"Say, you got anything to eat in here?" was all he could muster.

"No, not really," Andrea answered, slightly non-plussed [?] by what
she thought was a rude question.  _I_never_ask._ "It's a rental," she
added by way of explaination. [CA] Maybe he was really hungry.

...

"Can I have my purse back?"  Andrea could hardly believe she had asked
the question.  She had gone from terrified to violated in a New York
minute. [CA] _My_God_, _that_was_so_stupid._
_Who_care_about_a_dumb_purse?_

Yet 'Howard' grabbed her purse, ripped it open, then threw it out the
window after discovering it contained no money or credit cards.

She
has to be fairly close to "Site Y" at this point.  I guess he takes
her cell phone, too.  She tries briefly to wave down a passing car,
but fails.  Her hitchiking experience tells her to wait for dawn so
people can see her.  Finds a nice spot off the road, or under an
overpass, and sleeps.

BUT DOES SHE GET RAPED?


T - 1 day

Andrea started hitchhiking herself just after dawn.  She had briefly
considered going to the police, then thought better of it, reasoning
that you forgive your enemies, and that included rapists.  The
cars sped past her on the Interstate highway as she waved her
thumb by her side.  After all the rides she had given out,
wasn't somebody going to stop for her?

Finally, after almost half an hour of waiting, an elderly lady pulled
her aging Volvo onto the shoulder.  Andrea ran up to the passenger
door and climbed in.  The car was old but comfortable, with an Indian
dream catcher hanging from the rear view mirror, a feathered arrow
sitting on the dashboard, and an eccentric collection of cassette
tapes in a compartment just under the ashtray.  Elsie, her driver, was
half-Indian herself and returning home from a visit to her daughter in
Albuquerque.  Andrea rode with her from almost an hour, enjoying a
tape of Caribbean island music while chatting amicably, thinking
little and saying nothing about her ordeal.  Finally, she got out at
the exit that lead to the TenTech facility, thanked her new
friend, who pressed a liter of water into her hands before saying
goodbye, and watched her drive off.

The interchange was in the middle of the high desert, with a rocky
crag looming to one side and a dirt road leading off to the horizon.
As she remembered from the directions, the site was another ten miles
down this road.  It was just past nine o'clock in the morning, and
even if nobody came along to give her a ride, she figured that she had
water and could walk the distance by noon.

Nobody came along.  Even though the road was heavily rutted,
not a single vehicle passed along it in either direction.  Andrea
was grateful for the solitude, and as she treked down the road
at a steady pace, she went over the events of the last twenty
hours in her head and started to weep openly.  As the tears
rolled down her face, she turned her face skyward and
implored God,  "Why have you done this me?"

No answer came back from the heavens, only the midmorning sun blazing
down from a cloudless sky.  The silence encouraged her to speak loadly
and openly to the diety, something she rarely did in the crowded city.

"Did I fail you in some way?"

"Wasn't I supposed to be blessed?  Weren't you going to take
care of us like the birds in the field?"

"Is this some kind of test?"

Finally, emotionally exhausted, she fell down on her knees in the
middle of the roadway and cried steadily for several minutes.
Sitting cross-legged, she drank the rest of her water and took
stock of her situation.  _This_is_stupid_, she thought.
_No_dumb_fuel_problem_is_worth_this_.  _Maybe_I_should_tell_the_
_police_.  _What_if_he_rapes_someone_else_?

Again she looked skyward and prayed to God.

"I'm trying real hard to forgive that man, but what if I can
stop another rape?  I don't know what to do..."

After another boat of tears, she decided to head back to the town,
another exit further on the Interstate, and report the whole thing to
the police.  _I_can't_let_that_son_of_a_bitch_violate_someone_else_ A
sense of peace and calm overcame her, and she sat quietly for a while
longer.  Before she made herself get up and move, though, a dust cloud
appeared where the road met the horizon and grew steadily larger until
a Jeep appeared at its center, drove up to where she was sitting and
rolled to a stop as she got to her feet.

Two men were seated in the Jeep, both dressed for the desert summer in
shorts, T-shirts, and sunglasses.  The man in the passenger seat was
talking on a cellphone and completely ignored her.  The driver, a
friendly fellow in his early twenties, asked her if she needed help,
and she mumbled something about her car being stolen and that she was
heading to the police station in town.  He offered her a ride, and she
climbed into the back seat as he started driving again.  The driver
spoke with a distinct foreign accent that she couldn't quite place.
Australian, perhaps?  He started talking to her, but the passenger
waved him quiet, as he was obviously having problems hearing the
phone conversation over the engine noise, and Andrea lapsed into
silence as they continued towards the Interstate.

"Look, there's just been a delay, that's all," the passenger
told his listener, then fell silent for a moment.

"No, no, there's no problem, it's just a production shortfall.  We
haven't been able to produce the fuel in the quantities we had hoped
for."

Andrea now began to listen intently to the half of the conversation
she could hear.

"Of course it works!  You have the samples don't you?"

"Well, there's a lot more to a production run than cranking out
samples in a laboratory.  A factory..."

"Well, then make it yourself!  We can pay for the spacesuits in cash!"

"No, no, we've got it licked, we just need more time."

"Look, you want NASA to find out we're selling you anything?"

"OK, then just let me handle it."

"I know how my own government works."

"Thanks."

"Goodbye."

The passenger clicked the cellphone off, then punched some more
buttons on it.  Meanwhile, Andrea slowly digested what she had heard
and began to wonder about who her benefactors were.

"Burns called," the passenger said more to himself than anyone else as
he looked at the phone's display and pushed some more buttons, finally
connecting another call.

"Yeah, what's up?"

"Well, if he doesn't show, he doesn't show."

"A woman?"

Without disconnecting or even lowering the cell phone, he slowly
turned around in his seat, looking at the hitchhiker fixedly as if
seeing her now for the first time.

"I'm sorry," he said, addressing her now for the first time, "we
weren't really introduced..."

Andrea fumbled in her pocket and first thing that came to her
hand was her government I.D.  She pulled it out and thrust it
towards him.

"Andrea Yeats, National Aeronautics and Space Administration."

At various times, Andrea had seen people red-faced with excitement,
hysteria, and embarrassment, but now, for the first time in her life,
she actually watched someone's face as it turned red.  The flush began
just under Mercuriou's cheekbones, then spread across the rest of his
face in a split second.  He clenched his teath and turned back around
in his chair.

"I'll get back to you," he told Burns in a clipped voice, then severed
the connection without waiting for an answer, took the earpiece out of
his ear, wound its cord around the telephone and put in down on the
dashboard.  For a moment they drove on in silence.

"Turn around," Marc quietly told Alister.

"Look, I'm heading into town, I can just walk back..."

"You're not going anywhere," Mercuriou interrupted her, unclipping his
seatbelt, turned fully around in his chair, and reaching back to put
one hand on the seatback near the NASA engineer's shoulder.

Alister brought the Jeep to a stop, then looked back with a pained
expression on his face.

"Turn around," Marc repeated, "Go back."

Within sight of the Interstate, the South African executed a
three-point turn on the broad roadway and headed back the way they had
come.  Past the rocky crag, past where Andrea had broken down while
praying to God, all the way in silence, all the way back to a locked
gate that Alister stopped long enough to get out, open, then drive
through and pause to lock again behind him.  [they've got money - the
lock's electronic] Almost another mile further on, he pulled into a
complex of buildings and parked in front of one.  All three got out of
the car and walked in.  Andrea followed the other two, partly out of
curiosity, partly because there was simply no place else to go.  She
hadn't seen another vehicle until they were in the parking lot, and
even there were only three other cars besides the Jeep.

They walked into a large room whose walls were lined with computers on
tables and whose center was a jumble of boxes and packing material.
Vic was packing one of the boxes, and Burns looked up from a computer
as they came in.

"The man who called from NASA was named Kyle Becker.  Apparently this
engineer, Dr. Yeats, had a reservation at the Hampton Inns in town,
but the hotel says she never checked in, and..."

His voice drifted off as Andrea entered the room behind the other two.
Vic stopped what he was doing and looked up.  An awkward pause
ensued.

"Doctor Yeats," Mercuriou began slowly, pausing and measuring his 
words, "during the ride here... I was trying to decide... exactly..."

"What you're going to do with me?" she speculatively completed his
sentance.

"Precisely."

"What's going on?  What happened?" Vic asked, the second question
addressed to Alister as if expecting an explanation from him.

The young man opened his mouth as if to speak, but couldn't quite
explain how he had picked up a hitchhiker, or how Mercuriou had
continued his imprudent cellphone conversation, or how they discovered the
true identity of their passenger.  Finally, after a second or two, he
just shrugged and closed his mouth without saying a word.

Andrea broke the silence.

"I beleive the common expression is that I 'know too much'."

"Um-hum," Marc responded and nodded in agreement before turning
towards Burns.

"The old server room, with all the boxes in it, can you rig the door
so it can't be opened from the inside without a card key?"

The engineer leaned back in his chair and nodded slowly.

"Yeah, the locking mechanism is in the wall, so I could weld the
door handle in place, along with the bolt.  You couldn't open it
at all from the inside..."

"Fine.  Do it.  Vic, you and Alister move all the boxes out of there."

The other three men looked slowly at one another.  None of them liked
what they were being asked to do, but Burns got up and lead the other
two from the room, leaving Andrea and Marc to eye each other in
silence, she sitting on a chair in the middle of the room, he perched
on a tabletop.  Ten minutes later, the South African returned to
announce that the room was ready.  Mercuriou escorted the NASA
engineer down a hallway and around a corner to twenty-by-thirty foot
room.  Entering, Andrea turned back to face him.

"Isn't this where I get some fancy explanation of what you're up to?"

"No," he answered, then closed the door behind him, insured that
it was locked, and began to walk away.

"Mr. Mercuriou, I'm sure we can discuss..."

Her captor spun on his heals, keyed the lock, and yanked the door open
before she could finish the sentence.

"_Captain_ Mercuriou, it's _Captain_ Mercuriou!"

Then he was gone.

... description of Andrea's cell and her reaction ...

Back in the main room, a spirited discussion now ensued over the
events of the morning.  Alister was reluctant to be party to
a kidnapping and imprisonment, while Vic wryly noted that
Dr. Yeats could seriously jeopardize their plans.

"Nothing's going to happen to her," Marc assured Alister.  "We've just
got to figure out how to stall things for what... another three
weeks?"

"Yeah, just about that," Burns agreed.  "Maybe a month.  If there's no
hitches, two or three weeks."

"OK, OK," Marc concluded, raising a hand to silence any more
objections.  "Look, let me just call this guy Becker back.  There's
nothing unusual in inquiring about someone who was supposed to visit
here anyway."

Marc telephoned the NASA supervisor and after informing him that
Dr. Yeats hadn't shown up yet for her visit, spoke to him for several
minutes.  After hanging up the phone, Marc turned back to face the
other three man, who had been watching and listening silently during
the entire conversation.

"We're fine.  The police found her car abandoned seventy miles from
Denver."  Vic raised an eyebrow.  Denver was several hundred miles
away.

"Car?"  Alister asked.  "What car?  She didn't have a car.  Wait,
she said something about her car being stolen."

"I don't know," Marc answered.  "The police suspect foul play, but
they don't think she's anywhere around here.  They're searching the
Denver area, and think she might have been abducted along the
Interstate somewhere."

"There shouldn't be a problem," he summarized.  "We've got plenty of
food for her; she obviously isn't hurt.  We'll just keep her here for a
few weeks until we can get the launch off, then let her go."

"I don't like it, Marc," Vic said.  "We've basically kidnapped her."

"I don't like it either," Marc admitted.  "Does anybody have any
alternate suggestions?"  There were none.

"It's not about her; it's about us.  We sooner we get our work done,
the sooner she goes free."


Later that evening, with nothing else to do, Andrea turned off the
light in the small room and laid down to sleep.

ANDREA'S PRAYER


Launch Day

Andrea woke early in the darkened room and lay still until she heard
voices down the hallway.  During her contemplation, she resolved upon
a plan, which consisted in little more than trying to extract any
possible concession from her jailers which would allow her to get to a
phone and call Kyle.  Siting up against the wall, she waited quietly
until the electronic lock clicked and the door was cautiously pushed
open.  It was the blond-haired youth with the foreign accent.  He
turned on the light.

"Good morning.  I brought you some breakfast," he said as cheerily as
he could muster. He put a bottle of water and a military ration down
on the floor next to the door.

"Do you think I could use the bathroom?" Andrea asked, standing up and
pushing her hair back.

"Look, I've covered in filth; I haven't bathed in four days; I'd like
to at least splash some water on my face."

"Uh... sure, it's right down the hall," he answered, before leading the
way about a hundred feet to a ladies' room.

"I'll wait here," he mumbled, looking down at his shoes while she
entered the door.

Getting to the restroom was something she had contemplated earlier,
and she knew exactly what she wanted to do.  First, she turned on the
water facuet, and immediately started searching for a way out.  The
room had no windows, which she quickly ascertained, but was covered
with a ceiling of drop panels.  Climbing onto the sink table, she
could reach the ceiling and push one of the ceiling panels aside.  The
wall continued straight up to another ceiling several feet above the
panels.

"Damn," she muttered to herself, then climbed down and went
immediately to the other side of the room.  Entering a stall, she
climbed on the back of a toilet and pushed another panel aside.  On
this side, the wall ended just above the drop panels and offered an
escape route into the adjacent room.  Andrea grabbed the top of the
bathroom stall and clamored up to the ceiling.  She grabbed hold of a
large, circular pipe above the panel ceiling and climbed up above the
ceiling and onto the top of the wall.

She found herself crouched in a dark, dusty space that extended about
four feet above the top of the wall.  Plumbing pipes, electrical
conduits, and some large air ducts crisscrossed the concrete ceiling,
some bolted to it, many of the smaller ones, including the one she had
pulled herself up with, suspended from wires.  In the dim light, she
could make out the course of the wall she was standing on down to
where it met the hallway.  She could easily have inched down the top
of the wall and jumped through the drop ceiling into the hallway where
Alister was waiting for her.  Instead, she laid down on the wall,
reached over to the other side, and pulled aside one of the ceiling
panels in the adjourning room.

In the sunlit room directly beneath her was a chair siting behind a
desk covered with books and papers.  She held on to the same pipe she
had used to pull herself up, swung her legs over the opening in the
ceiling, and dropped down.  The wires supporting the pipe broke loose
under her weight, and the pipe dropped down onto the wall and ceiling
with a crash.  Andrea hung on amid a cloud of dust and debris that
fell on her from above.  Dangling three feet over the floor, she
kicked the chair aside and dropped down onto the carpet.  Outside,
there were voices in the hallway.

Andrea picked up the telephone handset on the desk, then stopped to
look at the contents of the desk.  Amid reference books on celestrial
mechanics, materials science and rocket propulsion were a set of
blueprints for a rocket engine.  Looking just at the cover page, she
knew it wasn't either an American or a European design.  The turbo
pump design was completely novel, and all the text was in both English
and Spanish.  _Spain_never_designed_a_rocket_engine_, she thought, as
she absent-mindedly replaced the handset, now totally engrossed in the
papers before her.  She began flipping through the other papers on the
desk, quickly finding one in particular that caught her interest.  It
read as follows:



Each Shuttle SRB

1,300,000 lbs at launch
1,100,000 lbs propellant
192,000 lbs inert
3,300,000 lbs launch thrust
2 min burn time
~ 50,000 lb/sec propellant burn


Shuttle (on landing) - 230,000 lbs max


Space shuttle main engine

178,000 L/min liquid hydrogen
64,000 L/min liquid oxygen
1,734,803 N at sea level (each)
ET - 2 million liters
     29,900 kilograms empty
     751,000 kilograms full
1,035 gallons (3,900 liters) per second (17-inch diameter feed lines)
8.5 minutes burn time


forced CVI (chemical vapor infiltration)
   3M Nextel fiber
   start with pressed sheets of ceramic fibers in graphic holder
   methyl trichlorosilane (MTS) -> silicon carbide + HCl
   others than SiC = BN, carbon, a-Si3N4
   SiC sublimes ~ 2700 deg C
   1100 deg C - depositation
Handbook of Selected Properties of Air- and Water-reative Materials
   MTS - p. 172

$5 million for a used 747

Clayton tanker truck - 30,000 L    ~ 40 ft length

90% Hydrogen peroxide / JP-4
  297 sec Isp (theoretical)

possible 95% efficiency?

one test
  130 sec Isp (theoretical)
  52 sec Isp (measured)


ammonium perchlorate (NH4ClO4) - oxidizer - 69.6 percent by weight
aluminium - fuel - 16 percent
iron oxide - catalyst - 0.4 percent
polymer - binder - 12.04 percent
epoxy curing agent - 1.96 percent
high thrust at ignition and reduced thrust during max dyn pressure via shape
  11-point star perforation in forward segment
  double-truncated cone perforation in each aft segment
nozzle - 7-to-79 expansion ratio
  hydraulic gimbaled for thrust vector control (8 deg)
four hold down posts; top nut contains NASA standard detonators (NSDs)
  NSDs blown during launch sequence; lights booster charge, lights propellant
redundant 



Design of Liquid Propellant Rocket Engines; Huzel and Huang


orbital speed - Mach 26 - 8 km/s


New 747   $200 million
  6,025 cu ft cargo space
  216,840 L max fuel
  operating empty weight = 394,088 lb
various engines - CF6-80C2B1 59,000 lb thrust (weight = 9,570 lb x 4)
   "The Engine Handbook"


Simple liquid fueled rocket - 275 sec spec impulse
  for 59,000 lb thrust  59,000/275 = 214 lb/sec (total propellant flow rate)
  for four engines ~ 1000 lb/sec
  1000 lbs water ~ 120 gallons ~ 500 liters
  433 seconds operating time (216,840 L)
  6,025 cu ft = 45,000 gallons = 180,000 L
  216,840 + 180,000 L ~= 400,000 L
  400,000 L = 800 sec operating time = 13 min


Her mouth went dry as she recognized a number of space shuttle
parameters, including the composition of the solid fuel boosters and
the basic engine thrust budget.  Kyle had thought they might be selling
fuel illegally, but that didn't fit.  She thought back to the
conversation she'd overheard yesterday.  _They_aren't_selling_fuel;
_they're_hoarding_it.  And now the rocket design and the launch
budget...  Her contemplation was cut short by Mercuriou's loud voice
from the hallway.

"Coming in, doctor, pull up your pants!"

Broken from her reverie, Andrea snatched up the telephone once more,
punched nine and got a second dial tone.  Looking out the window, she
could see that the sun had been up several hours.  Additionally,
Houston was an hour ahead of them, so she hoped Kyle was already at
work, or had at least turned on his cell phone.  She heard noises in
the room behind her as she dialed the number.  He answered on the
second ring.

"Kyle, it's Andrea!"

"My God, girl, where are you?  The police are looking all over the
Rockies for you!"

"My God, girl, where are you?  I'm worried sick about you!"

"I'm at TenTech; they're holding me prisoner here!"

"What?!"  Her boss was incredulous.  "But they found your car near
Denver!"

"Look, that's not important now..." she began as the door's electronic
lock clicked open and Mercuriou dashed in.

"They're planning a launch!" she yelled as the irate captain sprinted
across the room and slammed his hand down on the telephone to sever
the connection.

"What are you up to?" she asked him, but instead of answering,
Mercurio took her by the arm and half led, half dragged her back down
the hall to her improvised cell, put her back inside, then closed and
locked the door behind her without saying another word.

The phone was ringing as he returned to the control room.  It was
Becker, and he demanded to speak to Andrea Yeats.  After first
disclaiming any knowledge of her, Mercuriou finally just hung
up the phone.  His crew was gathered around, silent.

"His caller I.D. showed that the call came from here.  He said
he was calling the police."

"So what do we do now?" Alister asked.

"Well, we go on.  Burns, what happens if we launch?"

"When?"

"Well, just for argument's sake, right now."

The engineer made a pained expression with his face and thought for a
minute.

"Well, it all depends on our launch vehicles.  Certainly the 747 is
ready to go, it just needs to be fueled and a few more supplies put on
board.  The real question is the cargo rockets.  We've designed a lot
of redundancy into their payloads in case there are launch failures.
If we launch with what we've got now, we lose a lot of that
redundancy.  If all the cargo modules make it to orbit, we're O.K, but
there's a lot less room for error.  Also, we'll be short on fuel.
We've planned the launch schedule around our producation capacity for
N-1033, and we'll come up short.  I doubt we'll be able to land on
Mars, at least not with the fuel we've got."

The room lapsed back into silence while the captain thought.  Finally,
he addressed the rest of the crew.

"Can anybody think of anything we need to have, putting aside
redundancy, anything we absolutely need for this mission that we've
haven't got loaded yet?"

Nobody said anything for a minute.  Finally, Vic spoke up.

"Well, we've got checklists, right?"

  [start fueling the 747]

"Sure," Burns replied, and turned back to his computer terminal to
begin pulling up the lists.  Each of the crewmen now went through the
checklists they had prepared for their specific specialties.  Vic
checked again the list of medical and horticultural supplies.  Alister
and Burns went through the engineering and scientific payloads.
Mercuriou checked the food, water, gas and fuel manifests.

By the time there were done, an alarm went off indicating that the
front gate was being opened, and Alister pulled up a video feed on his
computer terminal that showed three police cars at the gate and
several policemen who had just cut the chain off the gate.

"Blow the bridge," Mercuriou said calmly.  Alister keyed a radio
controlled detonator and in the distance they could hear the sound of
explosives destroying a bridge over a ravine between them and the
police.

"That won't stop them for long," Vic mused.

"No," Mercuriou agreed, then turned to Burns.  "OK, it's launch day."



----

"What should we do with the NASA engineer?" Bryan asked.

Mercurio thought for a moment.  The supply rockets were launching
every five minutes and the 747 was completely fueled.  Burns
was getting ready to switch the supply rockets' launch sequences
to automatic, from which point there would be no way to stop
them from the ground.

"We can let her go now, I think," the Captain concluded.  He walked
with Bryan to the locked supply closet where Andrea Yeats had been
held for the last three days, and opened the door.  She had heard
them coming and was standing by the wall, waiting for them.

"Well, Doctor, you can go now," Mercurio announced.  "Sorry for
your detention, but it was necessary at the time."

He walked back to the room where Burns was monitoring the
supply rockets.  Yeats followed him at a short distance.

"The launch sequence is on automatic," Burns announced as they entered
the room.

There was very little to pack up.  Everything needed in orbit had already
been loaded into either the supply rockets or the 747.  The control
equipment on Earth, mostly ordinary computers, was all duplicate,
courtesy of the mega-bucks from their mega-hack.


"Look, if you're heading into space, you need an experienced astronaut."

"Doctor, let me assure you, we don't need your help.  NASA aren't the
only people capable of launching a manned mission.  We're more than
capable ourselves."

Andrea paused for a moment and adjusted her approach.  "Fine, you don't
_need_ me.  You can _use_ my help.  You can _use_ an experienced
astronaut, or do you think that someone with two shuttle missions
under her belt would be useless to you?"

Mercurio stopped walking and waved Burns to keep going.  Instead,
the engineer stopped and listened.

"Look, you don't even know what our mission is."

"OK, so, why don't you tell me."

Mercurio started laughing, and put his hand against the wall to brace
himself.  The NASA engineer was dead serious.  Finally, he stopped
laughing and looked back at her.

"We're going to Mars."

Now it was Yeats' turn to grin.

"That's great; I've always wanted to go to Mars!"

The two looked at each other and laughed together.  The situation was
absolutely absurd.

"Look, I don't even have a spacesuit for you."  Burns threw Mercuriou
a surprised look.  He statement wasn't entirely true.

"I don't need one," she shot back.

"Doctor, my policy is that everyone on this mission has a spacesuit."

"So?  I thought NASA's biggest problem was that we're locked in to our
policies and procedures."

Mercurio turned back down the hallway and began walking again.  Yeats
continued to follow as the Captain continued to voice objections.

"We're not coming back here for a long time.  This isn't a decision
to make on the spur of the moment."

Yeats was silent for only moment.  For the first time since Kyle Becker
had walked into her garden, it all clicked.  The screwed up
manufacturing budget.  The massive and irregular expenditures.
_They're_trying_a_Mars_launch_.  And for the first time since she
picked up a hitchhiker two days agos, actually wanted to laugh.
_THIS_I_have_GOT_to_see_.  Anyway, if they made it to Mars, she wanted
to be there, and if they didn't, they'd _really_ need her help.

"Let me make my own decisions, Captain.  I want to be part of your
mission."  /  "I can make my own decisions, in my own way, Captain."

Mercurio looked back at her, grimaced and shook his head, but said
nothing.  He walked out the back door and climbed into the driver's
seat of one of the Jeeps parked there, setting his suit's power unit
behind.  Yeats sat in the passenger seat without being invited and
they drove in silence towards the runway and the spaceplane, Mercurio
wondering how to get rid of her, Yeats composing herself by saying a
silent prayer: "Lord, let me put my life here in your hands.  Let this
man make the decision to do your will, and I will accept it.  Let me
put my faith in you to provide for my life and its needs."

Finally, they reached the 747 and climbed onto it from an accessway
built from the ground to the rear of its left wing, then up a ladder
to its roof.  Then they went up another ladder to the airlock hatch on
top of the bubble and entered the spaceplane via the airlock.

"Dr. Yeats wants to come with us," Mercurio announced to the surprised
crew.  They looked at her and each other with an air of bewilderment,
then finally back to the Captain.  Mercurio addressed himself to Burns,
who had turned around in the pilot's seat and was looking back
into the cabin.

"Any technical reasons she can't go?"

The engineer though for several minutes.  Their year's supply of food
would be cut down to about eight months with her addition, but the
rations wouldn't be enough to sustain them in any event.  It would
just give them less of a margin for error for getting the greenhouses
working.  The weight wasn't an issue on the 747, since almost
everything was loaded into the cargo modules, another one of which
launched as the Captain waited for an answer.  The roar of the rocket
(launching) less than five miles away briefly drown out any
conversation.  Alister, who had turned back to the engineer's station
in the rear of the cockpit, broke the silence by announcing that
the launch sequence was going as planned.

"Well?" Mercurio prompted Burns.

"I guess not; I can't think of any reason why not; not any technical
reasons, that is."

Mercurio turned back to the NASA engineer, standing behind him.  He
opened his mouth, trying to tell her to get lost, but just closed it
again after no words came out.  On the one hand, he was reluctant to
make such a momentous decision so suddenly.  On the other hand, he
knew / his gut told him that if they could work together, an
experienced astronaut would be an invaluable addition to the crew.
Perhaps his gut also told him something about this remarkable woman.
Finally, in a completely uncharacteristic moment of aquiesance, he
just waved his hand nonchalantly.

"Fine, you can go."

Vic got out of his chair and began taking off his spacesuit as
Mercurio climbed back out of the airlock to throw the ladders
down to the ground.  Andrea was arguing with Vic as he returned
and closed the airlock behind him.

"Look, you're putting on this spacesuit."

"No, you wear your spacesuit, I'm fine without one."

"Young lady," he replied with a air of chiverly, "I am this ship's
doctor, and I am giving you a medical order.  You will put on this
spacesuit, now."

As Mercurio looked on, Andrea gave up.

"Fine," she said, and began suiting up as Mercurio walked forward
and sat in the 747 captain's chair next to Burns.

"Is this a good idea?" the engineer asked.

"I don't know," the Captain answered.

"Isn't it dangerous for Vic to not be wearing a spacesuit during
launch?" Alister asked.

"Yeah, but if he needs it during launch, we're all in trouble," Burns
replied.

Mercurio shook his head again, as he finished attaching his spacesuit
supply lines to air hoses running to his seat along the floor, put his
helmet on and sealed it.  For some reason, he just couldn't turn down
the assertive but pleasant woman (from NASA).  He turned his attention
to the final pre-launch checklist with Burns and Alister.

"GPS?"

"On... position locked."

"Fuel values?"

"Open."

"Atmospheric seals?"

"Closed."

"OK, everyone ready to go?" the Captain asked, using the question in
lue of a com check.

"We're ready," Burns confirmed, "Alister?"

"I'm ready."

"Ship's doctor ready for takeoff!" Vic jauntily proclaimed from
his seat in the passenger section behind the cockpit.

"Dr. Yeats?" the Captain dramatically inquired, after a moment of silence.

"Ready," the veteran astronaut proclaimed.  She hadn't answered at
once because she had been double-checking the connections on the
(somewhat) unfamiliar Russian spacesuit.

"Let's go!" the Captain proclaimed, and Burns hit the engine start
button on his touchscreen panel.  Far to their rear, electronically
controlled values opened to let N-1033 flow into the rocket engines.
100 milliseconds after opening the values, the engine control computer
fired a spark gap that ignited the fuel.  The engines belched fire
with a roar.

"Start one, two, four... three start... all engines good start!"
Alister declared from the engineer's position behind Burns.  The 747
lurched forward, straining against its brakes, as the police officers
gathered outside backed away from the heat.

Burns released the brakes and the plane shot forward, down the runway
and away from the stunned policemen standing near the abandoned
gentryway.  Quickly it gathered speed.

"100 knots," Alister proclamed.

Mercurio surveyed the brightly colored computer displays in front
of him.  With Burns piloting the plane, he had little to do, but
had made sure he was familiar with all the craft's systems.  The
engines were firing at their minimum force, about half power,
but it was still more thrust than generated by conventional
747 engines, and the crew was pushed back into their seats
by nearly three gees of acceleration.

"150 knots... V-1!" Alister declared.

The plane was now hurtling down the otherwise unused runway on top the
mesa.  They had reached and passed the speed where any takeoff abort
would be possible.  They were commited at least to a liftoff.

"200 knots... V-R!" came Alister's cry.

Burns eased back on the control yoke, one of the few parts of the
original 747 left unmodified, and the giant plane soared upwards
into the sky.  Some of the observers on the ground watched with
their months agap, deafened by the roaring rocket engines and
stunned by the sight of a jumbo jet belching rocket exhaust.

"Gear up," Burns ordered calmly.

"Gear up," the Captain acknowledged, as he pushed the button to raise
the landing gear.  Burns retracted the wing flaps and guided the plane
spaceward.  Unlike any conventional takeoff, he didn't level off at
10,000 feet, or 20,000 feet, or 30,000 feet, nor did the force of
acceleration notably decline until he put the plane into a near
vertical climb.  It wasn't the most optimal launch profile, but the
aircraft wasn't designed for supersonic flight, so Burns made sure he
climbed above most of the atmosphere before beginning a true orbital
insertion.  After about a minute of flight, they passed 100,000 feet.
The conventional control surfaces were becoming unusable due to the
rarified atmosphere.  Burns took his right hand off the control yoke
and placed it on a joystick to his right.

"Release engine gimbles," he instructed.

"Engine gimbles released," Alister acknowledged, after pressing a
button and watching several indicators turn green / change color.

The rocket engines, mounted in hydraulically mobile mountings, now
swiveled at Burns' command.  He nudged forward on the joystick, the
engines pivoted downwards and the aircraft turned towards the
horizontal.  Two minutes into launch, they now passed 200,000 feet.
The sky was completely black.  As the aircraft turned down to about a
thirty percent angle with the horizon, the Earth rose into the view of
the pilots.  It's curvature was obvious.  An entire range of the Rocky
Mountains lay streched out beneath them, abutting the salt flats from
where they had launched.

"Increase to full power," Burns instructed.

"Full power," Alister acknowledged.

The engines, like neglected children throwing an attention tantrum,
doubled their thrust and pushed the crew further back into their
seats.  Bladders in the legs of their spacesuits inflated with air to
push blood upwards in their bodies and ensure they remained conscious,
now with more than five gees of thrust pressing against them.  Andrea
had never experienced a launch quite like this.  Space shuttle
launches were carefully profiled never to expose the crew to more than
three gees of acceleration.  Vic blacked out, the first unexpected
consequence of Andrea's presence.

Burns switched his primary display from the almost useless airplane
indicators to an precomputed orbital injection profile based on
continually updated GPS coordinates.  The display showed the projected
course in blue, from both side and top perspectives, along with the
plane's actual course in red.  The aircraft was slightly below the
profile, so Burns eased back on the joystick to raise the plane's
attitude slightly and guided the red line back towards the blue one.
He didn't believe in autopilots, and hadn't had the time to program
one, anyway.

At fifty miles in altitude, they were now above most of the
atmosphere, and the blue line flattened out.  Burns guided the
spacecraft along it.  Almost all of the engine force was now directed
towards increasing the craft's speed to orbital velocity.  Ten minutes
into launch, the 747 was eighty miles high and the GPS indicator
showed their speed at 10 km/s.  Burns continued firing the engines
until nearly two thirds of the ship's fuel had been exhausted.  He
then cut off the engines and let the ship coast in free-fall for
another half an hour.  Now well over a hundred miles in altitude, the
ship continued to climb.  On the radar display, the pilots could see
the clump of cargo modules they were approaching from below.  Finally,
Burns fired the engines again to stabilize the orbit just as they
reached the cargo modules.  A hundred and twenty miles in altitude,
the ship was in a ninety-minute Low Earth Orbit in the midst of over
hundred free-floating cargo modules.

Once in orbit, the crew got right to work.  They had to.  Most of
their fuel and supplies were in the cargo modules, which were built
around a three-part design.  The first stage boosted the module to
orbital height and speed, though with a perigee still in the
atmosphere.  After detaching the first stage, the second stage fired
briefly at apogee to raise the module to a circular orbit, while the
first stage dropped back into the atmosphere and burned up.  Atop the
second stage was the cargo module itself, equiped with a laptop
computer using a radio communications link and a fuel cell fed
from supply lines of N-1033 and peroxide.

The cargo modules, launched five minutes apart over the course of
several hours, were now spread out all over Low Earth Orbit, while the
747 with the crew onboard was in a six-hour orbit hundreds of miles
above.  This was deliberate.  Since the cargo modules were themselves
hundreds of miles apart, rendezvousing with each of them in LEO would
have required many complex engine burns.  Instead, and considering
that their ultimate goal was Mars, Burns had elected to put the 747
into a higher orbit, then wait for each cargo module to come into a
favorable alignment, fire its rocket engine remotely, and put it in a
transfer orbit that would bring it to them.  This enabled the crew to
bring each cargo module to them, roughly one per hour, over the course
of the next several days.

On Earth, confusion reigned.  CNN, the American 24-hour news network,
had reported the last several launches live, and speculation was
rampant that the missiles contained some kind of chemical or
biological agent.  Around the world, TV networks began interrupting
their regular programming to cover the event, showing graphical ground
tracks of the orbiting cargo modules and warning people as they
drifted above.  The U.S. State Department was fielding a barrage
of queries from foreign embassies anxious to know how serious
the situation was.  The President abandoned a trip to the midwest
and turned Air Force One back towards Washington, D.C.
Somehow, amid all the ballyho, the 747 had been lost
completely and effectively disappeared into high Earth orbit.

Five hours after the 747's launch, Burns fired the rocket engine of
the first cargo module and put it into its transfer orbit.  NORAD
detected the course change and reported it to the Pentagon within
minutes, who immediately passed this information on to an emergency
session of the National Security Council.  By the time the third cargo
module had been put into transfer orbit, the Air Force was convinced
that the engine burns were lifting the modules into higher orbits, not
deorbiting them as some kind of attack.  They computed the rendezvous
point, aimed their imaging telescopes at that point, and were shocked
to find themselves looking at a 747.

In Washington, the President held a hurried meeting of his national
security team, finally blowing up in frustration at their inability to
provide any concrete answers, throwing a briefing folder across the
room and sending top secret papers flying everywhere.

"What the hell do I have a CIA for if I've got to find out from CNN
when 170 missiles get fired off in Utah?"

That evening, the President addressed a nervous / rapt but unshaken
nation, informing them of basically what their news networks had been
reporting for hours.  Aside from reassuring them that the U.S.
government was carefully tracking the situation, the only new
information he provided was NORAD's assessment that the cargo modules
were being moved to higher orbits and therefore probably weren't part
of an attack.  From his home in Houston, Kyle Becker watched the press
conference alone and in silence.  Andrea Yeats was never mentioned.


T + 1 day

Among the many high-ticket items the _Icarus_ crew had purchased with
their stolen millions was a set of satellite telephones.  These were
similar to ordinary cellular telephones, but were designed to operate
in remote regions of the Earth lacking cell phone coverage.  Thus,
instead of using cells ten miles wide and switching the phone calls
from one cell to another as the mobile user moved between them, as an
ordinary cellular system would do, the satellite system used cells two
hundred miles high, based on satellites in low earth orbit, and
switched calls from one satellite to another as they moved through
their orbits in a carefully choreographed pattern.  Burns had studied
the system closely to make sure it would still work if not only the
cells, but the telephone itself was moving in an orbital pattern.

One of the first items on the ship's long on-orbit checklist was to
verify the proper operation of these phones, after which Mercuriou
made the first phone call.  It was to the news bureau of a major
television network.  The captain finally convinced the skeptical
editors that he really was in space by agreeing to a television
interview, then handing the telephone to Burns, who then spent another
hour discussing with the network's technicians how to relay the video
signal.  Since the _Icarus_ was equipped with a microwave antenna
array designed to track moving satellites, and the television network
had no such equipment readily available, they finally agreed to use an
existing television satellite in geostationary orbit as a relay, which
provided about twenty minutes of video capability each time the
_Icarus_ passed around its two-hour orbit.  As soon as the
network received the first images of men floating in zero-gee in the
cabin of a heavily modified 747, they knew they had their scoop, and
carried the interview live, conducted by the anchor of their nightly
national news program.  Thus, the world got it's first dose of Captain
Marcelius Mercuriou.

"Captain, I just don't understand," the news anchor was asking.  "Your
company has developed a major new rocket fuel; you _did_ legitimately
develop N-1033, didn't you?"

"Sure we did.  But where do you think we got the money to develop it?
You think they just give computational chemistry software away for
free?  You think you get laboratory equipment handed to you just
because you want to play around with some crazy idea that might
somehow make the world a better place?  People just put food in front
of your chemists because they get up and go to work in the morning?
Hell, no, you need money for all of it!  It cost us over ten million
dollars just to _develop_ N-1033; that was before you ever heard of
us!"

"So where did you get the money from?"

"I told you, we stole it!"

"But you had a working product.  Couldn't you get all the venture
capital funding you needed?"

"We didn't have a working product at first," Mercuriou noted.  "We had
nothing.  One really smart guy who thought you could design a rocket
fuel with a computer.  That's it.  No computers.  No staff.  No
software.  No lab.  Nothing.  Now how do you get that venture capital
funding?  I'll tell you how.  You sell your soul to the capitalists.
You convince them, and I mean really sell them, that you're one of
them, that you believe in their nightmare philosophy of greed, you
agree to bring on their management team, you sign off on some
'business plan' that tells how you're going to patent and control this
technology once it's developed, because these people will do nothing
unless they can see how they'll get a big killing back out it, and
unless you can really bring something more than your good ideas to the
table, you'll fight like hell just to keep 51% of the company.  And if
you tell them the truth, that once you invent this thing that their
dear precious money paid for, you're going to publish everything
you've got about how it works, they'll drop you like a hot
potato. [CA] Or you toil away in your garage for ten years of nights
and weekends while working some stupid job just to pay for the stupid
garage, and I'm not much of garage guy.  So we developed, let's say,
an original source of financing."

"And what was that?  Did you rob a bank?"

Mercuriou starting laughing.

"Something like that.  Ever hear of Keystone Securities?"


T + 3 days

"We need an OTV.  OK, we don't absolutely need one, but trying to
assemble the cargo modules into a chain with the 747..." Burns let
his voice trail off.  Andrea nodded in assent.

"OK, so you need to EVA to get an OTV?"

"Right.  We've got engines, a lot of them, actually, in cargo modules.
We need to open one of those modules, remove one of the engines, and
attach it to the rear of a fuel module.  All of the modules have
maneuvering jets powered by nitrogen gas, which is a by-product of the
ten-thirty-three fuel cell reaction, along with oxygen and carbon.
But to really push things around in orbit, we need an rocket engine."

So, the first week in orbit consisted almost entirely of orbital
operations, as Burns docked with one cargo module after another,
slowing refueling the 747 from the 30,000 L capacity of each module.
Along the way, he also assembled the cargo modules in a long chain
attached to the docking ring on the nose of the 747, which became
like a tugboat pushing a cargo barge around Earth orbit.

The _Icarus_ began her third full day in orbit amid a jumble of cargo
modules.  More were stacked up in a parking orbit 50 to 200 kilometers
behind the craft, and yet more sat in low Earth orbit, their computers
awaiting radio instructions to boost them into higher orbits.  The
docking procedures were going slowly.  This wasn't entirely
unexpected, but it wasn't exactly welcome, either.  Among other
things, it left the craft vulnerable to meteor strikes, and
there was a lot of debris floating around in low earth orbit.

Andrea Yeats was studying the _Icarus_ with the fervor of an ardent
disciple finally admitted to the priest's high holy sanctum.  Alone
among the crew, she didn't have any assigned duties, and today had
squirreled herself away into the ship's electronics lab, a cargo
module filled with boxed equipment that had been docked the day before
and then left alone.  The boxes she left untouched; her interest was
fixated on a tablet computer connected via the ship's wireless local
network.  After skimming through the thousands of documents related to
the ship's design, all the result of Burns' prodigious mind, she then
found her way into the ship's library.

It was extensive, numbering well over ten thousand books, completely
electronic, and totally illegal.  Every major publisher of technical
books in the English language had been targeted by Burns' super-hack,
and the few books of which Alister couldn't spirit off electronic
copies from the publishers' computers were purchased and shipped to
Site Y, where their bindings were sawed off, the pages were
systematically scanned, and the resulting digital images transmitted
back electronically.  Without lauching more than a few pounds of
books, most of these for nostalgic value, such as Burns' 1956 first
edition of Adrian Albert's _Fundamental_Concepts_of_Higher_Algebra_,
the _Icarus_ crew enjoyed easy access to major reference works on
every aspect of technology.  There was an entire book, for example,
simply titled _Uranium_, that described almost everything known about
the chemistry of that important element - it's dozens of compounds,
their properties, the reactions used to convert between them, and of
course its nuclear properties, despite the fact that _Icarus_ carried
only a small sample of uranium in its chemistry lab and Burns had no
intention of using a nuclear fuel source.  In fact, all the major
chemical elements were well represented, with entire books on silicon,
iron, and nearly a dozen on carbon and its various compounds.  The
ship's custom navigation software was littered with references that
hyperlinked directly into a book called _Celestrial_Mechanics._ There
were also books on antenna theory, orbital mechanics, and hydroponics,
plant diseases, plant pathology,
as well as Mercuriou's hand-picked collection of (foreign) ancient Greek and
Latin authors, both in translation and in the original tongues.

Almost as impressive was the software collection.  Every major
technical product was present, many including all their source code,
stolen from the manufacturer's computers by Burns and Alister.  The
scientific software was second to none.  In addition to _Gaussian_ and
programs like it, there were sophisticated packages to model and
simulate high-frequency microwave circuitry, the most advanced robotic
control software from Japan, including the factory blueprints and
source code to a complete automobile assembly plant, and the most
sophisticated mathematics systems, which turned the complex algebraic
and trigonometric manipulations of orbital mechanics into a
high-school exercise.  To say Andrea was impressed would be a vast
understatement.  The three-pound computer tablet in her hand offered
the same information that would fill a small, elite university
library.  The legal penalties for acquiring and possessing it added up
to more than eighty years of prison time.
to hundreds of years of prison time.

"We've got a pressure drop," Alister announced from the copilot's
seat, as an amber alert window popped up on the computer screen to his
right.  Burns and Mercuriou, both in the rear of the 747, propelled
themselves to the door of the cockpit.

"We're down to 97.4," Alister informed them, reading off the
atmospheric pressure in kilopascals.

"That's not much," Mercuriou observed.

"Yeah, but it should be a closed system," Burns answered.

"97.0," Alister stated.

"Should we go to Zed?" the captain inquired of his engineer.

"I think so."

"OK, everybody, we're going to Condition Zed," Mercuriou called into
the microphone clipped to his shirt.  In the cockpit, Alister selected
a command sequence on his computer as Burns pulled himself into the
pilot's seat.  A audible alarm began to sound throughout the ship, and
the hydraulic doors separating the different modules hissed shut.

"What's happening?" Dr. Yeats asked as she watched the door hizz shut
on the cargo module she was in.  She was at the far end of the module,
full of lab equipment, and didn't have time to reach the door before
it shut.

"Condition Zed, Dr. Yeats, we're closing the airtight doors," Mercuriou
answered through the com system.  "Vic, where are you?"

"I'm in sickbay, of course," the doctor answered, stopping his
inventory of the drug supply.

"Make sure you've got a spacesuit in there," the captain directed.
"Dr. Yeats, where are you?"

"Well, I'm in the D-4 module with the electronics equipment," she
answered.

"Right there," Burns pointed to one of the forward cargo modules on
the display screen.

"Do you have a spacesuit there?" the captain wondered aloud. Burns
shook his head no.

"I don't think so," she answered in a matter-of-fact tone of voice.
"There doesn't seem to be anything in here but oscilloscopes and
silicon wafers."

"I'm OK, I've got my suit here," Vic answered from the sickbay module.

Meanwhile, the news networks on Earth began to realize that
something was happening on the spacecraft.  They began cutting
into their programming with "Breaking News" alerts.

"We're down to 90 in C-4," Alister declared from his computer
terminal.  "Looks like the rest are holding."

"C-4 is right here," Burns informed the captain, indicating a cargo
module directly adjacent to the one Andrea Yeats was in.  "Probably a
meteor strike.  We're not fully assembled yet, so right now C-4 is in
front."

The plan for the spaceship was to put the unpressurized storage
modules in the front, where damage would be minimal from a meteor
strike, but the assembly was only partially complete, and the
pressurized C-4 module, slated for a chemistry lab, was currently in
front - directly in the path of incoming meteors.

"We probably want to get her out of there," the captain said in an
undertone, refering to Yeats' exposed position.

"Yep," Burns agreed, "she's probably OK, but she doesn't have a
spacesuit, and the only way out is through node 4.  We're assuming
that it's a meteor strike, too.  If not, if it's a pressure seal
problem and we lose node 4, then she'll be cut off."

"OK," the captain concurred, keying his microphone, "Dr. Yeats, why
don't you exit the module you're in and come back here to where we've
at least got a spacesuit for you, then we'll check on the problem in
C-4."

"I can open the pressure door from here," Burns added, "or you can
use the control panel in the node to do it."

The NASA engineer drifted to the pressure door and examined its
touchscreen controls.  Sure enough, there was a menu option for the
door.  Although she had seen it before, she had never had reason to
use it.  Meanwhile, Burns selected a control sequence in the bridge
and the door opened automatically.  Andrea pulled herself through it
and into node 4, a small spherical space with about as much interior
space as a small automobile.  Burns opened the door to A-4, which lead
back towards the main part of the ship.

But Andrea didn't go there.  Instead, she went to the door leading
into C-4, and was about to ask what it's pressure was, when she saw it
displayed on the control in the node.  87 kilopascals.  She knew as a
rough rule of thumb that supplemental oxygen wasn't needed until the
pressure dropped to 70 kilopascals.  She keyed the sequence on the
panel that opened the door.  Designed to seal its pressurized contents
against an exterior vacuum, it popped open under the force of the
higher pressure outside, accompanied by a whoosh of air flowing into
the damaged node.  Andrea's sinuses popped under the pressure change.

"I'm going to take a look at the problem in here," Andrea informed
the others as she pushed herself into the node.

On the bridge, the door changed colors on the computer animation of
the ship's layout.

"She just opened the door to C-4!" Alister declared in surprise.

Mercuriou flushed red, clenched his teeth, and smacked his fist
into his palm before finally verbalizing his frustration.

"Dr. Yeats, _as_usual_, _EXACTLY_ where we don't want her to be!"

"That node appears to be damaged, it's loosing pressure, Doctor!"
Burns told the NASA engineer through the intercom.

In C-4, Andrea could hear a quiet whoshing of air.  The node was
definately loosing pressure, but not very fast.

"First of all," she informed Burns as she passed into the center of
the node, "no matter how much reserve oxygen you've got now, this is
the beginning of the mission, so trust me, it's not enough.  And
second," she continued, removing her water bottle from her belt, "it's
a lot easier to find the problem with air in here then with a vacuum."
Carefully, she squeezed the water bottle and released a drop of nearly
stationary fluid into the air, then watched to see where it went.

"She's got some good points, there," Burns mussed aloud on the bridge,
"but I don't like the fact that she doesn't have a spacesuit."  Behind
him, Mercuriou was hardly paying attention as he connected together
the pants and body of his spacesuit, which he rapidly put on.

"Aren't you going to prep?" Alister asked, watching him from the
cockpit.

"I don't have time!" he exclaimed, exasperated.  "What if she gets
stuck in there?"

He shoved the spacesuit's gloves into his helment, then holding them
both with one hand, shoved off with the other towards the airlock,
curtly telling Burns to open it up.

"Opening bridge airlock," Burns stated in a resigned tone of voice as
he keyed the control sequence on the computer panel to his left.

Meanwhile, on Earth, all of the major television networks had by now
interrupted their coverage and were carrying live the video feed from
the spaceship.  On one network, a former astronaut, who now took a
"consulting fee" of two thousand dollars per appearance, speculated
that the situation was developing quickly and could become potentially
serious, with the NASA astronaut trapped and unconscious in the
depressurizing module.  Another network contented itself with a
"science correspondent" holding up an (incorrect) model of the
spaceship and trying to explain where the astronauts were and what was
occuring.  In Washington, the President halted a cabinet meeting to
watch the unfolding events in space.

Meanwhile, Andrea released the harnesses on several large packing
crates and moved them aside to follow the trail of the water droplets.
A wave of fear swept over her.  _You_have_no_spacesuit._ Calming
herself, she said a silent prayer, _Father,_watch_out_for_me_in_here._

"Alister, keep reading the pressure off to me," she told the assistant
engineer.

"It's at 82 now," he answered from the bridge.  "It came back up for a
second when you opened the door to C-4, but now it's dropping again."

"Opening B-2," Burns dryly noted as he continued to open pressure
doors in front of the captain, now moving down the central chain of
cargo modules.  Mercuriou bumped against several walls as he went, and
pushed off roughly from them, partly because he hadn't fully learned
how to maneuver in zero-gee, but more because his irate mood grew even
more heated the further along he went.

"Opening A-3."

"What are we at Condition Zed for if we're opening all of these
doors?"  Alister asked him.  Burns shrugged in response, contenting
himself with silently closing the doors behind the captain after the
video monitors showed that he had passed.

Meanwhile, Andrea was thinking.  The hole was almost certainly caused
by a micro-meteor strike, and that meant it was almost certainly on
the side of the module facing forward.

Meanwhile, Andrea had found the pinhole leak at the root of the
problem.  Unlike the space shuttle, designed for manned spaceflight
operations from the beginning, the cargo modules were just large
pressure tanks with cargo containers secured to their side.  At times
this meant an inconvenient jumble of conduit that could have been
better designed, but in this case it meant easy access to the
punctured wall of the module.  She began looking around for
something to plug the hole with.

Just then, Merceriou opened the door and propelled himself into the
module, still holding his helmet and gloves in one hand.

"Doctor Yeats, we've got to get a few things clear right now,"
he began.

"Excuse me... sir," she interrupted as she reached for his helmet and
pulled one of his gloves out of it.  Turning back to the puncture
hole, she slapped the glove against it.

"That'll hold until we can patch it permanently," she announced,
then crossed her arms over her chest.
then put her hands on her hips.
then put her left hand on her hip
while still holding a wall strip with her right.

"Now you wanted to get some things clear?" she asked.

Red-faced, Merceriou stared at her for several seconds, then taking
his helmet and one remaining glove, left the cargo module and headed
back to the bridge without saying another word.


T + 4 days

Despite the work going on in orbit, Mercurio always found time for the
"ground sqwalk", as he called the Earth-based media pundits,
and at that moment the stunning private space launch was all
the rage.  As soon as Burns had established a network connection from
the ship to the global Internet and announced a network address to the
public, Mercuriou was deluged with email requests for interviews,
product endorcements, technical specifications, and a growing quantity
of both fan mail and hate mail.  Most of it he ignored; he certainly
didn't have the time to read it all.  His next major appearance was on
a prime-time national news program.

"Captain, by all accounts you have stolen hundreds of millions of
dollars, and many people think you could have gotten away with at
least another hundred million undetected.  Why not just take the money
and retire on a beach in Aruba?  Why fly into space?"

"Well, that's a good question.  I guess, basically, I'm 38 years old
and not ready to lounge on a beach just yet.  Spaceflight has always
facinated me, and I want to do something with my life, not just sit
around and enjoy a big pile of cash."

"Couldn't you have raised money for your flight just by being honest
with people about what you were attempting, have say, hey, we're
flying to space, finance us?"

"No, I don't think so.  Look at the X Prize.  They're trying to raise
ten million dollars to reward a private manned spaceflight and have
struggled every step of the way.  Ten million is nothing; you'd be
lucky to get one man into orbit for ten million, heck, you'd be lucky
to put an unmanned satellite into orbit for ten million.  The only
manned space programs are funded by national governments with huge
bankrolls.  Other than that, you've got these commercial satellite
launches backed by large corporations with some kind of scheme to make
the money back, and plenty of those schemes fail."

"Let's face it - in a capitalist society the only way to get anything
done is to have some kind of money-making scheme, some kind of
'business plan', they call it, and we've got no business plan of any
kind for how you can recoup a billion dollars from this flight or any
other.  So the only way to do it was to either wait for the
government, or be independantly wealthy, or steal it.  I want nothing
to do with the government, we're not independantly wealthy, so we
stole it."

"Well, it's interesting that you mention the government space
programs, because I think there was a general belief that you needed a
big government program to accomplish manned spaceflight.  What are
your thoughts on that?"

"Well, if some big government agency had built the first airplane,
everyone would be walking around laughing at the notion that two men
in a bicycle shop could do it.  Building a spacecraft _is_ harder than
building an airplane, but it can be done, and it doesn't require a
couple thousand people to pull it off.  It should be more of a
surprise, at least it is to me, with all the popular culture
surrounding spaceflight, it hasn't been done until now.  Really, it
shows that despite all the hype about freedom, how little opportunity
we really have to pursue our dreams.  It _can_ be done, but we
live in a society hell-bent on forcing people to work, and
telling them constantly that they have freedom."

"So you don't think there is freedom in this society?"

"Why don't you ask all those people you're interviewing?  Ask them if
they'd rather be flying into space or doing whatever mindless job
they've got now, and see what they say?  And be sure to point out to
them that our great capitalist leaders could be mass producing
spacecraft by the thousands if they so desired."

"What do you have to say to the investors in Keystone Securities?
I'm sure many of them are listening."

"Well, we didn't steal from Mother Teresa.  These 'investors' were
people with money to burn, dumping cash into a high-risk mutual fund,
and I'll bet they won't lift a finger for anybody unless they're
getting something out of it for themselves."

"So you don't have a problem stealing from capitalists?"

"Why should I?  They're some of the most selfish people in the world,
hell, their whole philosophy is based on greed.  I mean, let's just
apply their own rational.  I'm 'helping them compete'."  Mercuriou's
voice now took on a strong tinge of sarcasm.

"If some of them go out of business, so what?  Businesses fail every
day.  I'm developing technology to fly to Mars, so the whole society
benefits.  We rip and claw at each other throats, and that drives
civilization forward.  This is the capitalist philosophy, isn't it?"

"Well, just to play the devil's advocate, I think a lot of people would
say that we play according to rules, and that you've broken those
rules."

"Yeah, and who makes the rules?"

"Well, the rules are made collectively, through a democratic process."

The captain paused a moment before answering.

"You make it sound like everyone agrees on these rules.  If that's the
case, then why do people blow up federal buildings, why do people bomb
our embassies, who do people burn this country's flag?  Obviously,
there's a lot of people who don't agree with these rules, and frankly,
I'm one of them.  The majority makes up all these rules, and then
expects everyone else to obey them just because they're make 'through
a democractic process'."

"I think many people would say that even if we don't necessarily agree
with all the rules, we obey them and work to change them
democratically."

Mercuriou chuckled.

"Sure, that's why everyone drives the speed limit, because they're so
committed to obeying the rules.  Look, I don't buy any of that.
People obey the rules because they're afraid of what will happen to
them if don't."

"Well, that might be true in a dictatorship, but in a democracy?"

"How's it different?  It's just that the majority makes up the rules
and forces the minorities to obey instead of the other way around.
They only thing that's different about democracy is that it's a
different group of people making the rules.  In Russia it was the
proletariat, in Germany it was the Arian race, here it's the majority.
It's always the same.  Some big bunch of millions and millions of
people that think that because they're more advanced, or because
they've been oppressed, or because there's more of them than anybody
else, that they have the right to rule everybody else's lives."

"So do you see America as similar to the Soviet Union?"

"Very much so.  It's the same kind of trash that runs it."

"Meaning... the capitalists?"

"Sure.  The communist philosophy was based on brutal, cut-throat class
competition; the fascist philosophy was based on brutal, cut-throat
racial competition; the capitalist philosophy is based on brutal,
cut-throat individual competition.  It's basically the same thing,
slightly editted for a new generation, but with the same kind of
garbage in charge of society.  And I feel as bad about ripping off the
capitalists as I would about ripping off communists or fascists,
because to me they're all basically the same.  Just another bunch of
men with some nightmare system based on the viscious traits of mankind
to be jammed down everyone's throats."

With the exception of Burns, who had his head buried in front of a
computer screen, the rest of the crew watched the interview from
behind the TV camera.  After it was concluded, Yeats took Mercuriou
aside.

"You know, before this is all over, I might jump in there and say a
few things myself."

"By all means, Dr. Yeats, be my guest!"  Mercuriou exclaimed with a
flourish.  "Jump in anytime you please!"



T + 5 days

Mercuriou's next TV appearance was on a political talk show that
usually featured a panel discussion.  This evening the only other
guest was Richard Ecks, a prominent congressman, who had heard his
earlier interview and was determined to rebut him.

"The fact is that capitalism has produced a society with the highest
standard of living that has ever been seen on this planet," he was
saying.  "People are well-fed, well-housed, generally content with
their jobs, with a surplus of leisure time and disposible income.  And
yet these psuedo-socialists insist on slamming capitalism at every
turn because they can't stand the idea of people working hard and
getting rewarded for that hard work.  And now this man comes along,
this criminal, who has taken advantage of our society, stolen from our
businesses, lied, cheated; he comes on this program with the nerve to
blame capitalism for what?  For letting him take advantage of it?  For
giving him the opportunity to pull of one of the greatest con jobs in
history?"

Mercurio retorted without waiting for the host to invite him.

"That's quite a nice speech.  The communists also had their speeches.
They loved to go off about how they had put the first man in space,
and how they had brought tractors and steel factories to this
backwards, feudal country, and how everyone was guaranteed an
education, and health care, and retirement, and how wonderful
communism was.  And the fascists loved to talk about their Zeppelin
airships, and their autobahns, and how they had pulled Germany out of
a worldwide recession, and how they were rebuilding their Reich and
how wonderful fascism was.  And it's all true, but at some point you
step back and see some kind of objective truth.  Every one of these
great societies was run by a bunch of garbage leaders with some
screwball system based on the most viscious traits of mankind, and
captialism is no exception.  Its leaders are about the most selfish
sons of bitches you'd ever want to meet in your life, and the simple
truth is that you either work for these bastards or you starve.  So if
you want want Zeppelins, or Sputniks, or Microsoft Windows, and these
material things are more important to you than your freedom, then
should pick whichever one of these brutal philosophies most appeal to
you and go sign up."

"Capitalism may not be perfect," the legislator fired back, "and this
society may not be perfect, but what sets us apart from communism and
fascism is our commitment to democracy and freedom.  Those countries
were dictatorships.  This country is run by its people, through their
elected representatives, and the capitalists don't simply 'own' the
government, and they don't always get their way."

"You make it sound like a utopia!  Why do you have the second-largest
per capita incarceration rate on this planet, if everyone
thinks it's so wonderful?"

"Well, there's always the criminal element who thinks they can
side-step everyone else, isn't there, 'Captain'?  The fact is that
capitalism works.  It certainly works for all the decent, hard-working
people who have the opportunity to better themselves instead of being
stuck in a rice paddy somewhere!"

"You mean it works for all the selfish creeps who are willing to claw
over everyone else to 'better themselves', or more precisely to have a
nice house, a couple nice cars, and take their vacation on Maui..."

"There's nothing wrong with having a nice house, Captain, so
long as you're honest in how you pay for it."

"OK, I'm going to give you a perfect example of how capitalism
'works', Congressman.  Fifteen years ago, I and a college friend of
mine developed a computer program to aid people in reading Greek
literature; I majored in classical languages.  This was before the
World Wide Web, but basically this was a rudimentary hypertext system.
You could load any Greek text into the program, and it would display
it on the screen.  If you came across a word you didn't understand,
you could click on it with the mouse, the program would look it up in
a Greek-English dictionary and display the entry at the bottom of the
screen.  It was a lot faster than flipping pages in a dictionary,
trust me, and a great learning tool.  I finished the last half of the
_Iliad_ using it, and it was like night and day compared to old way of
stopping at every other word and looking it up in a different book."

"We put a lot of work into it, Congressman; we made sure that it could
handle all the irregular verb forms; we developed several different
user interfaces, for Machintosh and Windows and UNIX.  We put a copy
up on the Internet.  We started telling a lot of people in the
classics community about it and started getting some really good
feedback.  We had plans to develop a Latin version, too.  Then came
along the publishers of the dictionary - the capitalists."

"See, we had just taken a Greek-English dictionary that we had on one
of the computers at the university and incorporated it into the
program.  When we put the program up on the network, we of course
included the dictionary, because the program was pretty useless
without it.  A lot of people thought our program was a great idea, but
the publishers of the dictionary didn't.  They sued us for copyright
infringement."

"Now the funny thing was, they were willing to cut a deal, of course.
If we took the program down off the network, changed it into a
for-profit product and paid them a royalty on every copy we sold, we
could use their dictionary!  But we couldn't use it just to let people
download the program for free.  I decided to fight.  I still believed
in the great free democracy back them.  I was naive enough to think
that without the money for a lawyer, I could represent myself in
court.  After a year-long legal battle that I lost, I ended up with a
court judgement against me for four hundred thousand dollars in
damages, and for what?  Because I worked hard, developed a useful
product, and was decent enough to want to see it available to everyone
who wanted a copy.  I'm still waiting for that house, by that way."

"Well, Captain, it sounds to me like you were guilty!"  the
congressman fired back.  "That sounds like a real noble cause, but the
bottom line is that you stole someone else's intellectual property and
published it without their permission.  You seem to have a problem
with authority."

"You're damn right I've got a problem with authority!  I've got a
problem with authority when the people in authority are just a bunch
of self-serving creeps!  Now why couldn't we have just put that
program up on the network?  What is so terrible about that?"

"Captain, again, the bottom line is that it wasn't your property.  The
publishers of that dictionary, whoever they are, could have chosen to
publish it for free, but it's their property and their choice.  I'm
sure they put as much work into as you did into your program, maybe
more, and they chose to sell it, and there's nothing wrong with that."

"There's a hell of a lot wrong with it.  People should be generous,
not selfish, especially the _leaders_ of society.  That program, that
dictionary, and all the other ones like it should be freely available
on our computer networks!"

Ecks laughed out loud.

"And, of course, who's going to pay for those dictionaries, Captain,
the government, right?  Who's going to make all those evil capitalists
put those dictionaries on the Internet, the government, right?  It's
the same old tired story of socialism all over again."

"Look, I'm no great politician, and I can't lay out some big complex
scheme for paying those dictionaries, and I'm no great philospher
either, but I can tell you that a bunch of men who want all this
information kept secret so they can make money on it are a bunch of
trash leaders of a trash society!"

"I know, everyone who wants to make money is trash, everyone who just
wants a better life for themselves and their children is trash,
Captain!"

"No, Congressman, but a bunch of men determined to outlaw twenty-first
century public libraries before they're ever been created _are_ trash,
sir, they are!  This society isn't going to be remembered for all this
so-called freedom, let me assure you.  It's going to remembered for
its secrecy.  All the design information for
the computers, all the source code, all the circuit diagrams, all the
manufacturing processes!  It's all kept secret by these capitalists
determined to keep the whole world dependent on them and their
nightmare system."

"My chief engineer once proposed a telephone system based totally on a
wireless network - all the phones interoperate over digital radio
links using a routing protocol to figure how you hop from phone to
phone to phone to get your call through.  This is the kind of
technology you want - technology that's decentralized, that doesn't
require a massive infrastructure, that's open and non-proprietary so
that anyone can build a telephone to interoperate with the system.
But the capitalists don't want this.  They want a telephone system
that's centralized and controlled, so that there's a switch on every
single phone line and if you don't pay your bill at the end of the
month, your service gets disconnected.  They want centralized,
controlled technology, because that's how you get money out of people.
If the phones just work on some open protocol, if you can't switch the
service off from some centralized location, then you can't make money
off of it, so that means you go nowhere in this society - no
engineers, no circuit boards, no manufacturing plants.  Capitalism is
totally rigged against exactly the kind of technological change this
planet so desperately needs."

"They talk about 'freedom', 'freedom', and the only freedom they're
really interested in is their own!  It's not about making money, it's
about how you treat people, and the capitalists treat people like
dirt!"

"They don't treat..." the Congressman started, but never finished,
as he was interrupted by the now incensed space captain.

"Shut up, you capitalist son-of-a-bitch, shut up!  You no good
bastard, you sit there with your jacket and tie on and try to defend a
bunch of bums that won't lift a finger for anyone unless they're
getting something out of it for themselves!  What is so terrible about
public libraries?  What is so terrible about information being free?
What is so terrible about taking these books and putting them up on
our networks for anyone to read and use?  You crow on about rewarding
people for their hard work!  Why doesn't everyone get rewarded for
their hard work?  Why do only the most selfish people get rewarded?"

"Who the hell are you to tell someone else what they can and can't do
with their property?!?!" Ecks fired back, now furious himself.  "How
dare you, how dare you, you socialist crook, you shameless thief, how
dare you tell someone who's sweated tears and blood that they have to
give everything away for free?!  How dare you?!!?"

A moment of silence fell on the program before Mercuriou answered
in a calmer voice.

"I'll dare right now, I'll dare to tell you that we could build a
twenty-first century library of Alexandria, that we could take every
book in every library on this planet, scan it, and put it up on that
network, but that's not what our leaders want.  They want an
"information economy", where knowledge is just one more commodity to
bought and sold, and the only way people will pay for it is if it's
kept secret.  That's the sick truth about your 'global capitalist
economic system'.  That's what you get when you have a democracy!"



T + 6 days

"Simply put, in this country we have freedom.  If we have capitalism,
it's because the people choose it."  The speaker was David Wye, a
U.S. senator.  Mercuriou was once again in a televised debate.

"The people!" Mercuriou sneered.  "Which people, Senator, surely not
all the people!"

"Yes, _all_ the people!"

"Well what about all the people in jails?  Do they choose their own
leaders?  Or the people who want to copy music around the Internet?
How about drug users?  Is that why we have a War on Drugs, because
they choose their own leaders, too?"

"We have a participatory democracy, Captain!  Those people can
petition their government to change those laws, and if enough
people support them, the laws _will_ change!"

"But that's not what you said!  You didn't say the people could
_participate_ in their government!  You said the people could
_choose_their_own_leaders_!  Hell, I'll take 'participatory
government' any day!  You participate, and I'll make all the
decisions!  What do you say?"

"OK, sir, we have a Constitution..."

"So did the Russians; so did the Russians," Mercurio glibbly noted.

"Our Constitution is enforced!  Our Constitution restrains the power
of our government..."

"Really?  Let's take a look."

"Oh, please..."

"No, let's take a look!  You've made this absurd claim that our government
is restrained by its Constitution; let's get the thing out and take a look
at it!"

"OK, fine!" Wye interjected, determined not to be shown up.  "Let's
get a copy of the Constitution and look at it!"

Mercurio was already ahead of him.  He had grabbed his laptop,
pulled up a copy of the American Constitution, and prepared to start
reading from it.

"Let's start with the powers of Congress.  Now, congressman, stop me
if at any point you hear anything about regulating the use of drugs,
or radio communications, or agriculture, or the environment."

Mercuriou began to read.

"Article one, section eight.  The Congress shall have Power to lay and
collect taxes, duties, imposts and excises, to pay the debts and
provide for the common Defence and general Welfare... to borrow Money
on the credit of the United States, to regulate Commerce with foreign
Nations and among the several states, to establish a uniform rule of
Naturalization..."

Wye soon interrupted.

"All right, all right, first of all, many of these problems didn't exist
two hundred years ago, there was no drug abuse, no radio, the environment
wasn't an issue..."

"So we should just ignore our Constitution whenever some new problem
comes up; it only applies to our old problems?"

"You want to go through the Constitution section by section?  How
about Ammendment One, Freedom of Speech; Ammendment Two, the Right to
Bear Arms; the guarantees of due process, the election procedures,
this is absurd!"

"Fine!  Let's keep going, now!  Don't forget the tenth
Ammendment, how's it read?"

Mercuriou quoted the document word-for-word from his laptop.

"The powers not delegated to the United States by the Constitution, nor
prohibited by it to the States, are reserved to the States respectively, or to
the people."  [italics]

"OK!  So here it is clearly stated that the federal government
_does_not_ have any of these additional powers!  _No_ power to regulate
communications, of radio or any other form!  _No_ power to regulate drug
use!  _No_ power to regulate firearms!"

Wye laughed, the forced laugh of a man caught somewhat off-guard by an
opponent better prepared than he.

"Look, there are sound legal arguments behind all of these laws..."

"So what, only a lawyer can understand the Constitution?"

"No, you don't need to be a lawyer to understand the Constitution,
but this notion that half the federal government is unconstitutional
is simply absurd!"

"It says it right here that the government _does_not_ have these
powers!
_The_powers_not_delegated_to_the_United_States_by_the_Constitution ...
_are_reserved_to_the_States_.  It says it right there - if the
Constitution doesn't expressly give a power to the federal government,
it doesn't have that power.  Now, what good's a law when you pick and
choose what parts of it you want to obey?  Fine, so you obey parts of
the Constitution, but what about the other parts?  This is like me
blowing down the highway at ninety miles an hour, and when the cop
pulls me over saying, 'oh, but officer, I came to a full and complete
stop at all the red lights'!"

"OK," the moderator interjected, trying to bring the discussion under
control.  "Senator, Captain Mercurio certainly isn't the first person
to accuse the Federal Government of circuventing the Constitution.  Is
there nothing to any of these claims?"

"No, and I'll tell you why," Wye replied.  "All these things the
anti-government people gripe about - gun control, the drug war, the
environmental laws, the FCC - all of them are supported by the
overwealming majority of the people of this country."

"I'll agree with that," the space captain replied, "but I'd still like
to see these additional powers codified in Constitutional Ammendments,
and I'll tell you why.  One of the big accusations people made against
Soviet Russia was that their government didn't obey their
Constitution, that it was tiny little bunch of communists who had
taken over the government, that it wasn't really what people wanted,
that if they had only had 'freedom' everything would have been so
different.  Now, I don't want anybody being able to come around a
hundred years from now and try to say that the U.S. wasn't really a
democracy, that the people didn't really want these things, that some
bunch of politicians took over the government, that if only the
Constitution had been enforced, then everything would have been so
different.  This government, this majority, talks so much about law
and order, is so determined to make all these rules for everyone else
to obey, I'd just like to see them have to obey the rules that were
laid down for them.  It's a bit of a side issue, but I'd really like a
precedent established that the powers of the government are limited by
the Constitution."

"The government is limited by its Constitution.  That's one of the
fundamental principles of American government."

"How can you sit there and say that!  How can you read the Bill of
Rights, read the Ninth and Tenth Ammendments, then sit there and say
that!  I can't even call it a lie!  It just flys in the face of the
English language!"

"Again, Captain, it comes back to self-government.  The bottom line is
that this is what the majority of the people want!  And what they want
is freedom!"

"The majority!"  Mercuriou spit the word out in disgust.  "That _is_
what it all comes down to!  The majority isn't restricted by their
constitution, constitutions are only for communist dictatorships!  And
then you talk about 'freedom'!  Senator, turn on the T.V!  Don't you
see the police slamming people to the ground and dragging them off in
handcuffs!"

"Criminals!  People who break our laws!"

Mercuriou would have lept out of his chair, but of course, he
had no chair.  He was floating free in the cabin of the 747,
so had to be content with a bizarre gestation of his arms
before firing back his retort.

"Senator, _I'm_one_of_those_criminals_!  Because I smoke marijuana!
Because I copy computer software from 'C' drive to 'D' drive!  Because
I don't concede to this God-damned, filthy, cursed democracy that it
can control every aspect of my life, no matter how private, that it
can literally tell me what I can and can't put into my own body!  And
then you sit there are talk about 'freedom', you bastard politician!
What freedom?  The freedom to regulate every aspect of people's
lives?  The freedom to bust into people's homes with guns because
a hundred million people support you?"

"We do have freedom in this country!" Wye practically screamed back at
the camera in retort.  "We have freedom of speech, freedom of the
press, free elections!"

"The issue isn't how much freedom this 'majority' has got.  It's what
they've chosen to do with it!  They've chosen to build a society based
on some of the most vicious traits of mankind; they've chosen the most
selfish bastards as their leaders; they've chosen to arm themselves to
the teeth, build some nightmare society, declare war against millions
of their own people because they won't just do what their told when
the great free democracy barks out its orders, and then jam it down
their throats at gunpoint!"

"Excuse me," came a female voice from just outside camera range, and
Andrea Yeats propelled herself into view.

"Excuse me, but I really don't think the issue is freedom.  The issue
is morality.  Freedom has to be used morally, and I think these
objections come down to morality, even though very few people like to
use that word.  Freedom is not an absolute good.  It can abused, and
the crux of the issue is that the majority of people have freedom, but
have abused it and used it immorally."

"Well, who's going to define this morality, Doctor Yeats," came the
sarcastic response from Earth.  "Who's going to tell people what they
can and can't do with their freedom?"

"Morality is a function of religion, Senator.  As a Christian, I look
to the gospel of Christ to define morality."

"Well, that's fine for you, Doctor, but we've got freedom of religion
in this country!'

"Freedom of religion is fine up to a point, but somewhat unrealistic..."

"It's not unrealistic, Doctor Yeats, we've got it!  What you advocate
is something we abandoned centuries ago, that there should be some
prefered state religion!"

"Well, you've got to have a prefered religion..."

"_Got_to_have_a_prefered_religion!"  Interrupting, Wye echoed her words
with a sneer.  "Doctor Yeats, I hate to break this to you, but you're
about two hundred years behind the times!  Ever heard of the Salem
Witch Trials?"

The NASA engineer turned red and practically ripped the microphone off
her shirt before pushing away from the bulkhead behind her and fleeing
from the TV cameras without saying another word.  Mercuriou jumped
into the gap.

"OK, now you're back to picking on someone your own size!"

The televised confrontation ragged on another fifteen minutes, with
Senator Wye repeatedly asserting that the United States had freedom
because the majority of people supported the government, and Mercuriou
repeatedly charging that all the majority wanted to do with their
freedom was use it to oppress others.  Later, the captain found Andrea
Yeats back in C-3, working on a computerized radar system Burns
planned to install on the front of the spacecraft.

"So what where you talking about there?  You've got to have a hide of
steel to debate those bastards; it's a blood sport.  They're not
trying to have some intellectual debate; they'll stoop to any low to
get their sound bite and 'win'."

Yeats brushed back the long blond hair that was starting to
drift in front of her face.

"What I was trying to say was that you just can't have a human society
without some kind of shared standard of morality, and that's one of
the main functions of religion.  I mean, how can you judge right or
wrong?  You invariably end up with some kind of preferred religion;
complete freedom of religion is totally unrealistic.  Why can't
someone say that his religion allows human sacrifice, for example?
Where's your freedom of religion then?"

"I'll tell you what their prefered religion is - it's democracy!"
Mercuriou responded.  "The murderer can't make his human sacrifice
because the majority won't allow it!  I can't smoke pot because
the majority has decided to outlaw it!  Our ship's library
is illegal because that's what the majority has decided to call it!
Right and wrong are subject to a vote, now, Andrea."

"Well, we both know right and wrong are not subject to a vote.  I
think half of what religion is, heck, maybe 90% of what religion is is
giving us standards to judge right and wrong.  Murder isn't wrong
because it's illegal, it's wrong because it's immoral, and you can't
decide what's moral and immoral without religion.  So that's why I
think freedom of religion, or more precisely seperation of religion
from public life, is a chimera.  You can have freedom to go to
whatever church you want, but you can't have a society without some
kind of shared norm of morality, and that means a shared, what I
called a preferred, religion."

Mercuriou was silent as he thought about this for a minute.

"You know, you've got a good point there, Doctor - morality!  Maybe
it's something I don't talk enough about.  These people crow on to no
end about 'freedom', but they don't want to talk about morality!"



T + 7 days

"The issue is morality!"

Perhaps because of his attitude, or perhaps because of his altitude,
perhaps because of the media attention heaped on him, perhaps because
of his position in orbit, completely beyond the reach of any
terrestrial authority, or perhaps simply because of what he said,
Mercuriou seemed to incite the ire of nearly every American political
leaders, regardless of party affiliation or personal background.  At
any rate, haven taken the conversation with Yeats to heart, he was
back on television, facing off against Jeff Zee, one of the country's
most prominent politicians, a state governor widely expected to run
for president in the upcoming national election.

"I agree completely, Captain, the issue is morality!  You are a criminal
and a thief!"

"That's not the issue..."

"Well, let's make it the issue, shall we?  All this stuff you trumpet
sounds great, but talk about the pot calling the kettle black!  How
are you so much better than all these terrible capitalists you
lamblast?  You're the worst kind of capitalist - you've stolen
millions of dollars to stroke your own pet project!"

Mercuriou paused and took a deep breath.

"I can tell the difference between right and wrong..."

"You can?!  OK, captain, try this on for size - is betraying the trust
of your colleages to implant some computer virus in their network
right or wrong?"

"Well..."

"How about cheating a state lottery system to the tune of a couple
million dollars - right or wrong?"

"Look, I needed a lot of money to put this launch together..."

"That's right!  You needed money, captain - that's why most people go
to work in the morning!  That's why all these evil capitalists don't
just publish all their books on the Internet - because the authors
need money to write them, money to print them, money to put food in
front of their children!"

"Because of capitalism!  Because of democracy!  Because the entire
society is based on forced labor!  You work or you starve!"

"Or steal a billion dollars and bankrupt a dozen companies along the
way, ehh?"

Mercuriou stammered.  For the first time since the launch had
propelled him not only into orbit but also onto the front page of
every news magazine on the planet, he appeared flustered in front of
the T.V. camera.  Zee kept going.

"Captain, capitalism and democracy may not be perfect, but if you
don't work, you will not starve, because just about every American
city has a soup kitchen or homeless shelter of one kind of another.
On the other hand, those who do work can expect to be paid for their
labor, and it is entirely up to them what they do with it.  The
abundance of charities in this country is an elegant testimony to the
generosity of the American people."

"Sounds great.  Sound like everywhere you go in the U.S, you must see
charity after charity after charity, and occasionally a business."

"There's nothing wrong with running a business, captain.  Where do you
think all that money comes from for the charities?"

"OK, governor, well if those businesses are so generous, why bother
with the price tags?"

"Well, it comes down to a simple principle, captain - morality!  It
would be immoral for the businessman to dictate to his stockholders
how they should spend their money.  That would amount to little more
than theft.  Instead, the businessman collects revenue from his
customers, uses those revenues to pay the expenses of the business,
and then returns the surplus both to the employees in the form of
their paychecks and to the investors in the form of dividends.  It is
then up to the employees and investors how to spend _their_money_.  If
they wish to give to charities, they can do so.  Furthermore, the
businessman has a moral responsibility to operate his business
responsibly, because it _isn't_his_money_."

"Isn't his money?!"


		NEED A LITTLE MORE HERE


Mercuriou stumbled and again found himself fumbling for an answer.  He
felt certain that something was amiss in the persuasive arguments of
this suave politician, but couldn't quite figure what it was, and thus
found it impossible to respond.  Salvation came from an unexpected
source.

Salvation came from above, or at least from the airlock nearest
Mercuriou's head, since there is no 'up' or 'down' in space.

"OK, Governor, that's enough."  Andrea Yeats again entered the
camera's view.  "You talk a good game, and Captain Mercuriou is no
holy man, but the people of the United States haven't exactly
embrassed Christianity, either."


"OK, Zee, that's enough."  Andrea Yeats again pushed her way into the
camera's view.  "You've made your points.  Now you can answer his."

"Points?  He has no points.  He's a criminal."

"He's said a lot about capitalism, I think."

"He's said nothing.  The rantings of a thief trying to justify his
theft."

"And you've talked a lot about morality, but you haven't answered for
your own."

"Answer, to him, for morality?"

"Fine, then you can answer to me, because I've got no problem
discussing the real issue here - morality.  _Captain_ Mercuriou is
both right and wrong.  He is right that capitalism is _immoral_.  He
is also wrong in his own actions, which are also _immoral_.  It's a
classic case of two wrongs not making a right."

"Capitalism is not immoral!"  Zee had heard almost nothing else.

"Governor, capitalism is one of the most immoral philosophies that
have ever been proposed for men to live their lives.  _You_do_for_
_yourself_and_let_this_'invisible_hand'_take_care_of_'society'._ It's
depraved."

Zee took a deep breath himself and stared at the video monitor in the
studio, as if trying to peer into the soul of this unexpected new
provacator.

"Doctor Yeats, you've been listening to too much of your captor's
propaganda, I think.  Capitalism is not about doing for yourself.  If
people want to give to a charity, they are more than welcome to do so.
Capitalism is about freedom.  It's about giving people the freedom to
decide what to do with their own wealth."

"Govenor, if that's what you want to believe, fine.  But there are
plenty of people out there who stand behind those counters and won't
lift a finger for anyone unless they're getting something out of it
for themselves."

"Andrea, listen to me, not to Mercuriou.  Many capitalists are good,
decent people who have founded charities, started schools and
universities, established endowment funds such as the Carrnige
Foundation..."

"Carrnige built his empire too long ago for us to remember all the
backs he broke.  Take Mr. Gates, he's a better example, a big
philanthropher."

"Mr. Gates is an exceptional philantroper."

"If he was so generous, he would publish his source code.  It would be
the moral thing to do."

"And who, pray tell, dictates this morality?  Marcelius Mercuriou?"

"Well, God, or in this case, Jesus."

"Jesus?"

"That's right.  The source of morality is religion, and the source of
Christian morality is the Gospel.  Remember the story of the rich man
and the old woman?  The rich man went to the synagogue, gave a big
donation.  The old woman gave two bits.  Christ then asked which went
away redeemed.  Now think about this.  Did he then say, 'Look at how
much good can be done with all the rich man's money'?  'Look how many
people can be helped'?  'What can you do with two bits'?  'The old
woman might as well have not even gone'?  No.  He tells us the old
woman goes away redemed because she have _everything_ she's got!
She's told 'give to all those who beg of you' and does!  That's
_moral_ behavior!"

There was a pause in the broadcast.

"And, governor, I've had to suffer through Captain Mercuriou's tirades
just like you.  You know how many times he's used the word God?"

"I don't think he's used the word once."

"I don't think so, either, and I've been counting.  So if you want to
believe he's gone and put all these ideas in my head, be my guest."

Zee paused to inhale and contemplate the video image of the space
captain and the NASA engineer.

"You know, doctor, I've heard many conflicting stories about your
involvement with these people."

"You know, governor, there's a time-honored debate tactic called
attacking the messenger."

Zee laughed.  Andrea smiled.  Alister exclaimed, "Point for the
doctor!"  Mercuriou remained impassive.

"OK, Doctor Yeats, so what are you trying to say?  That Christian
morality is based on giving away all our worldly possessions?"

"No, but that's a common misconception, because Christian morality
often _does_ require us to give away all our worldly possessions.
After all, Christ say 'give to all those who beg of you'.
It's not _based_ on that, though.  It's based on love - unconditional
love, for not only God, but all of mankind as well.  Often that
involves generousity, but what's more important is how you treat other
people; generousity is just one of the most obvious manifestations of
that."

"Christ told us that if a man steals our cloak, we should give him our
coat as well.  Now, to put that in a modern context, if a man breaks
into your home, holds your entire family up at gunpoint and takes
everything of value that he sees, you give him the keys to the car and
offer to help carry the stereo out, because it's pretty heavy."

Zee stared at the screen.  "You can't be serious."

"I'm completely serious, sir, and so was Christ.  Of course, he also
told the thief some things he doesn't want to hear, either, like 'thou
shall not steal'."

Andrea had addressed the last sentence directly to Mercuriou, who said
nothing.

"So he told the thief not to steal and he told the rich man to give
his stereo to the thief, ehh?"

"That's right."

"A little self-contradictory, isn't it?"

"No.  It's two seperate instructions, for two different people, but it
comes down to the same commandment - love your neighbor.  The thief is
told not to steal, for love of the rich man, and the rich man is told
to give up his possessions, for love of the thief.  Of course, the
Christian isn't in either situation - he's not going to steal, and all
the thief needs to do is ask.  So if Mr. Gates lived this way, all
we'd have to do to get the source code for Windows would be to ask.
He could have been a Christian, instead he's decided to be a
philanthroper."

"Well, Andrea, the great thing about freedom is that Mr. Gates can be
a Christian if wanted to, he could give all his source code away if he
wanted to, it's up to him!"

"And does he want that?  Does he 'give to all who beg of him'"?

"Well that's his choice.  That's freedom."

"You're dogging the question, sir.  We've all seen his choice."

Zee didn't answer.  Andrea went on.

"The path to salvation is narrow, governor, and those who find it few.
The path to damnation is wide, and those who find it many.  Most
people sing their hymns on Sunday and then go work those jobs on
Monday because they need the money, live in a society where they can't
live without it, and have no intention of just giving it all away to
anyone who asks."

Mercuriou finally spoke.

"My point exactly."



T + 8 days

"The majority don't want good leaders."

"The majority don't want good leaders," the astronaut repeated,
floating weightless on the screens of 10 million people watching the
live program.  "They want garbage leaders.  They want the most selfish
bastards you'd ever want to meet, with this nightmare capitalist
system based on the most vicious traits of mankind to be jammed down
everyone's throats.  And this time, nobody can say it isn't really a
democracy, that one man took over the government, that the dissidents
were 'disappeared', that we don't have freedom of speech or freedom of
the press.  Nobody can claim that this isn't really what the majority
of people want."

"So you actually do think the majority of the American people support
their government?" the moderator asked.

"Yes, and that's really the problem - populist government - this
stupid idea that you can put the masses of people in charge of
society.  It was talked about by philophers in the eigthteenth
century, brought to power in Europe and the Americas by a string of
revolutions in the nineteenth, and brought to fuition in the twentieth
century.  What it produced was fascism, communism, and capitalism -
three of the most depraved societies that have every been seen on the
face of this planet.  Fascism, based on brutal, viscious, racial
competition; communism, based on brutal, viscious, class competition;
and capitalism, based on brutal, viscious individual competition.
Now, tell me, what do all of these things have in common... other than
the fact that millions upon millions upon millions of people went
chasing off after every one of them?"

Mercuriou went on without waiting for an answer.

"You want to understand communism, read the last page of the Communist
Manifesto, where Marx and Engles talk about letting the world tremble
in fear of a communist revolution.  _That_'s communism - stick AK-47s
in the hands of the peasants and let the world tremble in fear!
That's what _millions_ of people wanted - expropriate the expropriators
and let everyone tremble in fear!"

"And communism was one of the biggest populist movements of the
twentieth century!  Practically every country in existance had some
kind of communist insurgancy!  They took over half this planet!
Millions upon millions of people _believed_ in communism!  To claim
that the communists were some tiny bunch of dictators flies in the
face of history!  Take Vietnam - why were all those 15-year-olds
hauling AK-47s around the Mekong Delta if the communists were just
some tiny cliche holed up in the Kremlin?!  Take China - Mao Tse Sung,
the Long March, the defeat of Chang Kai Chech, heck, look at Russia
itself!  Then how did they win their Civil War in Russia?  The Whites
had all the old czarist military officers, they had foreign aid from
the United States and Great Britian, the Reds were isolated and on
their own, yet still they managed to win that war!  How did they did
that if nobody supported them?  If communism wasn't populist, then why
did forty percent of the Russian electorate vote for Zyuganov in 1996?
Forty percent!  And this is part of an ongoing trend that has seen the
Communist Party consistently drawing a third of the vote in Russia
elections!  Now what possible explanation is there for this except
that millions upon millions of Russians _to_this_day_ support
communism?!"

Mercuriou paused briefly before continuing in a calmer voice.

"The problem with communism wasn't their economic system, it wasn't
the structure of their elections, it wasn't their lack of
constituional guarentees.  The problem with communism was that their
leaders were a bunch of trash with some nightmare system to be jammed
down everyone's throats, and _millions_of_people_supported_them_!
They were a lot like the people who run democracy today!"

"The problem isn't Bill Gates.  The problem is John Doe.  Walk into
one of these stores anywhere in the Western world without a credit
card or a twenty dollar bill in hand.  Ask for a plate of food.  See
what you walk out with.  The fact is that the majority of people are
crude, selfish, and violent.  That's why communism came to power in
these backwards countries - if the people have nothing, tell them to
expropriate the exproriators at gunpoint - it sounds great!  Now in
the more developed nations, the majority have a lot more material
possessions, expropriating the expropriators doesn't sound nearly as
good, better to just build some brutal society where those who have
can keep it and don't lift a finger for anyone else.  The bottom line
is that the majority of people are selfish - both capitalism and
communism play to that, just on different sides of the coin."

"It was the same thing with fascism, after the Germans basically
elected the Nazis in 1932, with a plurality of over thirteen million
votes!  They got enough votes to make Hermann Goering president of the
Reischtag, enough votes to defeat Von Papen's government on a vote of
no-confidence, enough votes to create a situtation where Adolf Hitler
was basically the only viable choice for German chancellor.  Generally
speaking, that means they won the election!  You hear these apologists
for democracy try to blame Hindenburg for what happened, try to say
the German industrialists pushed him to appoint Hitler, or that his
son was whispering in his ear, what about the thirteen and a half
million people who voted Nazi in '32?!  Did they have anything to do
with Hinderburg's decision?  Thirteen and a half million!  There isn't
a city on this planet with thirteen and a half million people in it!
And this in a nation of only about eighty million total!  Yes, Hitler
proceeded to build a dictatorship, but a dictatorship with the support
of millions upon millions of people!  And don't try to say that the
Germans didn't knew what they were getting.  Read the first chapter,
the first page, of _Mein_Kampf_!  The part where Hitler talks about
'the moral right of armed conquest'!  That book was a best-seller in
Germany!  That's what those people voted for - 'the moral right of
armed conquest'!  People supported the Nazis for basically the same
reason people supported the communists and the same reason people
today support the capitalists - because they were brutal as hell, and
that's what works in the 'real world' and that's all these millions
and millions of people 'know'!  That's populist government!  That's
democracy!"

"It's another communism.  Another big pile of books and theories that
sound real good on paper, and in practice has produced some of the
most depraved societies that's every been seen on the face of this
planet.  Everybody runs around yelling about how 'the people' support
it!  Of course they support it - they're the majority!  Democracy
isn't about putting 'the people' in control, it's about putting
one group of people in control - the majority!  Now, why should
one group of people rule everyone else's lives just because there's
more of them than anybody else?  Why shouldn't the factory workers
run society - they're the ones who have to break their backs for
industrialization, right?  Why shouldn't we generically engineer
some 'super race' of men, and put them in control, huh?  I mean,
they'd be stronger, smarter, healthier, superior to us in every
way, so shouldn't they be the ones to rule?  Let's face it - communism
and fascism make at least as much sense as democracy does, which
is to say that they're all equally absurd!"

NEED TO BACK THIS UP MORE

"And then we've got the granddaddy of them all, at least as far as
European democracy is concerned - the French Revolution!  The great
French republic, who leaders preached liberty, fraternity, and
equality... and guillotines in the public squares of Paris to chop off
the heads of the noblemen!  Europe's first democracy - and every one
of those thugs was elected - Coulton, Saint Just, Robespierre, and of
course, finally, Napoleon.  And don't let anyone tell you that
Bonaparte wasn't elected, because he could have won any election he
ever stood for.  He came to power in a democracy and was one of the
most popular leaders in French history."

MORE ABOUT FRANCE ... 1848

"Meanwhile, while all this is going on in Europe, we've got the great
American 'experiment', based on all men possessing certain inaliable
rights... unless your skin was black, of course, because if capitalism
is the issue that has dominated the last hundred years of American
history, then, really, slavery was the issue that dominated the first
hundred years.  The civil war shook democracy to its core, oh, it
survived, but the most serious questions raised by slavery have never
really been answered.  If it took the bloodiest war in U.S. history to
end slavery, how much can this system of government really be worth?
And if it takes the same thing to end capitalism?  How many more
'successes' like the civil war can this country afford?"

AT THIS POINT, WE HAVE TO HAVE MADE THE CASE AGAINST CAPITALISM A SLAM-DUNK

MEXICO AND THE AMERICAN INDIANS


"Basically, the only legimitate form of government is democracy,
right?  Everything else is illegimiate, and if your government is
illegimiate, you basically have no rights, there is no international
law for you, so better buddy up with the U.S. or you might find the
SEALs airdropping on your international airport one morning."

"It's the same with all these populist governments. Communism was one
of the biggest mass populist movements of the twentieth centry.
How did it manage to take
over half this planet?

This is the sick truth about
populist government.  The masses of people are selfish and violent.
That's why they chose people like the communists and the fascists and
the capitalists to be their leaders!"



"This has been the broken record of democracy for the last two hundred
years.  It just keeps repeating the same lyrics - 'put the people in
control', 'put the people in control', 'put the people in control'!
All these people talk about these grandeose ideas of liberty and
freedom, and then choose absolute garbage for their leaders, and build
societies based on the basest and most vicious traits of mankind.
This time around it's the capitalists - the most selfish sons of
bitches you'd ever want to meet, and the majority support these bums
every step of the way.  And of course they can't spend enough money to
build the most lethal killing machines this planet has ever seen.
This is what the majority of people want - militant capitalists, about
the most selfish men you'd ever want to meet, and they're going to get
tough with anybody who won't follow all these laws.  Real good
leaders."

Mercurio stopped.  He had been lecturing the TV camera non-stop for
almost half an hour.  A tense silence fell over the television
program.  Across the country, millions of people in their homes
murmorred amongst themselves, at least those who were still watching.
"I don't want to hear any more of this."  "You tell 'em, Marc!"  "That
bastard deserves to die up there!"  "I hope the whole bunch die!"  "Is
this what people think about us?"

In New York, the broadcast was nearing it's end.  There would be
plenty more opportunities for debate.

"Captain, what are your plans?  How long can you stay in orbit?"

Mercurio rumaged in a storage bin and sent clothes flying all over the
compartment.  Finally, he pulled out the T-shirt he was looking for,
brushed away a pair of jeans that had drifted in front of the TV
camera and spread the black T-shirt out so it dominated the view field
of the camera.  It read: FUCK YOU, YOU FUCKING FUCKS.

"We're going to Mars!"



T + 16 days

"All the cargo modules are in place, we're still taking meteor hits
in the forward compartments, but they're the empty fuel tanks."

"The wings are still vulnerable," Andrea pointed out.  "The 'meteor
wake' of the cargo modules covers us here, and the body of the 747,
but it doesn't cover the wings."  Burns was nodding.  The Captain
listened, and said nothing.  The entire crew was silent for about
10 seconds.

"Can I say something?" Alister asked.

"Sure," Mercuriou answered, "that's what I'm waiting for, anybody to
talk.  Say whatever you want."

"Well," Alister said after clearing his through, "if we move out of
Low Earth Orbit, I mean, that's what we're taking about, right?"
There were nods around the cabin.  "That puts us out of range of the
space shuttle!?"  Alister voice trailed off at the end.  The last two
weeks had passed in a sureal blur.  He still found it fantastic that
he was actually flying in space, and now they actually wanted to move
beyond range of the _space_shuttle_?!

"That's a real good point, Alister," Andrea said gravely, then spoke
directly to Mercuriou.  "Look, you've made your point.  Now we've got
to test this craft.  Let's start looking at re-entry scenarios..."
The Captain was ephastically shaking his head, no, No, NO!

"We're going to Mars, Dr. Yeats, that's not going to change."

"Fine, you can go to Mars," Merceriou started to interrupt but Yeats
would not let him, "but first you've got to test this spacecraft in a
controlled environment where there are rescue options both in orbit
and on the ground."

Again there was silence, but a deeper, tenser one.

"She's got a good point, Marc," Burns concluded.

Merceriou guffawled.

"You going turn traitor on me now, Burns?" he asked with a snicker
in his voice.

Burns answered with a laugh in his.

"Hey, you're the boss, but I'm just saying what she says makes a lot
of sense!  I've told you from the beginning that we should have
three identical vehicles to try this."

"Burns, the minute, nay, the second those wheels touch the ground,
we're just five little nobodies at the mercy of the masses and their
governments."

"We could contact a neutral country," Andrea continued to argue,
calmly, clearly.  "Switzerland might let us land."

Again there was a silence of several seconds, but this time Mercuriou
broke it.

"Take us out of orbit."


T + 21 days

"Well, most human societies have been like this, but not all."

Despite all the attention heaped on the Merceriou and his wildly
anti-democratic views, there were other crew members on the spaceship,
and now Vic was taking his turn at the mic.  Senator Wye was the other
guest on the program.

"I think the American Indians were the best example of an alternative.
They raised their children to recognize wild edibles, to make fire by
rubbing sticks together, to build a bow and arrows from natural
materials that you'd find lying around a forest.  By the time they
were fifteen years old, they could literally walk out into the woods
and take care of themselves.  So you couldn't have a government, at
least not in form you know it.  Government is based on coersion.  How
can you coerce people who can just walk out into the woods if they get
ticked off?  This is why murder and other violent crimes were almost
unknown in these 'primitive' societies.  This is why the federal
government couldn't have been nearly so coercive two hundred years
ago.  Anyone who didn't like it could just pack up and move west."

"So we should give up our technology and go back to living like
Indians?" Wye asked sarcastically.

"It might not be a bad idea.  The human race is too primitive for
all this technology.  You'd probably be better off living in the
woods; happier, too."

"Funny, I don't see you living in the woods right now, Doctor."

Vic chuckled.  Wye didn't.  Neither did Captain Merceriou, watching
the broadcast with the rest of the crew from alongside the
camera, just outside its field of view.

"All things in moderation, congressman, all things in moderation.
What I'm trying to say is that industrialization had radically
transformed human society, and the shock waves are still being felt.
In the last hundred years, well, two or three hundred years in Europe,
but a hundred years in the U.S. and the rest of the civilized world,
we've gone from a primarily agraian society to a primarily industrial
one; we've gone from people living on farms to people living in
cities.  That means people are dependent on each other to an extent
never seen before, and that exasperates the problems of society.  The
fact is, most human societies are based on coersion, on greed, on the
domination of man over man, of the strong over the weak.  The more
industrialized society becomes, the more dependent people are on
society and each other, the more oppressive society becomes.  There's
just no way around this, unless a hundred million people are going to
wake up one day and suddenly decide to change their human nature, to
abandon greed for generosity, force for persuasion, and that's just
not going to happen."

"Well, I hate to break the news to you, but it has happened.  It's
called democracy.  Maybe you've been living in the woods too long to
have noticed that the entire operation of our government is based on
persuasion.  That's why every four years men contest to become
president, and the way they do that is through giving speechs, running
advertisements, talking to voters, and the whole point is to persuade,
Doctor, persuade, not force, people to vote for them."

Mercuriou could take no more.  He propelled himself into the camera's
field of view, bumping into Vic and sending him clutching for a
strap to neutralize his momentum.

"You sound like a fucking communist!" he snarled at the camera, while
in Washington the moderator winced as the broadcast profanity.

"Humanity_has_abandoned_greed_and_force_and_this_great_event_goes_by
the_name_of_democracy!" he continued in a sarcastic drawl.  "Well, if
your government is so based on persuation, then why do you have the
second highest per capita incarceration rate on the planet?  Only the
great _people's_government_ in Russia imprisons a larger percentage of
its citizens than the great _people's_government_ of America, and I'm
sure the _people's_government_ of China isn't far behind.  Why, every
time you turn on C.O.P.S, do you see the police chasing after
'criminals', half of whom have done nothing more than fire up a joint,
gang-tackling them, and dragging them off to jail?  Why are you
screaming for war on your own people and 'zero tolerance' for your own
children?  The only people that the democrats persuade are the
majority.  Everyone else is ruled through threat and fear.  The
majority act real nice and polite to each other, then as soon they
find out that you're a druggie, or a copyright violator, or just don't
want to work for their bastard leaders, they scream for blood and
elect all these men who talk about cracking down and getting tough,
and how wonderful a world it is where anybody can start a business and
ruthlessly try to compete in this brutual capitalist system.  The
majority are perfectly willing to resort to force; they do it
_every_single_day_."

The moderator cut in before Wye could get more than a word off.

"OK, captain, but we're interviewing Dr. Antonov now.  Doctor, what's
your opinion on democracy?"

Vic had now righted himself in the camera's view, and paused a moment,
thinking and licking his lips, before responding.  To the surprise of
many viewers, everyone else on the program waited, too.

"As I said, I think all government, all society, really, is coercive.
The larger and more inter-dependent a society is, the more coercive it
is.  I don't think the issue is so much democracy but
industrialization, and I don't think you can design a system of
government to fix a society that isolates people from nature, raises
them so they don't have a clue how to feed themselves without a
Safeway, teaches them all this science and mathematics, sends them
running around in cars and airplanes but neglects to teach them how to
live in harmony with nature, how to quiet their soul, how to look into
the depths of their being and find out who they really are, and what our
genuine vision of ourselves really is."

MAYBE A LITTLE MORE HERE?

"Want to take a crack at it?" Mercuriou asked Alister after the
broadcast was concluded, indicating the camera with an arm gesture.

The South African emphatically shook his head 'no'.  Burns, who had
gone right back to work on a computer console even before the
conclusion of the interview, never looked up.


T + 33 days

After her one ill-fated attempt to butt in, Andrea had let Mercuriou
have the debates to himself.  One thing was for sure, though, and that
was that the crew of the _Icarus_, loved or hated, had become media
darlings, and Yeats was one of the big 'gets' for a TV interview.
Rather than returning to Mercuriou's format, Andrea decided to accept
an offer for a one-on-one interview from a prominent female journalist
with a reputation for objectivity.

"Captain Mercurio says the problem is democracy, that it's another
communism.  Do you agree?"

The NASA engineer thought for a moment before answering.

"Not really.  The problem is human nature.  Democracy is just another
political system.  In some ways it's better than others, in some ways
worse.  Ultimately, the solutions to our problems are spiritual and
not political.  Unfortunately, democracy tends to accentuate a lot of
problems, because you can't just go blame it off on some dictator."

"How does democracy accentuate problems?"

"Well, the problems have always been there.  Democracy shows us that
the problems aren't caused because people don't have political
representation.  Now people do have political representation, and a
lot of the problems are still here.  So, just giving political power
to the masses of people doesn't magically solve your problems."

"Dr. Yeats, you mentioned a moment ago that democracy is better than
some political systems, worse than others, or something to that
effect.  If I'm not reading too much into your words, can you give us
an example of a superior political system?"

"Well, like I said, our problems are spiritual more than political,
and thus we need spiritual solutions more so than political ones.  Now
take a monarch like King Arthur or King Solomon; you can have a good
king, genuinely interested in caring for his people, so yes, a good,
generous, tolerant monarchy would be superior to a self-serving and
violent democracy."

"So, do you advocate monarchy as a system of government?"

"I don't advocate anything as a system of government.  I advocate
Christianity as a system for people to live their lives.  Monarchy is
like any other system of government, you might get a good king for a
while, but eventually you'll get a bad one, so it's no answer.  If you
go back to the Old Testament, the book of First Samuel, I think, you
find the people actually _demanding_ a king!  We have this idea today
that a king is somehow imposed on people against their will, but in
those days it was the commonly accepted form of government.  And
Samuel basically told those people that they didn't need a king, that
all they needed was to follow the will of God, but they didn't want to
hear it.  So they got their king, it was Saul, and Samuel told them
again that if they and their king followed the will of God, things
would work out well for them, but if they didn't, there would be
problems.  It's a lot the same today.  People don't need a king, and
they don't need a democracy.  They need to follow the will of God, but
of course you've got half of them screaming that militant capitalism
_is_ the will of God, so there you go."

"So, doctor, I'm, I'm not sure exactly what you mean when you say
that you advocate Christianity rather than any system of government.
For example, what do you say to Captain Mercurio's very vocal
criticisms of western society?"

The astronaut paused before responding.

"I think he makes a lot of good points, but this has been human
society since the dawn of time.  Take Saint Anthony of the Desert, for
example.  God appeared to him in a vision and told him to flee from
men, so he went to live in the desert, and founded the Christian
monastic tradition.  This was during the Roman Empire, when Christians
were thrown to the lions, so these problems have been around for a
while."

"Haven't we come a long ways from that?  We don't throw Christians to
the lions anymore."

"No, we don't, thank God, but it's still tough to live as Christians.
Generally, the people who rise to the top in human society do so
by abandoning Christian values, so living as a Christian generally
means that you're going to get a lot of doors slammed shut on you."

"Could you elaborate on that?  How do people not live as Christians?"

"Well, look around.  Christ gave us two great commandments, to love
God with all our hearts, and to love our neighbors as ourselves.  And
he elaborated on them, and lived them in his own life.  I think the
second commandment is more obvious than the first; we look around and
see how we don't love each other as Christ taught, that's more obvious
that how we fail God."

"Could you be more specific; I'm not trying to be dense, but
why don't you think a Christian can rise to the top in our society?"

"Well, consider what Christ said.  He taught us to give to all those
who beg from us; that if someone asked to borrow from us we should
give without expecting anything in return.  If you do that, if you
give to all, you often end up with nothing, at least nothing material."

"Capitan Mercuriou has talked about making books and dictionaries
freely available and has been accused of theft.  Do you support
intellectual property rights?"

"Well, I think it's somewhat of a mute issue.  Christ said that if a
man steals your coat, you should give him your cloak as well - you
love your enemies, and not just in an abstract sense, either, you
really try to do good for your enemies.  So if someone steals your
intellectual property, the Christian response is the same as to any
other theft - you make sure the thieves have got the latest and most
up-to-date versions of your books or software.  When you take that
kind of an attitude, I think you quickly reach a point where you just
say that you'll publish all this information anyway, I mean, why would
you give to a thief, but withhold from someone who just asks
politely?"

"So do you advocate a welfare system of some kind?"

"Well, no, not if I understand your question, because welfare to me
implies some kind of government operation.  Christ didn't tell us to
give our money to the government to run welfare, he didn't tell us to
give our money to the church so it could fund charities, he told us,
he spoke to us as individuals, he said _you_, give to all those who
beg of _you_.  So, if you see someone standing by the road begging,
you stop and give them a dollar or two, if you see someone asking for
a ride, you pull over and ask them where they're going, if you see
someone sleeping in a park, you say 'hey, I've got a spare room, you
can come stay with me', or whatever.  And people don't want to do
that.  If they see a beggar, they keep driving, they choose leaders
that always tell us not to pick up hitchhikers, the guy in the park,
well, that's what the homeless shelter is for."

"But isn't it dangerous to pick up hitchhikers?"

"Yeah", Andrea replied, sucking in her breath, "picking up hitckhikers
is dangerous.  But we remember the story of the good samartain, we
remember that we're called to love our neighbors, and we don't let one
bad experience turn us against all hitchhikers."  She uttered the last
phrase as though a robot, it was her voice, she was preaching to
herself, but she didn't really beleive it.

"It's more dangerous not to pick them up.  It's dangerous because then
we're violating the commandments that Christ gave us to live by; we're
acting out of fear and not love.  And the reason someone, well a lot
of people, actually, like Captain Mercurio, really dislike democracy
is because people don't choose leaders who say, look, you should stop
and pick these people up, they choose leaders who say, no, don't do
that, think of how dangerous it is, put your own safety first."

"You mentioned homeless shelters, in a somewhat negative way.  Do you
not support homeless shelters?"

"Well, I've been in a few, many years ago, before I had a steady job
with NASA.  The problem with homeless shelters is that people think
because there's a homeless shelter, well, the problem's taken care
of, they don't have to do anything, but again, Christ tells us that
we should..."

"But can't people take advantage of that?  I mean, won't some people
just take and take and take without working or really doing anything
productive?"

"Sure, a lot of people will, in a lot of different ways.  Christianity
is about being taken advantage of, when you love unconditionally, when
you give unconditionally, when you forgive unconditionally, people
will just take and take and take, and most people, understandably,
don't want that, and that's why they really don't live as Christians.
They give up to a point and then they say no more.  But one of
Christ's stories was about a woman who came to the temple in Jerusalem
to give a donation.  There were all these other people who gave all
these big donations, and this old woman gave just two bits.  Jesus
told his diciples that she went away redeemed rather than the others,
because she had given all she had, while the others had just given
their surplus.  So it's not about how much you give, it's about you're
willingness to give all."

"Well, that raises a good point, that's been made by people like
Warren Buffett.  I mean, can't you do a lot more good in the world by
working hard, so then you'll have the money to spend on charities that
can really make a difference?"

"Well, now we come back to the first commandment, the one about loving
God.  The point isn't to do as much good as we can in the world, the
point is to live in harmony with God.  That's really what's going on
here, ultimately we're all spiritual beings, first and foremost, so
how much good we can do in the world is really secondary if we're not
living in harmony with God, so that's why the woman who just gives a
little goes away redeemed, because she's the one who's living in
harmony with God."

"What does it mean to live in harmony with God, how do we do that?"

"That's what Christ taught us.  That's what his Gospel teachings are
all about.  I mean, Christ could have chosen to be a political leader,
he was tempted to do that by the Devil, he could have liberated the
Jewish people from the Roman Empire, heck, he could have become the
Roman Emperor, he could have freed the slaves two thousand years ago,
he could have done a lot more 'good' in the world if he'd been
tougher.  But what he was trying to teach us is that living in harmony
with God, loving God, loving each other as sons and daughters of God,
is more important that all the 'good' you do."

"I don't think I understand, completely.  Isn't the 'good' we do, I
mean, isn't that what living in harmony with God is about?"

"No, not really, it's just an effect.  Christ taught us that faith in
God is the most important thing, and that our works come from our
faith.  Our good deads, our works, they are the outward expression of
our inward faith, but it's the faith that's the most important thing.
So you can do all kind of good works, but if the faith isn't there, it
doesn't amount for much.  On the other hand, if you have faith, then
it will be expressed in your works, because you'll always be looking
for ways to help people, to give to people, to forgive people, because
you love people, or at least try to.  I guess it's kinda like what
Marc, what Captain Mercurio did to defraud his investors, he created
some kind of robot that could cook dinner, but it didn't work the way
he said, because it actually had a person operating it.  Good works
are like that, it's not the outward appearance that's important, it's
what's going on behind the scenes."

"What do you think of the Christian right?"

"Well, the Christian right seems to be much more a political movement
than a spiritual one.  To listen to them talk, you'd think the
Christian gospel was mainly about sex, drugs, and alcohol.  Yet if you
look at the gospel, you find basically nothing about drugs and
alcohol, and only a little about sex.  Christ instead hammers
constantly on love, forgiveness, generosity.  Chirst say 'give to all
those who beg of you'.  He told one of his followers to sell all his
worldly possesions and give the money to the poor.  Go ahead - try it.
Sell all your worldly possessions, give the money to the poor, and see
how people treat you then.  The Christian right almost completely
ignores this.  They rail about sex, but are strangely silent about
the neighborhood merchant who puts a price tag on everything in his
store and is standing there behind the cash register to take your
money before you walk out the door.  And then you look at what they
really propose.  So much of it involves more and more government
regulation.  They want the government to ban abortions.  Look, I don't
support abortion, but having the government 'get tough' with abortion
clinics isn't the answer.  They're tough on crime.  Fine.  Christ said
love your enemies.  Why don't you see them agitating for decent
treatment of prisoners in jails?"

"You mentioned the treatment of prisoners.  The United States,
in particular, has all manner of regulations designed to ensure
humane treatment of prisoners.  How are they inadequate?"

"Well, I've never spent more than a night in jail, but if you look at
the videotapes of how prisons are run, they look to me like military
boot camps.  The prisoners are told when to get up, marched through
dining halls, assigned to work projects, ordered here and there.
Maybe more significantly, the prisons are seen as something between a
threat and a punishment.  They're there to create fear in people; you
obey the laws or else you go to jail.  In my mind, just about the only
reason to imprison someone is because they're dangerous to other
people and need to be isolated.  And once they've been isolated,
there's no reason to go beyond that.  Just give them an apartment in a
guarded complex, the level of security being dependent on how
dangerous they are.  What rational reason is there for anything else?
So much of how our prisons are run is based on anger and hatred.
People don't love their enemies; they hate them, and they want to make
them suffer, so that's why they want their prisons to be 'tough'."

"OK, we've only got a few minutes left, let me change the subject, at
least slightly.  You're a scientist, or at least an engineer, so what
do you say to people who claim that there's no scientific proof from
the existance of God, so it must be just a myth?"

"You know, I've been asked that question before and here's my answer:
Scientific proof is based on experiment.  Now, just because something
is factual doesn't mean we can design a experiment to test it.  For
example, you might as well ask if there is life elsewhere in the
universe.  Few people today would suggest that it's unscientific to
speculate thus, but any kind of experiment to exhaustively search the
universe for life is totally impractical.  So the question of
extraterrestrial life, while in no way unscientific in itself, admits
no realistic experiment, and thus no realistic scientific proof!"

"Now let's return to the question of God.  There is an experiment you
can perform to find out if God is real - you can die.  You can put a
gun to your head and pull the trigger, and you'll find out real quick
if there is life after death.  But, like searching the universe for
alien life, this experiment is somewhat unrealistic.  Most of us don't
want to perform that experiment just to satisfy our academic
curiosity.  Yet the fact remains that we will all die some day, and
then we'll know.  So my answer is that the existence of God and the
question of life after death is no more unscientific than speculating
about extraterrestrials, and to people who refuse to accept that I say
just wait - the day will come where you're going to find out all about
God."

"Well, thank you for joining us this evening.  My guest had been
Dr. Andrea Yeats, astronaut, philospher, and Christian.  We'll be back
in a minute with my final thought."

The entire crew had watched the broadcast, floating on the other
side of the TV camera.  After the program ended, they were
fairly quiet for a while, the captain in particular.

"You did really good, I was quite proud of you," he finally said.

Andrea's television interview aired four days later, to a large
audience.  It provoked widespread public response, evidenced by a
deluge of e-mails whose subject lines ranged the spectrum from "May
God bless you and your crew" and "Thank you, you are a genuine saint"
to "Christianity COMMANDS Capitalism" and "This is __HERESY__!!!".

"Live from Los Angeles" - name of the program?


T + 54 days

After almost two months in space, the constant TV interviews had died
down, the ship had assumed a stable configuration, and the _Icarus_
crew had settled into a kind of routine.  The 747's crowded crew
compartment was the hub of activity, with the remainder of the ship
docked to its upward-facing airlock.  The first module, docked
directly to the 747, had become basically an extension of the
aircraft, where the crew tended to take their meals and gather for
all-hands briefings.  Past the first module was a docking nexus, with
four modules extending out from its sides, and other module mated
above.  These four modules had become the crew quarters.  Alister and
Burns shared one, Vic had another.  Andrea, as the only woman
aboard, had an entire module all to herself, as did the Captain.  Next
came Module 2, primarilly used for storage of immediately needed
items, such as a supply of food rations, with enough open space in the
middle to allow easy passage to the next docking nexus, with four more
modules faning out from it.  Two were basically engineering workshops,
packed with a variety of tools Burns had brought up from Earth, a
third Vic had converted into the ship's sick bay, and the fourth was a
library, loaded mainly with Burns' various technical books.

CREW QUARTERS SHOULD BE A LITTLE FARTHER "UP"

Beyond the second module, the side modules were taken up with a mix of
greenhouse modules, of which there were twelve, and storage modules,
containing both supplies carried from Earth and the crew's refuse and
waste, which the Captain and Burns had forbid throwing overboard.
Though it would be some time before they figured how to convert their
waste into fertilizer for the plants, they knew that everything had to
be recycled if they were to make it to the red planet and back.

Past the greenhouse modules were the tank modules of fuel, oxidizer,
and water, attached to the sides of more docking nexuses,
interconnected by storage modules so packed with supplies that it was
almost impossible to move through them.  The crew hardly ever ventured
that far into the spaceship, having organized all of their valuable
supplies close to the 747 and relegated things like the dishwasher to
the more distant modules.  In all, there were 14 modules arranged in a
line, with 13 docking nexuses interconnecting them and with another 52
modules attached to the various docking ports.

They still had about a dozen of the rocket engines from the cargo
modules' second stages, attached, with their fuel tanks, to the ends
of the side modules jutting out from the docking nexuses.  Under
Burns' direction, three of the cargo modules were converted to act as
Orbital Transfer Vehicles, which could hold two or three people,
maneuver, and fire their single rocket engines.

Mercuriou had banned smoking in A-core, which had by now been
designated _Icarus_' bridge, so Burns now spent several hours a day in
B-core with a laptop computer propped against his crossed knee and a
marijuana joint in his left hand.  By the time Andrea opened the
pressure door and propelled herself in, the joint had burnt out and
was floating a meter above Burns' head.  The arid smell of marijuana
smoke hung in the air, not yet cleared out by the charcoal filters
humming in the background.

"Burns," Andrea started to say, but the ship's chief engineer put a
finger to his lips.  He was wearing one of his favorite T-shirts,
solid black except for a single word across the front, in neon-green
letters formed from a series of wide horizontal lines, like you might
see on a TV screen: MUTE.

Andrea waited, irate.  She didn't support the War on Drugs,
considering it another perfect example of how violently un-Christian
her society was, but it disturbed her that Burns worked on critical
software while intoxicated.  Finally he saved what he was working on,
pushed the laptop away, and looked up.

"Dr. Andrea Yeats," declared he, reveling in the the drug-induced haze.

Fastened to a sofa chair by a restraining strap, the NASA engineer watched
the laptop drift away from Burns, collide with a cushion he had aimed
it for, and rebound gently before coming to a halt.

"You always work stoned?" she asked.

"Not always, but right now a lot."

"Try every day."

Burns shrugged.

"I don't work stoned, why do you need to work stoned?"

"Because I'm bored."

"Bored?"

"Yes, this work is boring!  When I'm bored, it's easier to work
stoned.  After a while, it catches up with you, and you can't get
anything done because you're just so sick of looking at it, sober _or_
stoned.  That's the problem with being smart.  The smarter you get,
the more you can do, and the fewer other people there are who can help
do it.  Eventually, you get so smart that you can do almost anything,
and nothing actually gets done."

Andrea paused for a minute to think about this.

"What are you working on?" she finally asked.

"I'm running landing simulations for Mars, for about the
million-and-oneth time.  I'm going over the payload manifest _again_,
and trust me I've already gone over it sober several times, too.  I'm
looking at failure modes _again_ on a re-orbit attempt."

"Well, maybe I can help you out."

"Be my guest!" the one engineer exclaimed and motioned the other
towards the laptop.  Andrea didn't move.  Burns slowly started
laughing.

"Don't worry, doctor, I won't let you do all the work," he drawled
with the air of man who'd just maneuvered his way out of an unpleasant
task.  "You didn't come in here for that."

"Actaully, I wanted to ask you about the captain.  You've known him
a long time?"

Burns nodded.  "Since college," he replied.  "We'd roomed together
since our freshman year.  I met him looking for a place to live, and
both of us for the same reason.  We'd been admitted to the university
but didn't apply for housing until that deadline had passed.  We ended
up answering an ad from this medical student named Vic Antonov," he
laughed.  "We had a lot of great parties."

"What was he like?"

"Marc?"  Burns was quiet for a minute.  "He's a lot different now than
he was in college.  Back then, all he wanted was a joint, a beer and a
Latin dictionary and he was happy.  Now, he's a lot more...  driven,"
he concluded with a shrug.

"How did he get 'driven'?"

"I guess he did what he had to do to get by."

"He had to steal a billion dollars?"

"If he wanted to fly to Mars, he did," Burns replied quickly, then
slowed his speech.  "He learned to be tough, I guess."  Burns now
paused completely for a moment.  "The kid I knew in college wouldn't
have got us here... of course, the kid I _was_ in college wouldn't
have got here, either!"

Andrea was silent, then finally blurted out the question she had
been struggling to answer since almost their first day in orbit.

"Why did you agree to this?"

Burns stretched out and started laughing.  "Because I wanted to go to
Mars!"  he finally exclaimed.  "What did you say when he asked you -
'let me think about it for a few days'?"

Andrea smiled.  Maybe their reasons weren't so different after all.
At the time of the launch, events had happened so quickly that she
hadn't really thought through what Mercurio was proposing or what she
had accepted / gotten into.  All she had seen was an opportunity to
fly into space and the simple justification that there were some
people who seemed like they could use her help.  In fact, she had
almost assumed that they would quickly need her help to get back home.
In truth / fact, she was amazed by how little real help they had
needed, and over time had developed a deep respect for the ship's
chief engineer.  Its captain she was still trying to figure out / Its
captain was still a mystery to her.

"So, why is Mercurio captain and not you?" she now bluntly asked.

Burns thought for a minute.

"Well, it was his idea to fly to Mars, not mine.  And I don't want
to be captain, not really.  But there's more to it than that."

Patiently, Andrea waited in silence until Burns went on.

"Marc and I always got along well in college.  I could explain pretty
much all the math stuff anybody was studying and he, for his part,
could understand it.  On the other hand, he had some great ideas, and
one of the best was his Greek reading tool, and could really help him
with all the technical details.  And I found out something later on -
he can lead, he can manage, whatever you want to call it."

"Every job I had after college, I was either overwealmed with work, or
bored out my mind.  Usually both at the same time.  Then I thought
back on the Greek dictionary project.  All I had to do was design it.
Marc hired two comp-sci programmers with his own coin to program it
and I was just there to fill in the niches when needed.  I made a
better team with my college roommate than with any of those dot-coms,
and mainly because Marc only asked me to do a little.  He got two
other comp-sci students to do most of the programming on this thing; I
just had to design it, and could code or not code whatever part I felt
like."

"When Marc proposed this thing, it seemed ambitious as hell, but he
knows how to get things done.  He asked me what I needed from him, and
he told me what he needed from me.  He's done a really good job of
making sure I don't get overwealmed.  I still can't beleive it.  Even
though this thing is so big, it's almost the easiest thing I've ever
done.  A lot easier than some really simplier projects where I just
didn't get the things I needed to get them done.  I've just planned it
out, showed/explained all the plans to Marc, and he's figured out how
to get someone else to do 90% of it, and you better believe that a big
part of that was figuring out how steal a billion dollars.  I just do
about 10% of the work, and _usually_ the most interesting part
anyway... but not today," he concluded with a sigh.

#if HUMPH

"What do you mean, can you give me an example?" Andrea asked.

"Well, consider when we developed that fuel for NASA.  I told Marc we
could really use a new fuel, and that programs like _Gaussian_ might
let us design one, but you know I didn't (have to) write a single line
of code?  Oh, I had to do the router hack so we get some money to get
started, but then he just hired a bunch of programmers, bought the
software, sat me down with them to explain what we needed, and they
went and did all the mundane stuff.  And then he hired a bunch of
chemists to test it out, and got them to equip a chem lab.  I could do
as much or as little as the testing as I wanted.  And then he hired a
bunch of chemical engineers to design the manufacturing plant.  After
I designed the rocket engines, he hired a bunch of Mexicans to
actually run the factory to build them, and made sure they were smart
Mexicans, not just a bunch of guys who would slap something together
half-ass.  When it was time to equip the mission, I just came up with
a list of things we needed, and he went and got almost all of them.
And still understood everything enough to come back and ask me, well,
shouldn't we take pure strains of these crops in case the hybrids
don't grow well in space?  That's Marc.  He's the best boss I've ever
worked for, and a good friend, too."

#endif

"What do think of his politics?"

Burns shrugged.  "Who knows?  If you ask him straight up, he'll admit
that it's just his opinion and he might be wrong.  He's got one thing
right - most of the work we do is bullshit.  Who wants to write
another stupid routing protocol?  I just don't give a shit anymore
what 'the customer' wants!  Hell, if we're going to do something, fuck
it, let's fly to Mars!"


T + 60 days

"What are you, some kind of reporter now?  You gonna go around this
ship trying to draw everybody's life history out of them?"

Vic was peering at a television camera relaying an image from B-13,
one of the hydroponic pods.  He did a lot of work remotely, partly
because it avoiding having to go all the way down the cargo chain just
to do a transplant, partly because the robotics software Alister had
stolen from the Japanese enabled a lot of the work to be automated
anyway, and partly because his experience with hydroponics taught him
to keep all the pods sealed, to contain any fungal or virual outbreak
to a single pod.  Today, he was training a neural net to pick cherry
tomatoes with a robot hand.

Andrea thought for a moment before answering his question.

"I'm no reporter, but I usually have the opportunity to get to know a
crew before we're blasted into orbit together.  I've already spent
more time in space with you guys than with any other astronauts, and I
barely know anything about you!  Take your medical degree, for
example, I mean why aren't you using it?  Sounds to me like until this
gig came along, you were just siting up in the hills growing pot."

The doctor sighed and tried to run the recognizer program again, but
again it labeled half the leaves on the plant as tomatoes.  Vic threw
his hands up in exasperation and pushed away from the computer.

"I don't know how this damn thing works!  What the hell do I know
about neural nets and Pavlov chains?!"

"You mean Markov chains; let me take a look," Andrea said, and took
over at the keyboard.

Vic watched from behind as she started reviewing all the settings
on the arcane Japanese system.

"I went to medicial school because I wanted to help people; learn to
heal their injuries, ease their pain, that kind of thing.  Mainly what
you learn is how to look things up in a book, recommend expensive
procedures done by for-profit companies just across the street from
your for-profit hospital, scribble out prescriptions for pricy
medicines, and pay your medical school loans.  And you know what the
worst thing was?  I thought medical school would be full of idealistic
young men and women determined to advance the frontiers of an age-old
and honorable profession.  Instead, most of my classmates just wanted
to know what on the next test so they could pass their class, get
their degree, and move on to the next step towards their
million-dollar beach house."

"Please grip about socialized medicine.  Hell, our medicine already is
socialized; it's just capitalist socialism instead of communist
socialism.  Doctors don't make the decisions; H.M.O.s and Medicare and
hospital administrators and pharmasutecal companies do.  The bottom
line is still the same.  It's still some screwed up system that
everyone is a little cog in.  You can buck it.  But just like John
Cougar Mellancamp said, 'whenever I fight the system, the system
always wins'.  You fight the system, nobody'll hire you because you
won't churn out the billable hours, you very well may lose your
hospital privileges 'cause you don't have some 'group' you're part of,
if you just ask people to pay what they can afford, you'll get a
pittance, and on top of it all you'll still have medical school loans
to pay off, and they're astronomical because the medical schools
expect that you'll do like everybody else and make a killing, so they
want a nice little piece of the pie, too."

"And as far as sitting up in the hills growing pot," he concluded, "it
happens to be something I'm pretty good at, it beats sitting in some
stuffy office building, and looks like it just might get us to Mars!"



T + 188 days

Meanwhile, the first crops from the ship's vegetable garden ripened,
just as the supply of military rations was growing noticably short.
Vic set about devising a high-protein diet plan, and soy beans, which
had grown quite readily in zero-g, topped his list.  The doctor
prepared his first batch in the Burns-devised vegetable steamer, which
superheated a pressurized canister of water before releasing it into
the chamber containing the soy beans.  As it left the canister, the
water, already heated beyond its conventional boiling point, burst
into steam with a loud hizzing that attracted the attention of the
young South African in the next module.

"Soy beans?" Alister questioned, imagining the pressed blocks of
tofu he had habitually passed by in the supermarket.

"I rather like them steamed," Vic replied.

"I don't know about this, mate," the programmer quibbled as he
inspected some of the freshly picked raw beans.  "I'll eat them,
though," he quickly added.

"Ever been to a sushi restaurant?" Vic asked, with a raised eyebrow
that indicated he thought he knew something his friend didn't.

"Sure, I love sushi!  Where's the tuna hand roll?"

Vic ignored the question.

"Ever had those green beans they serve as appetizers?"

"Yeah," Alister replied, glancing back down at the soy pods in his
hand.  "That's what these are?"

The doctor nodded affirmatively as he opened the steamer and let some
of the cooked soy beans, along with an ample quantity of steam, float
out into the air.  The aroma of freshly steamed vegatables permeated
the air and quickly brought work to a standstill on a spaceship where
plastic-wrapped spaghetti pouches and freeze dried peaches had been
the norm for months.

"What have we got here?" the captain asked as he floated in with Burns
from one direction, almost simultaneously as Andrea entered from a
side module, where she had been calibrating instrumentation for an
upcoming survey run.

"Are these from the garden?" she asked.  "Great!"

"Guess those Pavlov chains worked out after all!"


T + 231 days

In retrospect, the first crops harvested from the garden had marked a
turning point in the flight of the _Icarus_.  With the stress of the
initial months behind them, the crew of the _Icarus_ had settled into
a leisurely routine.  Captain Mercuriou was slowly rereading
Plutarch's _Lives_of_the_Nobel_Gretians_and_Romans_, this time in the
original Latin; Vic undertook a careful breeding program to develop
strains of important food crops (and marijuana) specifically adapted
for growth in zero-gee; Burns and Andrea were working on their mission
plan for a Mars landing; and his spare time Alister was learning to
play the guitar.

"Hmmph!" Marc verbalized this particular evening while everyone was
gathered in the B-core.  He was reading from a detached LCD panel
while Alister practiced his scales, Burns and Andrea worked on some
computer program, and Vic was listening to a rock album on headphones
in the light haze of a marijuana joint he had recently passed around.

"Sparta must have been an amazing place to live," the Captain
speculated, as Vic removed his headphones.  "You have to wonder if
Marx knew anything of its history.  I don't know, but Sparta has got
to be one of the greatest socialist success stories ever."

"Were they Communists?" Alister asked, setting aside his instrument
and shaking his left hand.

"Not exactly," Marc replied.  "Or maybe they were, depending on how
you look at it.  The parents didn't raise their children, for example,
the children were raised by the state.  And their 'education', if you
can call it that, consisted of leaving them to starve unless they
could steal food to eat."

"That's insane!" the youth replied.  "Why on Earth wouldn't they
feed their own children?"

"Lycurgus wanted a nation of warriors... and he got it."

"The determination of mankind to train their children to hate and kill
_is_ amazing," Andrea interjected.

"Well, maybe you can be our twentieth-first-century Lycurgus, Doctor,"
Marc speculated with a mischevious grin, as Vic began to chuckle.
"Maybe you can prescribe a set of rules for us to raise our children
to be Christians instead of warriors."

"I think Jesus already gave us those rules far better than I could."

"The problem is that people don't live by those rules," Vic noted.
"Just because the teachings are transmitted, doesn't mean they're
understood.  Just because they're understood, doesn't mean they're
practiced.  They're talked about all the time, but mostly it's just
talk."

"I don't know about that," the Captain retorted.  "William Gibson
thought that Christianity was a major factor in the destruction of the
Roman Empire.  At first the Romans were Pagans, they gloried in the
martial arts, taught their children the virtues of war, worshiped gods
like Mars and Jupiter.  Then came along the Christians, everybody
started turning the other cheek and forgiving their enemies, before
long, no more Roman Empire."

"Gibson had some other explainations, too, you know," Andrea noted.
"Like the intolerance of the Catholic Church for all those Arians it
declared heritics.  And since so many of the barbarian tribes adhered
to the Arian beliefs, well...  You're not the only one here who's read
_Decline_and_Fall_."

"No, I see not," Mercuriou answered a thoughtful pause.

"Yes," Vic answered, "but a large part of Christianity was all about
propping up the Roman Empire, and then the Popes, and all the monarchs
who got their scepters from the Popes.  Christianity certainly got
bastardized in the process."

"Hmmm," Marc replied thoughtfully, "yes, a large part of any religion
is about propping up the existing social order."

"What amazes me about Western civilization", Vic continued, "is this
notion that the individual somehow owes something to the state, or at
least to the society.  If anything, the Native Americans believed that
society had a responsibility to the individual to raise him to be
independent.  This modern morality is that people have some kind of
obligation to work.  That's gotten embedded into the religion along
with all this other stuff that justifies the government.  It's all
part of propping up an industrialized society."

"But people have to work to live, right?"  Alister wondered.  "I mean,
people have always had to eat, right?"

"Yes and no," the doctor replied.  "Yes, people have always had to
work to eat, but this notion that people have to work
_for_the_society_ is what I'm talking about.  Again, take the Native
American Indians, for example.  They taught their children from a
young age to build fires by rubbing sticks together, to recognize wild
plants as edible or poisonous, to build a shelter or a bow and arrow
just from the natural materials you'd find lying about in a forest.
The net result was that by the time they were fifteen years old, they
could literally walk out into the forest and take care of themselves.
Their society, therefore, was perfectly voluntary.  If anyone didn't
want to be there, they could just get up and leave.  Murders, armed
robberies, the violent crimes that we're so familiar with, were almost
unknown.  I think it was because they raised their children to be
truly independent, while Western society for generations has raised
people to be dependant.  Most people wouldn't have the slightest idea
how to feed themselves if they couldn't walk into the supermarket with
a twenty dollar bill in their hands.  Thus, the individual is raised
to work for the society, and the society has taught the individual
that they are morally obligated to work.  Inevitably, this morality
has worked its way into the religion as well."

"And the philosophers keep talking about freedom," Marc added, "but
how can you have freedom in a world where everyone is raised to
be dependent on society?"

"Exactly."

"So the philosophers have turned to politics to try and find their
freedom there.  Their latest idea is democracy; they keep trying to
convince us that freedom is to be found in that dumb vote, and don't
you dare try to tell these people they don't have freedom, they'll
scream you down as a Communist and all the while they're surrounded by
a society based on nothing but forced labor."

"Christianity isn't based on forced labor," Andrea noted after a pause.

"Could have fooled me."

"You need to distinguish true Christianity from, how did Vic put it,
bastardized Christianity?"

The ship's doctor nodded in assent.

"Jesus didn't teach us to work to eat, in fact, just the opposite.  He
taught us not to worry about food, or clothing, or housing.  He said
to put your faith in God for those things.  He pointed out that the
birds in the air don't sow the field, or reap the harvest, yet God
provides them with all the seed they need to survive.  Jesus taught us
to put God first, love and generosity second, and let your faith take
care of the rest."

"That sounds good, Andrea," Marc slowly replied, "but faith in God
didn't get any of us here.  None of the companies that sold us this
equipment did it for love or generosity.  They did it because they
thought they would get something out of it for themselves.  We got
here because we were willing to take it from them."

"That's funny, Marc, because I don't think I took anything from
anyone.  Faith in God got _me_ here."


T + 424 days

"Look we've made it this far without any serious problems."

"Yeah, but all the really critical stuff's been well tested up until
now.  Think about it.  We test-fired all the rocket engines before
using any of them.  We burned extra fuel to keep the aerodynamic
stresses on the 747 within its normal flight tolerances.  We
brought spare fuel canisters in case the supply tanks didn't
work."

"And we didn't really need any of those things.  Look, the
bottom line is that we said we were going to Mars, and now
we're here and we have to land."

"Why do you have to land?"  Andrea interjected.  The NASA engineer had
floated into the room unnoticed during their debate.  "Why can't you
just go back to Earth?  You've already accomplished more than any
other space mission to date.  _Icarus_ will go down along with with
Gagarin's flight and Salyut 1.  So what that they hadn't gotten to
Armstrong's moon landing..."

"We have to land!" the captain shouted.  Alister and Vic stopped work
two modules away and moved closer to try to overhear more of the
conversation.

"If we don't land," he continued, "they'll say we failed, and then the
capitalists will just come back two years from now and make the first
landing on Mars; hell, they'll probably use our technology to do it,
and everyone will remember Captain so-and-so or Major such-and-such
saluting the first American flag on Mars!"

"So let them!" Andrea shot back, drawing only a snort in reply.  "Why
do you have to risk everything just to win your private little war?"

"Well, maybe you find this hard to understand from your cushy NASA
perch," Marcellus continued, his voice dripping with sarcasm, "but
there's a lot of people back home rooting for us to show the world
that you don't have to become one of these ruthless bums to get
something done in life."

"Don't you?  Haven't you?" she challenged him.  "How many millions did
_you_ steal, Marc?  How many toes did you step on?  Don't tell me you
haven't become ruthless!"

They locked eyes.

"We are landing this plane on Mars," Mercurio stated slowly and
firmly, in a no-nonsense command tone of voice.  "That has been the
goal of this mission from day one.  We take the risks as they come.
We have a mission plan and we are going to carry it out."

"OK, if we're going to do that..." Burns started, then stopped as
Andrea flung herself through the hatchway, muttering something
about "just like NASA" as she zoomed away through the spacecraft.
Mercuriou watched her go.

"If you learn to live with disappointment," he noted, "she'll never
leave you for another man."


T + 637 days

MAYBE THIS IS WHERE MERCURIOU COMPLEMPLATES PLANTING A U.S. FLAG
UPSIDE-DOWN IN THE SOIL

"We saw this with the _Challenger_ accident," Burns was saying.  More
than a million people were watching the crew conference on television.
Most cable TV systems now carried the _Icarus_ video feed for at least
part of the day, and the video bar "Live - Mars Orbit" had become a
standard fixture on many a television.

"The first indications of the problem were visual, but nobody was
looking at those particular cameras during the launch.  And although
we've got cameras we can operate remotely, the fact remains that a
manned presence in orbit is still by far our best observation option."

"So someone has to stay behind," Merceriou stated.  It wasn't
a surprise; landing options had been discussed even before
construction had began.

"Since I'm the only one here with experience piloting a 747, I figure
I have to go," Burns said.

Mercuriou spoke again, after a pause.  "I think the command function,
so to speak, has to remain in orbit, so I'll stay here."

"Alister should stay, too," Burns continued.  "I think it's important
for one of the engineers to remain in orbit, and he knows more about
the overall setup of the spaceship than anyone but me, well, maybe
Andrea, too, at this point."

The South African was staring silently at the bulkhead in front of
him.  "Sorry, kid," Burns apologized.  Alister nodded.

"I'll stay," Andrea volunteered.  "Alister can go, if he wants, but I
think I've got a pretty good idea of how the ship is run that Marc and
I can handle things here."  She had remained silent up until this
point in the conversation, mainly because her opposition to the
entire landing attempt was by now well known to the crew.

"You'll probably need help with the refueling, if nothing else," Vic
told Burns.  "If Alister doesn't go, I will."

"So," Mercuriou summarized, "Burns goes, Andrea and I stay, and either
Vic or Alister goes, and the other one stays."

"Let Alister go," Vic continued.  "He's young.  Give him the chance to
walk on Mars."

"No," Merceriou stated, after a pause.  "Andrea knows a lot about the
ship, that's true, but I won't have both the engineers on the ground."
Now it was his turn to apologize to Alister.  "Sorry, kid."


T + 639 days

"Anything could go wrong.  You're not landing on a runway; your tires
could blow out; you could even crash.  You could be unable to refuel
for some reason.  We have absolutely no ground support _whatsoever_.
We've never even _attempted_ a reentry in this vehicle, and it certainly
wasn't designed for it.  And we have no rescue option should
_anything_ go wrong."

For the last time, Andrea was trying to convince Merceriou to cancel
the landing attempt.  The meeting was in the captain's quarters; only
Burns, Yeats, and Merceriou were present.

"There was no rescue option on Apollo, either," the captain noted.
"When they had problems on Apollo 13, they just had to work it out,
and that's what we'll have to do if we have problems here."

"Apollo was risky.  Three astronauts had already died in Apollo 1;
they were in this crazed moon race with the Russians trying to prove
that communism wasn't some great advanced new society, a lot like this
crazy venture which is half about trying to prove that capitalism and
democracy aren't all they're cracked up to be, and _still_, Apollo was
a better design."  Merceriou started to shake his head, but Andrea
wouldn't be stopped.  "The entire vehicle was designed from the start
with spaceflight in mind; they had tested the command module on
Apollos 7 and 8; they had tested the lunar module on Apollos 9 and
10."

"The moon does make a lot more sense than Mars," Burns observed.
"Heck, the astroid belt makes a lot more sense than Mars.  We've
only..."

Mercuriou cut him off, his temper short.

"We're not in lunar orbit, this isn't a mission to the asteriod belt,
this is a mission to Mars, that's where we are, and that's where we're
going."

Burns broke the silence that followed.

"I'm just trying to give you an objective engineering assessment, Marc.
We're picked a hard target.  The moon's got one-sixth Earth gravity
and no atmosphere.  Nobody's ever attempt to land on another planet
before.  We're definitely pushing the envelope in a big way."

"Bottom line, will this work or not - objective engineering
assessment?"

"I can't read into a crystal ball, Marc.  Yes, for all it's
disadvantages, I think the vehicle is as sound as Apollo, 'cause
Apollo had big disadvantages too.  Spaceflight is _dangerous_.  More
than anything else, as I've told you from the beginning, we should
have more than one ship.  Three ships worked for Christopher Columbus,
and it's hard to argue with the results from _that_ mission."

"So you think we should go back and get two more ships?"  A twinge
of sarcasm had now crept into the captain's voice.

Burns sniffed.  "Ideally, we should never had left Earth orbit without
more ships.  Maybe it would've made more sense to wait to see if we
couldn't get someone else to come with us."

Mercuriou drifted backwards, stared at the posters on the
wall of his cabin and slowly shook his head.

"We didn't come all this way to turn back.  We're landing on Mars."


T + 650 days

The bottom line was that any reentry attempt, even without a landing,
required flying the 747 in atmospheric flight.  Only Burns had ever
flown a 747.  Furthermore, the thin Martian air required a much higher
airspeed and possibly presented handling challenges to the pilot.
Only Burns, it seemed, could make a reentry attempt, and after the
incident in the asteroid belt, the Captain decided against sending
Alister with him.  Finally, it was decided that he would pilot the
aircraft alone.

Disaster on Mars.  Burns attempts to land the 747, but they hadn't
gotten everything figured quite right.  The wings snap off during
reentry and the whole thing goes up in a fireball.  Burns dies.

The wings of the aircraft had been designed to flex, yet the carbon
coating was rigid.  Burns and Alister had correctly calculated the
aerodynamic forces from the reentry, and the dense layer of carbon
was strong enough to withstand those forces, yet hairline cracks
began to creep into the carbon during reentry.

Burns' first warning was a loud crack that sounded like a firecracker
or gunshot.

"What was that?" he wondered aloud.

The answer came less than a second later, as the left wing tore away
from the fuselage and slammed into the tail before falling away
towards the red planet below.  Liquid hydrogen gushed from the jagged
hole in the plane's left side as it swerved into an uncontrollable
spin.  The right wing crumbled under the new stresses, but before much
more could happen one of the remaining engines ignited the leaking
hydrogen and the entire aircraft disappeared into a ball of flame.

In orbit, the Icarus crew were first stunned by the sudden loss of
telemetry, then watched speechless as the aircraft flamed red on black
against the planet surface below, then disintegrated into hundreds of
tiny meteors that streaked silently into the Martian dawn.

-----

The carbon coating itself was strong enough to withstand the
forces of reentry and thick enough to act as an effective heatshield.
The coverings on the wheelwells was a different story.  Removing
them to test them, then replacing them and recovering them had
introduced cracks and fissures along their edges, where they
joined to the main body of the spaceplane.  Now, during reentry,
the superheated gases began working into these cracks around
the edges.  Finally, one of the coverings detached completely,
broke off in a single piece, and let the superheated gas pass
through to the aluminum airplane skin beneath.  In less than
a second, a hole the size of the wheelwell had burn completely
through the plane.

From orbit, the _Icarus_ crew saw a red dot appear on the left
wing of the spaceplane about a minute into reentry.  On board
the 747, Burns heard a load pop.

"What was that?" he wondered aloud.

Alarms started going off in the cockpit.  The puncture had
passed right through the wing's fuel tank and ignited the
fuel, which now poured out the hole in the top of the wing
in a geyser of flame.

"Looks like something on the left wing," Mercurio noted, looking over
at the computer telemetry coming from the spaceplane.  "You might have
lost part of the heatshield."

Even before he finished speaking, the same thing happened to the
wheelwell covering on the right wing and a second geyser of
flame erupted from it.

"I've got flames coming out of the right wing now," Burns observed
from the right-hand pilot's seat, looking over his shoulder.  "We
might be losing the heatshield," he speculated as a knot formed
tighter in his stomach.

There was nothing he could do at the moment about the heatshield, but
as great as that concern was, he also had to worry about the fuel in
the wing tanks.  Without sufficient fuel, he couldn't return to orbit.

"I'm aborting reentry," he declared as he made a snap decision.
Starting the engines for a return to orbit would be dangerous,
but if he lost much of the fuel, it'd be a moot point, since he'd
lack the fuel to return to orbit.

In orbit, Andrea suddenly realized why the two failure points
seems so symmetrically positioned on the wings.

"It's the wheelwells," she declared, and the rest of the crew
turned towards her.  "The wheelweels are failing."

Before anyone could say another word, or do anything, the third
wheelweel, almost directly beneath the cockpit, failed.  A torrent of
flame erupted into the cockpit from below.  Clad in his spacesuit,
Burns was swept out into the Mach 13 flowstream.  The acceleration
alone probably killed him instantly, even before his spacesuit was
consumed by the raging flames that engulfed the crew compartment.

Vic watched the fireball erupt like a tank commander watching
an armor piercing round headed straight for his turret.

_Well_, _this_is_it_, he thought.  A calm peace enveloped his soul.
_Now_I_get_the_answer_key_for_the_test._ An image of Andrea Yeats
flashed through his mind and a strangly Christian phrase came to mind.
_Father,_into_your_hands_I_commend_my_spirit._

From orbit, the crew watched a third speck of red appear at the
front of the plane, neatly centered, just short of the nose.
At the same moment, all the telemetry ceased, as the cockpit
computers were destroyed by the flames from the breach.

"Burns?" Mercurio asked a dead com link.  "Burns?"

Without control computers to balance manuevering thrusters and control
surfaces, the spaceplane lost its equilibrium, pitched back and began
to yaw.  The aerodynamic forces of the hypersonic airflow overwealmed
the now unstable spaceplane.  The left wing snapped off the
fuselage, and slammed into the tail...

A half-hour time lag in communications left both NASA and the rest of
Earth as passive observers of the dramatic events.


T + 651 days

"OK, now this is what Alister recorded on the high-speed film."

Kyle's face disappeared and the video transmission changed into a
crystal-clear and dramatic vision of the last seconds of the 747, seen
from almost directly above, being buffeted in slow motion by wind
gusts.

"We've been able to enhance it now to clearly show the eddies."

The monitor still showed the 747, now overload with a grid of hundreds
of tiny pressure vectors.  They clearly showed very strong vortexs
coming off the running engines, enlarging and growing instead of
contracting, all turning counterclockwise and forming into a massive
counterclockwise disturbance that engulfed the aircraft.  Just as it
began to break up, NASA Houston cut back onto the monitor.  Kyle was
sitting in his accustomed place behind a long desk with computer
monitors strung out in front of it and white-shirted engineers both
standing and seated behind.

Kyle's face cut back onto the monitor.

Andrea squirmed.  She wanted to see the final breakup in slow
motion, but she could get that later from Alister.  More than
anything, she wanted to interject and ask Kyle to show the
rest of the film, but the 30-minute communications time lag
prevented it.

"Andrea, we don't have any idea what happened other than it looks like
the engines triggered a massive atmospheric disturbance, and absolutely
nothing in any of our Martian atmospheric models predicts anything
like it.  There were a lot of things we were afraid could go wrong
with the vehicle but this wasn't one of them.  Incidently, our
spectroscope analysis showed water vapor in the engine's wake,
which isn't produced by ten-thirty-three and isn't in the Martian
atmosphere, so we're wondering if something down there 
in the reaction byproducts triggered additional reactions in
the Martian atmosphere, but this is all just educated guesswork."

"And we still don't think the crash was survivable, so I really
have to advise against your resupply plan.  I know you want
to do it, and so do I, but I'm looking at it from the angle
of maybe needing those supplies to get the three of you home."

"That's all for now."

The transmission ended and was replaced by the usual screen cluster on
the projector - a diagram of their orbit position, their coordinates
in three different reference frames, a clock in universal time.

The two astronauts were silent.  Mercuriou could have been viewing the
transmission as well from his cabin, but there was no immediate way to
tell.

Alister said nothing, but stared at Andrea, almost dumbly awaiting
instructions.

"The resupply module?" she asked.

"It's got everything on our primary checklist, and a couple of things
from our secondary, too."

"Let's see."

Alister scribbled an instruction on his tablet and the checklist
appeared in a window on Andrea's. _Kyle_will_want_to_see_this_.
She scribbled another instruction on her machine and a copy
of the file began its 10,000,000 km (check this) journey.

She knew everything on both lists, having helped compose them, and
skipped the primary checklist, since Alister said it was loaded.  That
meant they had oxygen, water, first aid equipment, radio equipment,
rescue balls, both large - a good-sized, circular tent when inflated,
and small - two men in spacesuits could just fit into one, and a small
quanity of the remaining military rations.  It was the secondary
checklist she was more concerned with, and not all of it, but only the
part that contained things more valuable, more irreplacible.  They had
begun to form in her mind a third checklist even.  None of them were
packed except one - a pair of spacesuits.  _Icarus_ would then be left
with only two.

Alister made her first command decision, but said nothing and instead
excused herself from the bridge and entered the captain's quarters,
closing the hatch behind her.

Less than sixty seconds later she was back.

"What'd he say?" Alister asked.

"He said that I'm in command, that I should do whatever I want."

"OK."

"Remove the spacesuits from the resupply module and launch it.  I want
a bulls-eye on the 747's crash site."

The resupply module was launched the same way all the others had been.
Nearly a hundred of the silicon carbide engines Burns had
mass-produced in Mexico had been themselves packed ten at a time into
cargo modules and launched.  The EVA to place the engines
on the fuel modules had been performed.  One of them had
been manuefered and attached to an empty, cleaned fuel module
docked to bay one.



T + 652 days

"I'm placing you under a suicide watch."

"You're doing what?"

Mercuriou turned away from the window and confronted his first officer.
Secretly, Andrea was glad to see this reaction, much more so than
quiet resignation, but this she tried not to show.

"You heard me."

The Captain emitted a "Humph", "So what's this suicide watch supposed
to be?  You've got a police guard in mind?"

"Me.  I'm the police guard.  I'm not leaving you out of my sight."

Merceriou took this in slowly.

"OK," he shrugged at last and turned back to the window.

"I've been trying to think of some kind of memorial service for Burns."

After a pause, he nodded.

"I've thought of sending something down to Mars, like burning up a capsule
in the atmosphere, but I don't know if we want to use the fuel."

"Why not?"  Mercuriou said.  "We've got plenty of it."

"Yes, we do." Andrea replied.


T + 653 days

The is another staff meeting.  The Captain was present, but silent.

"We can't assemble the cargo modules without the 747," Alister interjected.
"At least, we can't yet.  I need to run some simulations.  We've got
the cargo modules from the asteroid belt that we rigged to push things
around, but I've got to figure how to get them lined up in a row."

"How do we do that?" Andrea asked.

"I don't know."

The room fell silent.

"I guess I've got to think about it for a while."

"Well, we've got NASA monitoring all of this.  Kyle," she asked the
video camera, "could you give us some help putting the cargo modules
together?  We'll send you copies of the simulation software, and I
think you've already got the manifests."

"We've also got to have some kind of memorial service."

Turning back to Alister, she tried reassure him.  "Don't worry, we've
got a lot of people back home who will help us, and I've got more
hours of spaceflight logged than anyone else here."

Alister furrowed his eyebrows.  It was the first time he had thought
about it, but Dr. Andrea Yeats would for many years hold the record
for most lifetime hours of spaceflight.


T + 654 days

The Captain stopped participating in staff meetings.  He respected
Andrea's 'suicide watch' by remaining in the room, but Alister and the
women from NASA did all the work, or more precisely all the work on
the spaceship, because Kyle's 'mission control' facility in Houston was
now constantly on one of the monitors.  Sometimes Andrea would just
stop and watch it for several minutes, unable to directly participate
because of the hour-long time lag required for the signal to reach
her, then for her response to return to Earth.  They arranged an
elaborate system of communications, transmitting each other a sumary
of their progress every hour, then pausing an hour later to listen to
the other's summary, which had been transmitted half an hour earlier,
and then transmitting another.  They also arranged for an audible
alarm to sound if they wanted to interrupt the other's proceedings.

"Oh, and thought you might want to see this," Kyle announced towards
the end of his 0800 transmission, the first of the morning.

He held a popular American newsstand tabloid to the camera.
Alister's face dominated the front, which asked 'Can the kid get
them home?'

"Just to let you know the details, there's a panel of 'experts',
telling what Vic and Burns' last moments must have been like, how
you're all on your own now to do all these critical orbital
calculations, and, oh yeah, that apparently some of Nostradomes's
quatrains refered to the _Icarus_ - something about "the great bird
crippled in the night" - looks like the death of your brilliant chief
engineer is only the first of many woes to befall you guys, and that
none of you will ever make it back to Earth alive."

"Thanks a lot, Kyle," Andrea told the video screen as his voice droned
on.  "When I get home, remind me to read you _your_ obituary over
coffee!"


T + 657 days

"It's been a week now since we have lost our friends," Mercuriou
stated.  Everyone else was silent.

"We have no graves to dig, we have no bodies to bury.
 We have our memories, and we have their dreams.
 We have hope; we have loss.
 We have the past, and we have the future."

It became that the captain was extemporizing, trying to find a way
to finish.  Andrea finished for him.

"We have the hope of seeing them again."
 

T + 658 days

Alister begins maneuvering the cargo modules.  He can get them home,
but the trip's going to take a lot longer than anyone had planned on.

Without the 747,  all they could do was line up all the modules
in more or a less a row, with one rocket engine in the very rear,
and spend days under light thrust to make a burn.


T + 690 days

Mercuriou paused at the sickbay hatch.  Nobody had opened it since
Vic's death.  He keyed the lock, opened the hatch and pulled himself
through.  Yeats followed behind as the captain began looking for the
ibuprofin tablets.

"So what are you thinking?" she said after a moment.

He answered with a snort as he retrieved the bottle.  "You don't want
to know what I'm thinking."

"Yes, I do."

He looked up at her.  "This part of your suicide watch?"

"No, I really want to know what you're thinking."

He looked back down at the capsules in his hand, dry swallowed two and
shoved the rest back into the container.  Then he floated still and
was silent for a while.  Encompassing sickbay with a wave of his arm,
he answered.

"I knew this thing was dangerous.  I guess I just always figured if
somebody was going to die, it was going to be me, so... so what,
right?  I didn't think it would be my best friends."

"We all knew it was dangerous..." she started to answer.

"No.  You were right.  I've cut so many corners on this thing, this
mission, I might as well have reached out and killed them myself.
I... I just don't...  I just should never have come."

Andrea lowered her voice, moved closer, and took Marcelius Mercurio by
the arm.

"Look, let me tell you something I've never really told anyone.  I've
been on two space shuttle launches, and watched a dozen more from
Mission Control.  And every time, I mean _every_time_ they say 'Go at
throttle up'..."  Her voice drifted off and she choked back tears.

"You know why Challenger blew up?  The engineers knew it was too cold
to launch.  But the managers thought, well, maybe we can let it slid a
bit this time, it's always worked before, no big deal."

"Everyone cuts corners," she continued.  "People cut corners driving
their cars - 'oh, I'm not that tired, I'll be OK to drive' - people
cut corners at work - 'it'll be OK, we need to get it out by the
deadline' - people cut corners at home - 'Johny'll have another ball
game next week, I'll make that one'.  People cut corners all the time
- it's a fact of life," she emphasized as he shook his head and pulled
away.

"Not when people's lives are at stake," he answered.

"So you're a perfectionist," she stated in a matter-of-fact tone.

"You're damn right I'm a perfectionist," he shot back.

"And they died because you weren't perfect.  Your plan wasn't perfect,
your ship wasn't perfect, and you weren't perfect."  He looked her
right in the eye.  "But _I_ knew your plan wasn't perfect, and I came
anyway.  And they knew it wasn't perfect, and they still followed
you."  Now he looked down and away.  "And we both know _you_'re not
perfect... but you're here for a reason, Marc.  Just remember that."

"Look, I guess you can forgive me... I just don't know if I can forgive
myself.  I mean..." his voice drifted off.

"It's over.  It may take you a long time to forgive yourself; heck,
you may _never_ forgive yourself, but it's over.  How do think we felt
after _Challenger_?  You made a mistake, but now it's time to go on."

Mercuriou nodded and said "OK", but wasn't really sure himself if he
could do it.

"And it's a bit easier since we've only one place to go."


T + 695 days

"OK, we've got OMS-17 now," Alister announced.  He, along with the
Andrea and Mercuriou, were suited up and strapped in.  Alister was
operating the computer that controlled the big-screen display.  The
others had their own computers, and Andrea was glancing back and forth
between the big screen and the checklist on own.  Mercuriou was
watching Alister on the display as he checked the computer settings.

"OMS-17 is a 37.42 mega-newton burn at 374 by 1 solar at 13:42 on T +
695.  Today _is_ T + 695.  Current time is 13:37 Universal.  Ship's
inertial attitute is 371 by 3 solar, but that... will rotate into 374
by 1 solar, check.  Ship's solar attitude is also 371 by 3 solar.
OMS-17 has a tappered entry and step cut-off, check.  It is 17 minutes
and 13 seconds in duration, check.  And it will put us on a course
back to Earth..."

He looked back at Mercuriou, who nodded.  As they waited for the
engines to fire, Mercuriou gazed out the window at Mars.

"'He was never to return to the city of his triumphs and defeats',"
he muttered aloud.

"What's that?" Andrea asked.

"Oh, nothing, just something from a book I read."  He motioned to the
sands of the red planet.

"Yeah," she said, discerning his thoughts.


T + 701 days

"One of my favorite parts of the Gospels is where Christ says that not
all who call him 'Lord, Lord' will enter the kingdom of heaven, but
only those who do the will of his Father in heaven.  Not only is it an
amazing suggestion, that God actually has a will for each and every
one of us, all six billion of us, but it provides a simple statement
of what our goal should be in life - to do the will of God."

"And I haven't done the will of God," Mercuriou stated in a flat tone.

"I don't know about that.  You've made your mistakes, but you've also
said a lot of things that needed to be said, and you've managed to
find a platform where those things actually got heard.  Now, did you
need to steal a billion dollars to do that?  I doubt it.  I suspect
you could have found another way.  This is why I don't buy the
Christians who say you have to fight against evil.  First off, it's
un-Biblical - _resist_not_he_who_is_evil_.  Second, if there was ever
a time when you could have justified a revolution, it was two thousand
years ago when slavery was as commonplace as money, paganism was the
religion of the masses, and Rome was the terror of the Mediterranean.
Yet Christ didn't condone any revolution; didn't lead a protest march
on the governor's residence; didn't stage a sit-in at the slave
auction.  Didn't do a thing to oppose his own murderers, and didn't
let his disciples oppose them either.  What he _did_ do was teach; and
in the beginning of John is this beautiful passage about the Word.
'In the beginning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the
Word was God.'  Why the Word?  Because the Word is the weapon of the
Christian, and the pen is mighter than the sword / books are the light
of the world / free speech is greatest weapon in the world."

"But if you don't believe in Jesus?"  Alister asked.  "Who's going to
listen then?"

"Well, I guess people used to believe the Earth is flat.  You can
beleive whatever you want; the fact is that the Earth is round.  And
I'm absolutely convinced that Jesus of Nazarath was the most
spiritually advanced being to ever live on Earth.  So we should take
his teachings seriously."


T + 705 days

Mercuriou: "We don't run this ship.  Burns runs this ship.  This ship
is just running on auto-pilot now."

Andrea thought about this for a moment.

"Well, we better make sure we know everything we can about how that
auto-pilot works."
 

T + 714 days

Alister had been seriously reading the Bible for the first time.
Along with the rest of the crew, he had been receiving plenty of email
from fundamentalists.  Most of the _Icarus_ crew deleted it along with
the rest of their junk mail.  Apparently Alister did not.

"Do you think we're living in the End Times?" he asked Andrea one day.

Andrea pushed away the laptop she was working on.

"Well, first of all, I don't pretend to understand the book of
Revelation.  Beasts with seven heads, strange numerology...  People
attach all kinds of meanings to it.  But I'll tell you this.  Even a
cursory reading of Revelation shows that it's not about the end of the
world."

"It isn't?"

"What happens at the end of the book?"

"There's like a thousand years of peace, right?"

Andrea nodded an affirmative response.

"So at the very least, we can say that it's about a period in human
history torn by war, oppression, deceit and disaster, that ends with
the triumph of good.  So I don't even think about the End Times; I
know people call it that, but I think about Revelation as more like
the Transition Times."

"What do you have to do to be saved?  Everyone says something different."

"Well, that's the nice part.  Revelation doesn't tell us how to live;
the Gospels do that, and in fairly plain language, at least compared
to Revelation.  That's why I don't pay too much attention to
Revelation.  Maybe I should, but when I read the Bible, it's usually
the Gospels, because that's where Jesus tells us how to live.  And the
basic rules are pretty simple: Love God - unconditionally, and love
your fellow man - unconditionally.  And maybe everyone says something
different because even though that sounds easy, it can be really tough
to figure it out in practice."

"What about the Old Testament; do you read that?"

"Sometimes.  There are deeply profound insights in the Old Testament,
but it can't be taken completely at face value.  Christ flat-out
rejected many of the Old Testament teachings, such as the stoning
statues.  Perhaps like the entire Bible, it's a mixed bag; parts
of it are inspired by God, and parts of it are the errors of men.
other parts of it were put there by
men, and that makes it hard to understand."


T + 729 days

With cork puller still attached, the cork went flying unheaded across
the cabin as the Captain grabed for the plastic cover and slapped it over
the top of the wine bottle.  Even so, several gobs of the red alcohol
went floating into the air, the liquid's surface tension forming them
into perfectly round spheres.  Andrea shook her head.

"You'd think that after two and a half years in space, you'd have learned
how to open a wine bottle without spilling it everywhere."

"What I've learned," the Captain answered, as he spun across the
compartment and swallowed one of the larger floating drops, "is that
if you spill wine in space, it's a lot easier to clean up than on
Earth!"

"Alister, the picnic's starting!"  Andrea called out.

"I'll be there in a minute," came the reply from the next module.

Mercurio spilt only a few more drops as he "poured" the wine into two
wine glasses, each one quickly covered with a flat plastic square.
Drinking from straws was much easier, but an hour earlier, after
Andrea suggested a picnic lunch, Marc had dug into the ship's stores
and produced the glasses alongside the bottle, and Andrea had stood on
tradition.

"Cheers."

They clinked glasses and laughed together as the Captain spilled wine
all over his face as he tried to drink it.  Andrea grabbed a towel.

"You guys better come in here!" Alister yelled, then got up and
propelled himself through the hatchway.

"Well, m-maybe you want to come in here," he stammered as he watched
Andrea trying to clean the wine from Mercuriou's face.

"What's up?" the grinning Captain asked.

"Somebody just smashed an airplane into the World Trade Center!"

Burns once told Mercuriou that there are no great men, only great
ideas, and that genius is that rare ability to venture deep into the
dim recesses of ideaspace to retrieve the rare gems, that energy and
mass are the same thing, related by the square of the speed of light.
Why the speed of light?  Why it's _square_?  That was the fine-cut
diamond Albert Einstein pulled from the rough.  Tom Clancy was such a genius.  
Khalid Shaikh Mohammed was another.  Both men had discovered the same fiery sapphire,
that unbenonst to the masses of mortal men, a passenger jet can be
used as a _guided_missile_.  One of these geniuses buried his
discovery in the pages of a novel.  The other held it up to the sun
for all the world to see its blazing red light that terrible September
morning.

"Another Timothy McVeigh or something.  The country is so hated.  I
thought about it; hell, you can say a lot about me, Andrea, that I'm a
thief and all that, but I never did anything like this."

The picnic was forgotten.  At 1431 GMT, September 11, 2001, after
first the event on Earth and then a radio transmission lag of exactly
3 minutes 17 seconds, the silent crew of three watched the second
tower collapse.  In the days ahead, it would be revealed that Islamic
terrorists had hijacked four American airlines.  Coincidently, or
perhaps not, all were Boings.  Two had slammed, full throttle, into
the twin towers of World Trade Center, at one time the tallest
buildings in the world, and headquarters to dozens of major companies.
Burns would have suggested imagining the pictures you've seen of jet
crash scenes, then trying to project it 100 stories above you onto a
skyscraper in lower Manhattan.  Within hours, the buildings fell.
Burns would have then made a quick calculation based on the potential
energy of a given mass at a given height along with the published
weight of construction materials used in the skyscrapers to estimate
the energy released by their collapse at ten kilotons of TNT - the
size of a small atomic bomb.  Bankers, mail men, fire fighters, bus
boys brokers, firemen, CEOs, bus boys,
 - all lost their lives that terrible
morning.

Within days, the nation mobilized.  Medical teams sprung into action,
fire fighters dove into the wreckage alongside men who walked up on
the street and volunteered, desperate to find anything or anyone still
alive in the tons of rubble.  At Andrea's suggestion, Mercuriou issued
a statement of condolence, expressing his "deapest reget", and stating
that it grieved him as nearly as much the death of his "dear friend
Burns".  The entire crew followed suit.  Asked via videomail by the
press about his comparison with Burns, he replied that though he
deeply felt the loss in New York, he was sure the family's victims
would concer that no one feels a loss more acutely than that of a
loved one.  The media largely accepted this.

Within weeks, the President attacked Afghanistan after correctly
finguring Osama bin Ladin as the culprit.  The Captain began objecting
to the President's behavior, stating publically than an orderly extradition
procedure should be followed rather than an invasion.  Andrea Yeats
said that all parties should try to resolve their problems peacefully,
though she ruefully noted that the Muslems would do good to accept
Christ, and ruffled feathers by suggesting that the terrorists,
misguided though they may have been, were probably the only people
that morning who got on the airplanes because they were trying to do
God's will.

Within months, most of the old animosities had resurfaced.  The
Captain was still openly critical of the western democratic
establishment in general, and the President in particular.
Dr. Yeats became far more prominent, and far more controversial, by
her repeated advice to end the war, moarn over the dead, then ask
ourselves why so many people hated the country and decide to give our
lives over to God to do something about it.

While the political prong of the twin assult had failed, the economic
prong had succeeded beyond belief.  Considering not only the twin
towers of the World Trade Center, but the smaller buildings destroyed,
or ravaged with all their windows blown out, plus the entire
multi-block area that had been shut down for months, the center of New
York City's financial district had been devastated.

In Maryland, a youth's dream earlier that year had prophesied disaster
for the United States and war in the Middle East.  In Texas, a
fifth-grader had told his teacher the day before that World War III
was going to start tomorrow, and that the United States was going to
lose.  In Afghanistan, an Islamic militant had a dream that his nation
defeated the United States in a soccer match, and that all of their
players were dressed as airline pilots.  In Afghanistan, in Iraq, or
perhaps in Khartoum, Osama bin Laden was smiling.


T + 733 days

"Maybe you shouldn't go on TV right now."

Mercuriou said nothing.  He was busy preparing the video equipment for
a transmission to Earth.

"Maybe it's not the best time," Yeats repeated her observation.

"Why?  Because the country's been hurt too bad to hear the truth?"

"I just think maybe you should wait a while longer."

Mercuriou stopped himself and thought about this carefully.

"Look, it's like claxons going off in a cockpit.  Brrrmpf!  Brrrmpf!
Brrrmpf! Whoop, whoop, pull up!  Whoop, whoop, pull up!  And if the
co-pilot just stays meek and silent, then the plane's going to crash!"

"No.  You said it yourself, Andrea.  The Word.  It has to be heard.
Turn on the camera, Alister.  Turn it on."



T + 734 days

"Took advantage of freedom!?"  Mercuriou practically spit the words
out.  The old Mercuriou was back, the Mercuriou that hadn't
faced disaster on Mars, the Mercuriou that hadn't listened
to Andrea Yeats for the last two years.

"Took advantage of freedom!  You make it sound like anybody can just
walk up to one of these training companies, 'hey, I'd like to learn to
fly a 767'... 'sure, no problem'.  You've got to have _money_ to fly!
How many people listening to this program would love to learn to fly
but _it's_too_expensive_... Took advantage of freedom!  They took
advantage of _capitalism_!  They had the one thing that will make
people say 'yes' in a society that says 'no', 'No', 'NO' - money!
They took advantage of the fact that Osama bin Laden is a
_multimillionare_!"

All of his opponents were on the program, arranged on the TV screen in
a montage of talking heads. [CA] Ecks was speechless, unable to decide
if Mercuriou was defending the terrorists or attacking the
capitalists.  Wye, red-faced with rage, sputtered nonsense.  Only Zee
remained stony and impassive, and it was he who answered the space
captain now.

"Yes, captain, they took advantage of capitalism, they took advantage
of democracy, they took advantage of freedom.  They came here, lived
in this country, supped the abundent fruits of our liberty, then
turned on her like a cur lashing out at the hand that feeds her. [CA]
They took our freedom and used it to murder three thousand people!"

"Well, who you gonna attack?  The political leaders, the President?
They'll just elect a new one and keep going, all hot to avenge him,
too.  I mean, who really is responsible?  Isn't it the people,
themselves?  Isn't that what they keep screaming, that it's the people
that run the government?  The majority that elects these guys?  Since
it's _the_people_ who run democracy, shouldn't we hold _the_people_
responsible?  And isn't that who was in the World Trade Center?"

A new voice joined the debate.

"Certainly not all of them.  The attack was completely
indiscriminate."

"Completely indiscriminate!  Completely indiscriminate!  The attack
was directly focused on the biggest symbol of capitalism on this
planet!  I mean, those people in there were _the_true_beleivers_!
They were the _capitalists_!"

"I'm sure there were window washers there, too."

"OK, fine.  A lot of innocent people died, and a lot of firefighters
trying to save lives.  But the majority of the people in those twin
towers represented the majority of the people of the United States.  I
mean, this kind of crap!" he gestured to the television monitor.  "All
we keep hearing about is this is what the majority wants, this is the
voice of the majority, the majority, the majority, like they're the
only ones that count!  Well, _the_majority_ of the people in those
towers was _the_majority_, and they didn't come to work that morning
to help make the world a better place, they were
_in_it_for_themselves_ because _that's_what_runs_democracy."

"It doesn't make a difference."

"It doesn't make a difference!?!  And on God's earth, why, woman, why?"

Earth-bound television viewers were witnessing a bizarre display.
Ecks, Wye and Zee had fallen silent, while Merceriou carried on an
animated discussion with the unseen Andrea Yeats.  Only her voice
could be heard from off screen.

"Because you _forgive_your_enemies_, as I've only tried to tell you
about a thousand times [CA]," Andrea was becoming irate.  "You don't
smash airplanes into their skyscrapers because they imposed some
global capitalist system on you, you don't steal a billion dollars to
get what you want, and you don't go off invading foreign countries
because they don't turn terrorist leaders over to you when you bark
out your dictats."

Mercuriou was silent for a moment.

"There's a lot of young men dying in that country right now because
they're going to do what they've been told all their life, that their
country is under attack, and it's their duty to defend it, and
everything our boys have been told and believe!  And this guy, this
president, he doesn't declare war, he doesn't attempt some extridition
process, he doesn't try to get a security council resolution, he just
declares, 'if you're not with us, you're against us', and just barks
out this order to hand over bin Laden!  I mean, the same stupid thing
that started World War I!  And where was all the screaming then, that
Austria had been attacked by _terrorists_, _TERRORISTS_ I tell you,
and their allies - Russia, France, English, and THE UNITED STATES were
supporting _TERRORISM_!!!"

"My God!" he exclaimed.  "Can they really not figure it out?!  Can
they really not see that capitalism is one of the most depraved
philosphies that has even been proposed for men to live?!  Can they
really believe all their own propaganda and think this thing is some
kind of utopia?  I mean, which is worse: fascism, based on just
conquering your neighbors; communism, based on overthrowing your
government in some revolution; or capitalism, based on just doing for
yourself and letting some _invisible_hand_ take care of the rest?"

"Maybe they're just incompetent," Alister interjected.

"Incompotent?" Mercuriou answered.  Yeats, too, raised a puzzled eye.

"Yeah, like me trying to fly this spaceship.  Incompetent."

The crew broke out in laughter as his self-defacing humor.  Encouraged,
he went on.

"No, really, maybe people just don't know the difference between right
and wrong.  Maybe they can't choose good leaders because they don't
know how."

Mercuriou said nothing, but the expression that ran across his face
told him to be in accord with the young man's words.  Andrea broke
the silence.

"It's very hard to tell the difference between right and wrong,
Alister.  That's why Christianity is so important.  It gives us very
important guideposts to help make those decisions."

"That's why religion is so important, Alister.  It gives us just about
the only guideposts we've got for finding that difference."



T + 770 days

"What would Vic have thought about all this?" Alister asked after dinner.

Andrea answered first. "Vic probably would have said that we're too
primitive as a species to possess a technology as advanced as jet
aircraft.  He was always advocating a return to simpler times."

"Do you beleive we're too advanced for jet aircraft?"  There was no
trace of sarcasm in Alister's voice.  He had already concluded that
humanity was too primitive to be flying to Mars, too primitive to have
nuclear power, too primitive to have global data networks, too
primitive to have hyperdermic needles, and was genuinely wondering
about jet aircraft.

Andrea took a deep breath before answering.

"I believe technology is neutral.  It's a tool; just a different kind
of tool, a knowledge-based tool.  Tools aren't good or evil; it's what
men choose to do with them that makes them good or evil.  No, that's
not quite right, the tool isn't made good or evil, it's the choice
itself that forms good and evil.  I agree with Vic to the extent that
we're really too primitive to even evaluate good and evil.  I mean, a
significant segment of mankind still beleives that God doesn't exist."

Alister frowned, puzzled.  "You think that makes us primitive?"

"Sure," Andrea replied.  "A lot of people once beleived that the Earth
was stationary and the Sun revolved around it.  Do you think that
people with that belief are too primitive for manned spaceflight?"

"Manned spaceflight would be basically impossible with that belief
set," Mercuriou answered.

"Don't be so sure," Andrea answered.  "Men sailed around the globe
without even accurate timepieces to measure longitude.  Planck
formulated the core of quantum mechanics based on the amount of light
given off by a block of metal as you heat it.  The first computers
were built with _vacuum_tubes_, not transistors.  Don't underestimate
human ingenuity, Captain.  Men even flew to Mars in a 747."

Merciriou was forced to grin, and Andrea continued.

"The point is that such a belief set is a severe handicap to manned
spaceflight, but doesn't exclude it completely.  Likewise, atheism is
a severe handicap to making moral value judgements, but doesn't
completely preclude figuring out that murder is wrong, at least in
some cases.  In other cases, you'll find people absolutely insisting
that they _have_to_kill_ for the sake of their 'freedom'.  You'll find
people who _do_ believe in God clinging to this belief that you impose
all these intellectual property restrictions on this technology, then
absolutely insisting that this is consistent with the Christian
gospel.  That's how primitive we are.  Two thousand years ago we were
told _Give_to_all_those_who_beg_of_you_ and half of us still don't
beleive that it was God speaking and the other half still can't
understand what it means."


T + 904 days

"What's going to happen to the United States, Captain?" Alister asked.
"I mean, is it another Soviet Union, really?"

Mercurio was silent for a minute.  Only the hum of the air conditioner
could be heard.  The young chemist had blurt out the question that
millions of people had wondered at times, and much more recently since
September 11.

"Well, I don't for sure; I don't have a crystal ball or anything.  I
don't think it's going to change; the country seems absolutely
committed to capitalism, and it _is_ absolutely committed to
democracy."  He threw up his arms in an air of desperation, like a man
watching a ship full of drowning people helplessly from the shore.
"Hell, I hope I'm wrong.  I hope they can work out their problems."

"But you don't think they will."  Andrea's response was more a
statement than a question, but the captain shook his head in response.

"No," he answered softly, then took a deep breath and exhaled.
"They've got as serious a problem with capitalism as they once had
with slavery.  The entire society is based on it; it's absolutely
entrenched.  They're not going to just change.  My best guess is that
its people'll just rip it apart from within.  It keeps getting more
and more violent, and the only solution the democrats have is to keep
cracking down harder and getting tougher.  Eventually the violence of
its own people will destroy it.  That's my best guess."


T + 974 days

"Do you support the War on Terror?"

Andrea: "I don't support any war.  Christ taught us to forgive our enemies,
and that's exactly what we should do.  In one sense, it shouldn't
be that hard since the men who actually carried out the attacks
died along with everyone else.  It's time to bury the dead,
mourn over the victims, clean up the rubble, and really ask
ourselves why our country is so hated that people would do
this to us.  And that answer is pretty clear, I think."

"Dr. Yeats, what is the answer?  What do you think the U.S. should do
next?"

"I think we decide to really help the people of the world instead of
just talking constantly about (money and) politics.  Let's take all
this technology, publish everything we know about how it works, make
all that information freely available on the Internet, help third
world countries develop their own microchip manufacuring facilities,
their own chemical plants, their own robotic factories, etc.  Of
course, that means giving up our 'competitive advantage' that we hear
so much about.  It means helping people feed themselves, helping them
educate themselves, helping them build their own infrastructure,
instead of constantly talking about freedom while we pursue our own
selfish ends."

"What about the heroism of the hijackers?  What about the heroism of
the young men who were willing to give their lives because they
beleived that they were acting in their people's best interest?
There were probably the only people who got on those planes that
morning because they were trying to do the will of God."

"Why aren't they heros?  We hear constantly about the heros who are
bombing Afghanistan; why are they heros and these men aren't?  I mean,
they were willing to sacrifice their lives for some greater good;
isn't that heroism?  What difference does it make whether the evil
they were trying to fight was capitalism or terrorism, or whether it
really is evil, or if they just beleive it in their minds, or if
terrorism is really heroic, or if war on terrorism is really heoric?
Isn't heroism about giving of yourself for someone else, and even
if it's misguided, isn't it still worthy of our respect?"

Mercurio: "I don't think we need all these security restrictions.
First of all, most of them wouldn't have stopped the terrorists
on 9-11.  They didn't have guns, or bombs, or chemicals of any kind.
And, frankly, a knife is so easy to conceal; I mean, you can take
a sharpened stone that won't trigger a single metal detector,
jam it into the sole of your shoe or something; it'd be so easy to
get knifes on board the airplanes.  I doubt you even need weapons
of any kind.  A half dozen men well trained in martial arts is
probably good enough."

"So how can we stop future attacks?"

"There aren't going to be any future attacks, not like this.  We saw
that in Pennsylanvia.  It took about an hour for the rules to change.
It used to be, if someone hijacked an airplane, you just put up your
hands and said, 'OK, where you want to go?  Claim your responsibility.
Make your demands.'  Now, that's all changed.  The passengers and crew
won't let hijackers take over a plane again.  They'll crash it first.
So there just aren't going to be any more attacks like this one.
That's why they used four planes; they knew it was a one-shot deal."

"So we should just do nothing and let the terrorists win?"

"First of all, a lot of what can be done has been done.  Like I said,
there aren't going to be any more 9-11 style attacks with airplanes.
Next, there isn't a whole lot you can do.  Especially if these anthrax
letters are the next in a series of attacks.  If each attack is
radically different from the last, if each one exploits a different
avenue of attack, really, what can you do?  Maybe hope your intelligence
people can penetrate the organization or at least figure out how
they coordinate and communiate, that's about it.  Everything else
is just reacting to the last attack."

"This notion that they exploited the freedom of our society is absurd.
They exploited capitalism, and they were able to exploit it because
they were backed by a multi-millionaire.  If they didn't have
thousands of dollars in funding, would the great 'free' society have
trained them on how to fly these jets?  Would the airlines have just
let them fly for nothing while they were scouting them out?  Would
they have even been let on the planes that morning if they hadn't
swipped through a credit card first?  Money is how capitalism controls
people, and if the terrorists hadn't had money, the 'free' society
would have slammed every door shut in their faces."

Mercurio cut him off.  "They would never have been let on those planes
without money.  They would never have been let on those planes.  They
didn't exploit freedom... they exploited capitalism!"


T + 1033 days

"So what are you reading now?"

"_Faust_, in German.  Another book I've only read in translation."

"What's it about?"

"Well, _Faust_ is the story of a man who sells his soul to the
devil to get his youth back."

"Did you start reading all this stuff in college?"

"No, I started reading all this stuff in high school.  My parents
bought me a set of about fifty books called 'Great Book of the Western
World'.  It had been assembled by this univeristy professor named
Mortimer Adler who believed in liberal education, that by reading the
works of great authors you can peer into the human soul.  It was in
college, I started reading all this stuff in the native languages -
'Great Books' was all in translation."

"So what makes a great book?"

"Well, for starters it should be well written, though there have been
some spectacularly poorly written great books.  The real criteria,
more than anything else, is that it has to be part of what Adler
called the 'Great Conversation', carried out over centuries, from one
age to the next, by men and women discussing the 'Great Ideas' -
things like love, war, religion, government.  Each author, in his own
time, had read those before him and then added something of his own to
the conversation."

"But don't people talk about those kinds of things all the time?
There's all kinds of books written about religion and politics."

"Yes, but a truly great book has to add something new to the
conversation; it can't just regurgitate old ideas.  And there's a
definite, almost snobby intellectual bias to Adler, but then you read
something like _Zen_and_the_Art_of_Motorcycle_Maintence_ and you get a
whole different perspective on the Great Books program.  My only real
problem with it was that it was all in translation."

"What's wrong with reading stuff in translation?"

"Well first of all, some of the translations, especially the Great
Books translations of the ancient Greeks, were absolutely horrible.
All the sexual double-entendres were lost.  I've heard they've
improved.  But then you take something like _this_, I mean, _Faust_ is
almost untranslatable - it's an epic poem, and poetry is very hard to
translate."

"But you can translate the ideas, right, that's what important, isn't
it?"

"Yes, but there is also beauty in language, too.  Take the Gettysburg
Address.  'We can not dedicate, we can not consecrate, we can not
hallow this ground.'  I mean, is this poetry or prose?  Lincoln didn't
just communicate the ideas, he did it with such beauty and power that
the words _endure_ - and they carry the ideas with them.  That's what
makes a great author, Alister, not just that they write down their
ideas, but that they so craft the language to practically compel you
to listen."


T + 1094 days

Big government was in.  A national newsmagazine aired a segment
featuring an interview with a woman who said, "I just assumed if there
was a problem, there'd be a law in place to deal with it."

"Now why would you assume that?"  Mercuriou asked the TV screen
as he watched the program.  "Why would you assume that for _every_
problem we've got, the solution is another law?"

"I know people who don't wear their seatbelts," Andrea said.  Car
safety was the topic of the broadcast.  "They prefer to say a prayer
when they get in the car instead of putting on their seatbelts."

"Exactly!" Mercuriou exclaimed.  "Now who the hell is the great
_majority_ to tell someone that they can't do that; that they
can't decide for themselves to wear that seatbelt or not?"

"I'll tell you why," he went on.  "It's not only because the majority
has no real respect for anyone else, not only because once they've
made a decision for themselves they can see no reason not to impose it
on others, but the simple fact is _they've_got_no_other_solutions_.
The only way they know how to deal with _any_ problem they've got is
more laws, more rules, more regulations.  It's inconsivable to them to
find real solutions to their problems!  They choose absolute garbage
for their leaders, and then when they've got problems, and you better
beleive that a society run by capitalists, or communists, or fascists
is going to have problems, their 'solutions' are always the same - get
tough.  They can't figure out that they need to choose good leaders in
the first place, and that the answer to every problem isn't some new
law."

"I'll tell you why," he went on.  "It's not only because the majority
has no real respect for anyone else, not only because once they've
made a decision for themselves they can see no reason not to impose it
on others, but the simple fact is _democracy_defines_right_and_wrong_!
These people have no conception of how to behave except what is
defined by the government!  What's right is what's legal, what's wrong
is what's illegal, and there's nothing else!  There's no point at
which the majority can conceive that something that is wrong wouldn't
be prohibited by a law!  It's just completely beyond these people that
the force of government should be used to absolute minimum and that
people have to ask themselves what is right and wrong!  Democracy
makes all these decisions for you!"


T + 1253 days

"Five."

"Four."

"Three."

"Two."

"One."

Alister's voice clipped off the final seconds, then the computer
began the insertion burn.  The slight force from the engine
pushed the crew gently backwards into their seats.  The
computer screen next to the engineer showed their current
tragectory, in blue, an open hyperbola that skittered out
off the screen, and their target tragectory, a neat red
circle centered on a green disk that represented Earth.
As the engines fired, the blue line began curving more
strongly back towards the direction they were coming from,
as another clock ticked down more seconds.

"Orbital interface in five, four, three, two, one, Earth orbit."

The blue line flicked neatly into a broad ellipse.  Alister breathed a
sigh of relief.  Almost nothing, short of something absurdly
catostraphic, like crashing into the atmosphere, could stop them from
getting back to Earth now.  Even if the engine failed now, they would
be in some crazy orbit that the OTV's could get them down from almost
no matter what.

"ECO in five; four; three; two; one; Engine Cutoff."

The thrust stopped, just as the blue and red lines had merged into a
single yellow circle.  They were siting in a circular, six-hour
parking orbit above the heart of the African continent, clearly
visible through the OTV's portholes.

"Perfect burn," Alister declared, as he broke out into a wide grin and
let out a whoop.  "I almost expected a disaster."  (did you really?)

"Sometimes you make it back alive, Alister," Andrea declared as she
unbuckled.  "I've done it twice already."

"There's South Africa!" the young man whooped, pointing out the
window.

"There's South Africa!"


T + 1257 days

"Hey, look what I found!"

The crew was preparing to depart the ship, moving all their personal
possesions, as well as anything they wanted to return with, into the
OTV.

Alister launched himself into A-core wearing a black T-shirt
emblazzened in front with a likeness of Albert Einstein, holding a
marijuana joint in one hand, its smoke forming the letters "E=mc2"
near his head.

"That's one of Burns', isn't it?" asked Mercuriou.

"Yeah, I found it in the electronics lab."



T + 1262 days

In the next few days, the crew had moved all their personal
belongings, along with anything they wanted to return with into OTV 2,
secured everything else they were leaving on the ship, and finally
fired the OTV's one rocket to drop towards a rendevous with the
partially completed International Space Station.

Mercuriou looked back towards his crew, grined, then opened the
pressure door.  For the first time in almost three and a half years,
they set eyes on someone else.  It wasn't who they expected.

"Dr. Andrea Yeats!" exclaimed the booming, heavily accented voice
of an overweight Russian cosmonaut.

"Borzov!  They didn't tell me you were still here!  Why didn't Kyle
tell me?"  Andrea broke out in amazed laughter.

"I wouldn't let him!" the Russian snorted.  "_Still_ here!  Yes,
the whole time I've been up here waiting for you."

"Have you really?"

"No, Andrea, of course not."  Everyone broke up laughing.

"But I was here when you launched, and I've come back up just to greet
you!  Captain, I would have sent you off with a bottle of Russia's
finest if you had only stopped by!"

Mercuriou found himself somewhat awkwardly clasped by a simultaneous
bearhug and handshake.

"Thank you, spaseba..."

"Ah, you speak some Russian, oyeng xoropho!"

_Columbia_ was the space shuttle slatted to return the _Icarus_ crew.
They had docked the day before on the tail end of a scientific
mission.  Plus the space station's standard three-man crew, the head
count in orbit now balloned to thirteen.  (no one thought this number
significant) After an exchange of gifts and introductions, a dinner
followed.  The _Icarus_ crew, after an almost completely vegetarian
diet, tore into the space station's freeze-dried meats, while the
shuttle and space station astronauts showed a marked preferenced for
the fresh vegetables from _Icarus_.  Afterwards, Borzov predictably
produced two bottles of "Russia's finest" and began passing vodka
shots around.

"So, Captain," the cosmonaut asked, "what do you think will happen to
you back on Earth?"

The space station fell quiet, at least as quiet as all the machinery
running would allow.

"Well, I don't know," drawled the intoxicated Mercuriou.  9/11 was the
only other time on the mission he'd been even mildly inebriated.  "I
suppose there'll be some kind of big civil trial, for all the money.
Probably there'll be a criminal trial first, we broke a lot of
computer crime laws.  I don't know.  Maybe some prison time.  Who
knows?"

"There's another way down, you know."

Borzov, despite having drunk more than three times any of the others,
didn't seem particularly drunk.

"Seriously, captain, _Columbia_ is not the only way off this station.
There are many in Russia who have heard your words against capitalism.
There is also a Soyuz capsule attached here, too."

A different kind of quiet settled over the space station.  Andrea broke
the spell.

"Communism dies hard, eh, Vladymir?"

"Communism _is_ dead, nawsha tovarisha, but not everyone is my country
believes capitalism is the best thing for Russia."

"And democracy?"

Borzov shrugged.  "We're defined more by our limitations than by our
abilities, my dear, as I have tried to tell you many times."

"Defined by our limitations?" Alister asked.

"Yes, young man.  Defined by our limitations.  Our friend Andrea talks
a lot about religion, doesn't she?  All these people who talk about
religion, talk about giving to all who beg of them, talk about
forgiving their enemies, and then go to work for the capitalists on
Monday morning, why?  Because they are
_defined_by_their_limitations_."

Borzov let his words sink in, then continued.

"Captain, would you say your mission has been defined more by your
abilities or more by your limitations?"

"Limitations, definitely," Mercuriou answered quietly, but without
hesitation.

"You see!  _Defined_by_our_limitations_, young Alister Compton!
Andrea here believes men can walk on water!" Borzov exclaimed, perhaps
extracting a small vengeance for Andrea's remark about communism.  "So
why, my dear, do we need ships?"

Andrea answered slowly.  "We can't walk on water because our faith in
God isn't strong enough, I think that's the only answer really
consistent with the Gospel."

"A limitation of faith!"  Borzov exclaimed.  "Or perhaps her
limitation is her inability to accept that the world
_is_completely_deterministic_ and _there_is_no_God_!"  and that
_anything_heavier_than_water_sinks_!"

"People can overcome their limitations, Vladymir."

"That's part of how they define us, Andreaysha!"

"Booker Washington."

A puzzled look crossed Borzov's face.  His English was not perfect,
and he had not understand this last remark from the _Icarus_
captain.

"I'm sorry?..."

"Booker Washington," Mercuriou repeated.  "He said that we should
judge men not by what they've achieved, but by what they've overcome
to achieve it."

"Ah," Borzov comprehended.  "One of your great authors.  And was
'Booker Washington' defined by _his_ limitations?"

"Absolutely," replied Mercuriou after a moment of thought.  "He could
never accept how bitterly race has divided my country."

The silence that followed this remark was broken by Ilan Ramon,
an Israeli air force cournel turned _Columbia_ payload specialist.

"I'll tell you what I think'll happen if you go back home", he
interjected.  The other astronauts turned to face him.

"Captain, I haven't hung on your every word, like the people in your
country, but I've spent enough time among Americans while training for
this mission to tell you there are basically three kinds of reactions
to you.  Some people just think you're nuts and dismiss everything you
say as the words of a lunatic.  Others listen; they don't believe
everything, but they do listen.  And some hate you so passionately you
may not be able to walk down the street without a police escort."

"Personally, I think you're the biggest thief I've ever met in my
life.  They'll probably give you jail time.  I think you expect it,
and I think you deserve it."

Mercuriou nodded.  "Thank you," he answered Borzov, after a pause.
"SHPASEBO. BOLSHOIUS SHPASEBO.  But I'll take the shuttle.  Col. Ramon
is right.  I am a thief, and maybe I'll get some clemency, and maybe I
won't, but I'd just rather go home now."

"You might want to consider putting _him_ on that Soyuz," Ramon
continued, indicating Alister.  "From what I've heard, he had a good
bit to do with your hacks; he might end up on trial, too.  At the very
least, your police will want to question him extensively about Burns'
methods.  And he's not even from your country."

Marc stared at Alister, then nodded slightly before looking to Borzov.

"Can he take the Soyuz?  What are the terms?"

"Yes, we've talked about him.  We'll let him go to any country that'll
take him, but that might be a problem.  He could end up stuck in
Russia if South Africa decides to extridite him to the U.S."

"And if the government changes in Moscow?" Andrea asked.

Borzov roared out a deep-bellied laugh.

"My dear, how many times have I told you, _governments_are_always_
_changing_in_Moscow_!"

"Go home, son," the Israeli advised.  "People like young pilots to be
their national heros, trust me, I know.  Go home."

Alister looked back and forth at his two crewmates.

"Whatever you want to do is fine with me," Mercuriou told him.

"I'll take my chances with my own people, then," Alister finally
stated then continued slowly.  "I'll take the Russian Soyuz and then
hand myself over to the South African embassy in Moscow.  If they
extridite, they extridite."

"OK, then that's what we'll do."



T + 1265 days

"That's everything?"  Alister asked.

"Pretty much," Andrea called up from _Columbia_'s mid-deck.

Borzov had been blustering, at least somewhat.  He had no desire
to use the escape Soyuz, and had talked Alister into staying
on the space station, or at least the docked OTV module, until
another Soyuz had been sent up.  Almost all of the gear had
been transferred now to _Columbia_, leaving only Alister's
personal effects and some food on the OTV.

Mercuriou turned to Borzov.

"Feel free to move the OTV if it's in your way."

"How do you say it?" the Russian answered, "'The keys are in the ignition'?"

Mercuriou nodded.  Andrea had come back up out of _Columbia_.

"Everybody else is on board.  I guess this is goodbye."

Alister practically broke down in tears.  Andrea did break down,
and hugged the young man strongly.  Mercuriou did almost the
same, with a bearhug more comfortable than Borzov's and less
intimate than Yeats'.  They shook hands.

"I can't believe this.  I mean, I guess I knew this day would come,
but I just can't believe this is goodbye."

Alister looked from him back to Andrea during these last moments
together, then asked an obvious question.

"Do you think we'll ever come back to _Icarus_, I mean, it's still up
there, do you think there'll be a follow-up mission?

Andrea answered first.

"A follow-up?  No, not for me; for you, maybe, you're young enough.
I've abandoned space flight once in my life, and I'm abandoning it
again.  Vic was right.  Our problems are here on Earth."

Mercuriou nodded slowly.

"Yeah, I'll see you on Earth, man, but I think I'm done for space
travel, too."

"But I thought we were going to jumpstart space travel!  Develop this
new fuel!  Get mankind into space!  Grow crops!  Make clothes!  Mine
the asteroid belt!"

Mercuriou answered now, slowly.

"No, that was just my sales pitch.  My real reason was... it was a
stunt.  It was biggest stage I could think of to get myself heard.
And Andrea kept telling me I had already done that, that my most
important mission goal had been achieved, but I wouldn't listen."

Alister fell quiet.

"So what was the point then, that it was all for nothing, and this is
the end?"

"No, think about it, Alister," the captain answered slowly but with
conviction.  His thoughts drifted back to college.  _Rhetoric._
_Maybe_they_should_have_required_a_class_in_honesty_instead._

"This nerve we've struck with people, the
stuff we've talked about - freedom, democracy, religion, God - this is
the stuff Socrates debated in Athens,
the stuff Plato and Aristotle wrote about, St. Matthew and Thomas
Aquinas, this is the soul of a species.  Karl Marx, Victor Hugo, Leo
Tolstoy, and none of them had all the answers.  I mean, if this is the
stuff _they_ talked about _then_, and it's the same stuff _we're_
talking about _now_..."

The captain's voice trailed off.  Behind him, _Columbia_ gleamed in
the razor-sharp sun.

"There is no beginning.  There is no end.  This is the Great
Conversation."


======================================================================
======================================================================
======================================================================

			   ===== NOTES =====

T - 691 days <****>

"The hack"

strong setting, Silicon Valley during the dot-com boom; strong plot, a
blow-by-blow of a major hack; moderate character development, we see a
bit of Burns - his technical skill, his drug use, his deceitfulness

The college hack described here was an amalgam of two different hacks
- the news server hack done by friends of mine, and the student
workstation hack that I did.  I finally ditched my own hack and used
my friends exclusively - this is just a one-paragraph intro, not a
thesis.

The company is basically Cisco, the only Silicon Valley operation I
got to see from the inside, but I think the description here is
sufficiently general that it could be any one of dozens of high-tech
startups.  Its name is a hats-off to my friend Terry Slattery and
Chesapeake Computer Consultants, which in its hey-day was one of
Cisco's top training partners (and my first corporate employer).

"'Red' Briwom" is also a tip of the hat to Rob Widmer, Terry's first
employee (I was his second).  I respect Rob's "staying power with the
boring tedium the finicky machines impose on their masters."

T - 370 days <****>

"A tough reception"

Mercuriou visits Vic.  Description of the hydroponic farm - has to
be a more extensive operation than just marijuana

T - 355 days <*****>

Vic's vision quest

The site exists as described, but it is not in New Mexico.  It
is on the Baja Peninsula, in Sierra Laguna Biosphere Reserve,
close to the town of Santiago, Mexico.

Don't ask me how Orion got into a _summer_ sky, I don't know, either.

T - 350 days <****>

"The crapshot"

John Pople.  Gaussian.  Vic joins up.

isn't it usually a "house with an attached garage"?

T - 313 days <***>

Press conference announcing the new fuel

Moderate plot, at least its moving forward (the chapshoot paid off);
weak setting, but something I learned from Tom Clancy is that you can
use the ability to explain technical details to create setting, here
and in about a hundred other places in the novel; moderate character
development - we meet Andrea Yeats for the first time!

I found out after this book was mostly written that Andrea Yeats is
the name of the Texas women who drowned her four kids in a bathtub.
Coincidently, her husband worked for NASA.  I'm not changed the name -
her identify is too deeply ingrained in my mind.  Or maybe it's not
coincidence - maybe God's trying to tell me something about was this
character espouses (I hope not)...

"Kyle" was originally "Lou" but my friend Kyle Hourihan demanded one
the characters be named after him, so I lent his moniker to this minor
character.

T - 312 days <****>

"The Franciscan Frier"

strong setting - a inner-city soup kitchen; slow plot (but who cares);
strong character development - we learn a lot about Andrea here.

Brother Dunstan is a amalgram of two religious I know - one is a
California-based Franciscan in culinary school (probably graduated by
now) that proposed basically this idea for a "Franciscan restaurant"
as a class project (and what a great idea it is), though I "cooked up"
its name myself; the other is my good friend, the Benedictine Dunstan
Robaduex, who lends this character his name.  The Benedictines don't
make it into this novel (sorry guys), but any fraternity couldn't good
far wrong by patterning its house management after the Benedictines
and its work ethic after the Franciscans.

Dunston only appears this one time, but he's probably my most
important minor character.  St. Francis has been such an influence in
my life; it's so important to me to showcase the Franciscan movement
in such a compelling scene (one of my favorites in the novel).

T - 138 days <****>

Alister's hack

T - 137 days <****>

Alister's meeting with Mercuriou and Burns - they cut him in

T - 131 days <****>

Alister's tour of the production facility

T - 93 days <**>

description of Burn's reworked 747

they name it Icarus

T - 17 days <***>

we meet Andrea for the first time.  Kyle dispatches her to look into all this

T - 2 days <**>

Andrea picking up a hitchhiker

T - 1 day <***>

Andrea hitchhiking.  picked up by Merceriou and Alister and locked up

Launch Day <***>

Andrea esacpes and warns NASA.  Merceriou decides to launch

We see his company name here for it's one and only time.  "TenTech",
in addition to its obvious play on N-1033, was inspired by "TempTech",
one of my mother's old accounting clients (an HVAC contractor).

T + 1 day <***>

Mercuriou's first press conference

T + 3 days <****>

ship's library

the air leak

T + 4 days <***>

Mercuriou's first media appearance.  Asked to justify his theft.  Retorts
that in a capitalist society you had to have a business plan to justify
your returns and that, as he has none, could not expect to get funding.
Justifies theft from capitalists - the "most selfish people in the world".

But he's broken the rules - rules made collectively, through a democractic
process.  Answers that democracy is simply the rule of the majority and
compares U.S. to Soviet Union - "it's same kind of trash that runs it".

"By all means, doctor... jump in anytime you please!"

T + 5 days <***>

Mercuriou vs congressman Richard Ecks.

Ecks justifies capitalism as having produced the highest standard of
living on the planet.  Mercuriou answers that communism also produced
a higher standard of living and asks rhetorically if you want Sputniks
or freedom

Ecks invokes democracy and freedom to justify the society.

Mercuriou gives an example of how capitalism 'works' - the reading program.

[I wrote this program, only it works for Spanish rather than Greek.
Unlike our hero, I didn't even bother to try and publish it, for all
the same reasons.  It sits on my computer disk, waiting for a freely
available Spanish-English dictionary.]

Ecks says he was guilty - he stole someone else's intellectual property;
tells Mercuriou he's got a 'problem with authority'

Little bit here about the secrecy of capitalism

Ecks - "who the hell are you to tell someone else what they can and can't
do with their property?!?!"

Mercuriou says we could build a twenty-first century library of Alexandria,
but our leaders want an 'information economy' where knowledge is one
more commodity to be bought and sold.

PUT IN AN 'INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY VIOLATION' HERE

T + 6 days <***>

Mercurious vs senator David Wye.

Wye starts right off with democracy, and Mercuriou asks if
communism/KGB/gulags would be justified by elections.

Wye answers that we don't have KGB/gulags and Mercuriou counters with
the War on Drugs - "isn't it funny how in all of these great
_people_'s societies, the biggest enemy of all always ends up being
_your_own_people_?"

Wye cuts to the Constitution, and we have a big discussion over it.
At the end, Wye loses, and tries to trump Mercuriou by answering that
all the unconstitutional powers are supported by "the overwealming
majority of the people of this country."

Mercuriou - still would like to see additional powers codified in Const.

Wye again answers that that's what the majority of people want, and
Mercuriou slams populist government in general - look at the police
slamming people to the ground and draging them off in handcuffs.

Criminals!  Wye says,  Criminals!

Mercuriou tries to lept out of his chair!  He's one of those criminals!

We've got freedom!  Wye says

The issue is what people have chosen to do with their freedom, Mercuriou
says.

Andrea's attempt to butt in.

Andrea Yeats tries to interrupt with 'morality'.  Wye asks who's
going to tell people what they can and can't do with their freedom.
Obviously, the Bible.  Wye says we've got freedom of religion,
invokes the Salem Witch Trials, and the interview breaks up.

A small scene between Andrea and Mercuriou - 'right and wrong are
subject to a vote'  Andrea says seperation of church and state
is a chimera


T + 7 days <***>

Govenor Zee.  Mercuriou gets in trouble when he starts talking
about morality (imagine that).  Andrea to the rescue.  Gates could
decide to be a Christian, instead he's decided to be philanthroper.

Andrea demolishes pop morality.


T + 8 days <**>

Mercuriou vs. Governor Zee

MAYBE CHANGE THIS TO BE MORE A HISTORY LECTURE

"the majority don't want good leaders"

Zee tries to claim Communism wasn't populist, and Mercuriou retorts.

"The problem isn't Bill Gates.  The problem is John Doe."

Zee says "you'll be telling us the Germans elected Hitler".  Mercuriou
disects Fascism and shows its populist nature.

"Democracy is another communism."

Zee: "democracy may not be perfect, but it's a damn sight better
than just about anything else out there."

back to the abolition of slavery.  Zee claims democracy is a "legitamite
system of government" and Mercuriou disects this.

A little bit about Napoleon.

Mercuriou summerizes - "the broken record of democracy for the last
two hundred years." 'put the people in control'

reaction - "you tell 'em Marc",  "let the bastard die up there"

FUCK YOU YOU FUCKING FUCKS
This T-shirt isn't original.  A friend of mine has one.


T + 16 days <***>

decision to move out of LEO to higher orbit

T + 21 days <***>

Vic appears on TV.  We get a snapshot of his views - the back-to-earth,
hardcore environmentalist, American Indian perspective.  Mercuriou
breaks in when the TV opponent declares that human society has
abandoned greed/force/human nature and "it's called democracy".
Back to Dr. Antonov - all society is coercive.

Alister, Yeats and Burns all reject the opportunity to grandstand
for the cameras

T + 33 days <***>

Andrea's press conference.  She presents a positive philosophy
(as opposed to her negative criticisms of T + 7)

do you advocate a welfare system?  isn't picking up hitchhikers dangerous.

You bet.


T + 54 days <****>

Description of the stable module configuration now achieved.

MUTE: This T-shirt is original.  I've never seen one as described.

Andrea asks Burns about Merciruou.

The problem with being smart.

We find out why Burns answers to Mecuriou - Merciriou does the
management.


T + 60 days <****>

Andrea and Vic.  why he went to medical school.


T + 188 days <***>

Soy beans and sushi.


T + 231 days <****>

Plutarch. Sparta.  Vic challenges Andrea to prescribe rules to be
Christians.  'Primitive' societies.  Modern societies based on
dependancy and forced labor.  The bastardization of Christianity.

Andrea: faith in God got _her_ there.

T + 424 days <***>

discussion of landing

"If you learn to live with disappointment, she'll never leave you for
another man."

T + 637 days <***>

"Live from Mars orbit"
crew conference

T + 639 days <***>

Andrea, Merceriou, and Burns.  Andrea argues against the landing.
Merceriou goes ahead.

T + 650 days <***>

the landing attempt

interestingly enough, in this chronology, if you plug in all the dates
to figure out when "T + 650" was, Mars was on the wrong side of the
solar system!  (see, i actually did think of trying to propose a
realistic series of orbit transfer burns, but gave up)

T + 651 days <***>

"remove the spacesuits and launch it"

crew conference.  

T + 652 days <***>

suicide watch

T + 653 days <***>

talking to NASA

T + 654 days <***>

"Can the kid get them home?"

I guess they better all die.  Who am I to argue with Nostradamous?

T + 657 days <**>

memorial service

T + 658 days <*>

Alister begins maneuvering the cargo modules.

T + 690 days <***>

Mercuriou and Andrea - everybody cuts corners.

T + 695 days <**>

OMS-17

Do these numbers add up?  Does a 17 minute, 37.42 mega-newton burn
give something roughly the mass of the spaceship about a tenth-gee
acceleration?  I have no idea!  Does a five-minute wait in a six-hour
orbit change your orientation by about one degree?  No, it should be
about 5.

The quote is from Deutscher's 'The Prophet Unarmed', part two of his
three-part biography of Trotsky:

	Nearly thirty years had passed from the moment when the young
	Trotsky saw the towers and the walls of Moscow for the first
	time.  He was then being transported from a jail in Odessa
	to a place of exile in Siberia; and it was from behind the bars
	of a prison van that he had his first glimpse of the 'village
	of the Tsars', the future 'capital of the Communist International'.
	It was from behind such bars also that he now had his last
	glimpse of Moscow, for he was never to return to the city of
	his triumphs and defeats.  He entered it a persecuted
	revolutionary; and so he left it.


T + 701 days <**>

need this to buffer between OMS-17 and 9/11

I suspect you could have found another way... like writing a book?

What if you don't beleive in Jesus?  People once thought the Earth was
flat.

T + 705 days <**>

we don't run this ship.  Burns runs this ship.

T + 714 days <***>

Alister: do you think we're living in the end times?

"parts of it are inspired by God, and parts of it are the errors of men"
   maybe a little bit like this book?
   like its introduction said?

T + 729 days <***>

September 11, 2001

wine in orbit.

T + 733 days

turn on the camera, Alister

T + 734 days <****>

they took advantage of capitalism, not freedom

the attack was against the majority - the people who run democracy

Alister - maybe they're just incompotent

T + 770 days <***>

Vic: We're not sufficiently advanced to possess jet aircraft.

lot of talk about 9/11

technology is a tool

atheism is a severe handicap to moral value judgements

humanity is primitive

T + 904 days <**>

What's going to happen to the U.S.?

T + 974 days <**>

Do you support the War on Terror?

T + 1033 days <***>

The Great Conversation

A critical scene to set the stage for the end of the novel

T + 1094 days <**>

Big government was in.

T + 1253 days <****>

Earth orbit burn.

T + 1257 days <**>

"Look what I found"

T + 1262 days <****>

Arrival at International Space Station.  Borzov.

Our patient reader, who lasted this far, gets (hopefully) a reward -
an interesting new character, then the grande finale

Borzov was the mission commander in Rama II.  I've always imagined
him something like this, and _who_knows_ what people will think
of Col. Ramon - he doesn't say anything too unreasonable I hope

OK, so _Columbia_ couldn't even dock with the ISS.  Sue me for giving
you a lossy ending.

T + 1265 days <*****>

March 1, 2003

9/11 was Julian day 254 of 2001, March 1 was day 60 of 2003
all these years had 365 days, so (365 - 254) + 365 + 60
536 days from 9/11 to Columbia

so 9/11 is T + 729 days, that makes Columbia T + 1265

this and 9/11 are the _only_ two dates I've 'pegged' in the
chronology, so any kind of speculation about why the author picked "T
+ 650" is absurd - they're just random numbers

"The prequel is all human history.  The sequel is the fate of mankind."


======================================================================
======================================================================
======================================================================


"Now in addition to yourself and Dr. Antanov, you also have your engineer,
Burns, and at least one other astronaut, is that right?"

"Yes, we have two other astronauts.  Alister Compton is the assistant
engineer, and Dr. Andrea Yeats, of the National Aeronautics and Space
Administration, has volunteered to lend her expertise to our mission.
I guess you could call her an observer."

In Houston, Kyle was watching the broadcast from a conference room in
the Johnston Space Flight Center, where an entire floor of a building
had now been dedicated to monitoring the flight of the _Icaraus_.  A
number of people exhaled loudly and began chattering amongst
themselves as soon as Mercuriou had mentioned Yeats' name.  Someone
picked up a contingency plan that had been rapidly developed and
flipped down several pages, to one entitled "Captain invokes volunteer
status".  Kyle stood silently watching the broadcast for a few more
seconds, until a phone rang and it was handed to him.

--- The Next Day (maybe) ---

"Dr. Yeats has not been kidnapped.  She has made that very clear
to us in our communications with her.  She insists that she was
given the opportunity to leave and elected to stay in order to
help these people."

Kyle Becker's news conference was being carried live on national
television.  It was the first official statement from a NASA official
that mentioned Yeats, and the first that had received any kind of
serious press attention.  After each of his remarks, several reporters
would all try to interrupt with a question simultaneously, and
Becker had to make a conscientious effort to control the situation
and pick one question to hear and answer.  Though not his first
press conference, it was his first under this degree of scrutiny,
and he was somewhat nervious.  It didn't show.

"OK, Mary," he stated firmly, pointing to one of the reporters that
usually covered the NASA beat, and tending to avoid the glut of
strange faces that had suddenly crowded into the usually sedate press
room.

"Does Dr. Yeats support these people?  And is she acting in any
kind of official role?"

"No, I don't want to put words in her mouth, but I don't think she
supports them so much as she is willing to help them.  Those of you
that know her, understand that she's a very kind person and very
willing to help even those she doesn't agree with.  As for an offical
role, she was acting in an official role, but her decision to
volunteer for this mission was strictly personal, and it remains to be
decided by NASA if her role on the _Icarus_ is as an offical
observer."

"Why didn't NASA immediately come forward with the admission that a
veteran astronaut was involved in this caper?"

The question came from a political correspondent who had learned to
carefully note a speaker's tone of voice and body language, and loudly
injected his voice at the end of the response before anyone else could
nose in.  Kyle pulled out a canned response he had prepared in advance.

"Well, frankly, because of questions like that!  This thing has become
a media circus that's on T.V. night and day, and we wanted to take
the time to try and get the answers to these questions, such as
how Dr. Yeats came to be on board the _Icarus_, and whether this
is an offical NASA role, and how _she_ wants the situation dealt with,
and frankly, I'm glad we've had two days to talk about this amongst
ourselves without trying to ask and answer these questions all at
the same time with the glare of the T.V. cameras on."

"So, basically, you've been trying to decide how to spin it."

"No, I think that's _your_ speciality, and let me now take a question
from over here."

"Dr. Becker, it sounds to me like Dr. Yeats was basically kidnapped
and somehow convinced to join up with these people, I mean, you know,
Patricia Hurst and the Mansons, it's not uncommon for kidnap victims
to identify with their captors."

"Look, Andrea Yeats arrived at their launch site less than two days
before they lifted off, certainly not long enough for her to be
brainwashed, which is what that question rather implies.  If anything,
her presence there seems to have thrown a major kink in their plans,
and you'd just have to know Andrea to appreciate that she's not going
to be coerced by anyone to do anything she doesn't want to."



--------

"For example, you proposed a twenty-first century library of
Alexandria at one point, right, Captain?"

Mercuriou nodded in silent agreement.

"And you couldn't really answer who was going to pay for it, right?
Well, the Christian answer is that the authors pay for it.  They write
the books, publish them on the Internet, give copies freely to anyone
who wants them whether they pay or not, and end up homeless and
starving on the streets, because most people will just take whatever
they can get for free, but you better believe that the shopkeepers and
the restaurants and the landlords aren't going to just 'give to all'.
That's what happens to Christians in this world."


------

"This isn't Christianity!  Christianity is about redemption through
faith.  You're redeemed through faith, not through your deeds!"

"If that's so, then why does Jesus spend so much time talking about
how we live in this world?  Why did he bother to say 'turn the other
cheek' and 'give to all those who beg of you' and 'if a man steals
your cloak, give him your cloak as well'?  Yes, he talks about faith,
but he talks about deeds, too, and if deeds aren't important, why does
he spend so much time discussing them?"


-----

andrea in space

"Well, we keep hearing about what if you can't produce enought?"

"Well, the software industry at least has shown us what a lie that one
is.  There's no cost to produce.  They could stick all their stuff on
the Interent, source code and all, for next to nothing.  Just set up
and maintain a web presence.  On the other hand, there's a huge amount
of extra effort that goes into putting all these controls and
restrictions in place to get money.  Who knows about other fields
of industry, but clearly in the software industry, the cost
of production would be a lot less without capitalism!"

-----

"OK, this is A-core," Burns announced as he led Andrea into the first
cargo module past the 747.  "It's basically a backup command center.
It might become our command center in time."  Much of A-core was still
in packing boxes secured to the walls of the module.  Some things had
been unpacked, however, most notably an enormous flat-panel LCD
screen, considerably bigger than a conventional TV, which had been
installed against one wall and was now lit with a standard computer
status display, showing the ship's position in its orbit, their a
ground track, and a radar composite two hundred kilometers to either
side of the ship, showing the various cargo modules.  This image,
unlike the others, appeared blurry at first, since it was actually two
images alternated rapidly with each other and designed to be viewed
with 3-D glasses.  The far side of A-core was almost empty.  To this
far side, and the pressure door there, Burns led Andrea.

"There is no other A-module, because there's nothing else docked to
A-node," Burns said, passing through the pressure door into a docking
node with four empty ports, their portholes showing only star fields
and, in one, a spectacular view of Australia.  Only one door directly
across from A-core was occupied, not surprisingly, but a cargo module
Burns called B-core.  Andrea closed the pressure door behind her as
Burns opened the one in front of him.

B-core was almost completely empty.  Burns explained as he propelled
himself across it that it was intended, like the far end of A-core, as
a staging and work area for any modules that might be temporally
docked to the A-node.  Past B-core was B-node, but this one was fully
occupied with docked modules.

"These are the crew quarters, Doctor, we've each got one of these;
well, I don't know about you.  I'm in B-2, the captain's in B-1,"
Burns said, pointing to pressure doors around him as he spoke,
"Alister's got B-3, and the doc's in B-4.  I don't know where we'll
put you, but let's take a look at C-core."

C-core was intended as a crew lounge.  Stowed here in boxes was
exercise equipment, more computers and TV panels, all of it yet
untouched.

C-1: sickbay storage
C-2: sickbay
C-3: electronics lab
C-4: chemistry lab

----

Bush: "Quit all this politic'ing around and land that plane before
       somebody gets hurt."

      "Theft is wrong.  These people have done wrong, and they deserve
       to be punished.  And they will be punished."

----

"That's the problem with being smart.  The smarter you get, the more
you can do, and the fewer other people there are who can help you do
it.  Eventually, you get so smart that you can do almost anything, and
none of it actually gets done."

Eventually, you get so smart that you can do anything, and nothing gets done.
Eventually, you get so smart that you know how to do anything, and nothing gets done.
Eventually, you get so smart that you know how to do almost everything, and none of it actually gets done.
You can do almost anything, and almost nothing gets done.

"If you learn to live with disappointment, she'll never leave you
for another man."

"You've got the freedom to be selfish, but not to be generous.  You've
got the freedom to work, but not to live.  You've got the freedom to
speak, but not to act."

-----

"Propaganda is not a substitute for leadership."
"Good propaganda is not a substitute for good leadership."

-----

"Capitalism or communism?  It's like asking someone to choose
between the Hydra and the Medussa!"

-----

Andrea made a conscious effort to be constructive.  "Democracy isn't
magic.  It's a system of government where the majority of people choose
their own leaders.  If they choose well, it succeeds.  If they choose
poorly..."  Her voice drifted off into silence; the humming of the
air conditioners was the only sound for many seconds.

----

"After the Soviet Union collapsed, we saw the truth about democracy.
The U.S. was left as the world's only superpower, and could really
have done something to make all this talk about liberty and freedom
real.  Instead, they built a wall across their southern border,
declared war on their own people, and decided to keep all their
technology secret and controlled so they could make billions off it
for themselves.  That's when we really saw the truth about democracy."

----

In the hills of Afghanistan, Osama bin Laden wrung his hands together
and exclaimed in glee: "Now the whole Global Capitalist Economic
system will collapse!" ...

----

"Well, that's a hobby."

"A hobby?"

"A hobby.  Something you do in your spare time.  A job is what you
do to put food on the table."

"OK, so let me get this straight.  A job is whatever you do that
produces food, and anything else is a hobby.  You forgot to add that
this 'job' involves dumping the forty hours a week for the best years
of your life into working for some system run by the most selfish
bastards you'd ever want to meet in your life."

----

"Capitalism is one of the most utterly immoral philosophies that
has even been proposed for men to live their lifes."

----

"These people that just don't want to work..."

"That's right!  For you and your nightmare system and your
ruthless capitalist leaders, you're damn right I don't want to work!"

----


...

"How much money did you steal?"

"Hard to say.  Adding up everything we lied about, everything we
bought on empty credit, everything we just flat out stole - probably
close to a billion dollars."  He paused for a minute.  "And that's a
shoestring budget for what we're trying to do.  We've cut a lot of
corners.  A billion isn't much for a manned space launch, let alone
one going to Mars."

"How many corners did you cut?"

"A bunch.  I'd like to have three identical ships going, but we've
only got one.  We don't have any kind of landing vehicle yet, and
of course I'd like to have one built already and tested here on Earth,
but that isn't going to happen either."

"How do you plan to land on Mars if you don't have a landing vehicle?"

"We've got an old 747 we managed to put in orbit this morning, and
I'm hoping we can modify it to function as a space shuttle."

"How much do you have of... uh, supplies?"

"We've got a year's supply of food, water, charcoal to extract carbon
dioxide from the air.  Then we'll have to start recycling."

"Do you expect to be gone longer than a year?"

"Of course, yes.  There's no way we could get to Mars and back in a
year.  Plus, I'm planning on making a stop at the astroid belt on the
way.  I'm looking at five years..."

------
#if 1

"And who's going to pay for it, Captain, who's going to pay for it?"

#elsif 2

"Well, that sounds very noble, Captain, but in the real world, if you
just give everything away, you'll be put out of business."

"That's right!  That's the 'freedom' of capitalism right there - you be
a capitalist or you'll be put out of business.  And then if you won't
work for these bums, you'll be put homeless and starving on the street
and all these great, decent people will spit on you as they walk past
and call you a bum who doesn't want to work... And they're right,
'cause I don't want to work - not for them and not for their brutal
system!"

#elsif 3

"And who's going to pay for it, Captain, who's going to pay for this
library of Alexandria once we just give all these books away for
free?"

"Maybe the capitalists could pay for it, Congressman, they've
certainly got the money."

"I know, I know, take from the rich and give to the poor.  We've heard
all this before!  It's been rejected by the people."

"Again, Congressman, I don't have some big plan to figure how to pay
for it, but I know that our leaders aren't even trying.  They're
determined that it won't happen.  They're determined that all this
information will be controlled, just like everything else in a
capitalist society.  Everything is controlled by the capitalist
system."

#endif


----

The paradox of freedom: how do you give freedom to both the Nazis and the Jews?

----

"Drug addiction, alcoholism, thirty thousand suicides a year, clinical
depression at near epidemic proportions... and it's all because of
some guys sitting on their couches smoking dope, right?  Couldn't have
anything to do with your leaders, ehh?  Couldn't be because you're
raised from childhood to be a little cog in this capitalist system,
that you're basically forced to work because the capitalists control
everything, and the people you're forced to work for are the most
selfish bums you'd ever want to meet in your life.  Couldn't have
anything to do with your problems, right?  Couldn't be
_the_people_in_charge_of_your_society_ that are responsible for any
of this?"

----

"Yet people believe that if they've got money in their hands,
they've got freedom.  They absolutely insist that they _aren't_
living off the clerk stocking the shelfs at Safeway, only because
they sit behind some desk pushing paper and some corporation
cuts them a check every other Friday."

----

"Vic had really good points.  We live in a world where individuals
are dependent on society to an almost unprecidented degree, and
that's not a good thing.  Then you compound this with the majority's
total inability to choose good leaders."

----

"All this is true, but again, the most serious problems are spiritual
and not political or technological.  As long as people are willing to
stand behind their counters and refuse to serve a hamburger unless
they're getting money, you're going to have these problems.  It's a
bottom up proposition.  If people can't eat without money, it's
pointless to talk about building some hi-tech system without money.
You've got Christ there telling you 'give to all those who beg off
you' and the masses of people just don't want to hear it.  They refuse
to believe that he was talking to _you_, in _your_ business, standing
there behind _your_ counter.  They didn't want to hear it two thousand
years ago, and they don't want to hear it today."


----

"As far as I'm concerned, you're just a bum who doesn't want to work!"

Mercuriou laughed.

"Sure, that's why I'm sitting up here in orbit, that's how we
developed this fuel technology, that's why the dictionary publisher
wanted to market the Greek reading aid - we're just lazy bums who
don't want to work!"

"It's just propaganda!  In Russia, anyone who opposed communism was a
counter-revolutionary; in Germany, anyone who opposed fascism was a
Jew; here, anyone who opposes capitalism is a bum who doesn't want to
work.  Notice how you don't want to discuss capitalism; notice how
quickly the discussion gets turned into a personal assault on Marc
Mercuriou's personal work ethic; you don't want to discuss capitalism,
you want to turn the whole thing into a personal character attack, and
this is one of the hallmarks of propaganda - turn the discussion away
from the real issues, make it into a personal character assault on
your opponent, put him on the defensive."


-----

Zee: "Paul teaches very clearly in Romans that government authority is
consituted by God and that we have a moral duty to obey that
authority."

"Can you show me where that is taught by Christ?"

"It's taught in the Bible, Dr. Yeats, it's taught in the Bible."

"Well, there's lot of things taught in the Bible.  The Bible
teaches us to stone prostitutes to death, for example, but
we all know what Jesus had to say about that.  So that's..."

Zee cut her off.  "So you don't believe in the Bible?"

Andrea took a deep breath.  "I don't believe it's word-for-word
exact."

"Well, Dr. Yeats, I do believe in the Bible.  I believe it's the
inspired word of God, every bit of it.  Maybe that's why you find
yourself mixed up with these people; maybe you need to read that Bible
of yours and take it a little more seriously."

Andrea gritted her teeth, ignored the personal slight, and went on.

"I do take the Bible seriously, governor, but I don't believe it's
word-for-word accurate..."

"The Bible is the Inspired Word Of God!"

Mercuriou: "Is this guy a governor or a preacher?"

"OK, well maybe you can clear up some simple points for me.  Like how
did Judas die?"

"I really don't this is relevent..."

"No, how did Judas die?  Can you tell me?"

Zee took a deep breath before answering.  "Judas hung himself from
a tree, consumed with the guilt of having betrayed Christ."

"But that's now what the Bible says!  At least that not what the Bible
says in Acts!  In _Matthew_ we're told Judas hung himself.  In _Acts_
we're told he bought a field with the silver he had been paid and died
after falling down a ravine in that field.  Now, Governor, how can one
man die two different ways?"

Zee remained silent.  Andrea went on.

"Or perhaps you can tell me what happened to Christ after his baptism
by John?  In _Matthew_ we're told he went to wilderness for forty days
where he was tempted by the devil.  In _John_ we're told that the
_next_day_ he began calling his disciples - no wilderness trip, no
forty days.  So what happened that days after his baptism, Governor,
did he head for the wilderness or start his ministry?"

"So what are you trying to say, Doctor, that we can't beleive the Bible?"

"No, I've just pointing out some of it's many internal
inconsistencies.  There's no way it can be word-for-word exact.  I've
come to see it as a historial document, and like many other historical
documents flawed and inaccurate, but one that deals with some of the
critical events of human history - the life, ministry, death, and
resurrection of Jesus of Nazareth.  Asking if any particular event
happened just the way it's related is like asking if Julius Cesear
actually uttered the words "the die is cast" as he crossed the River
Rubicon.  Who knows?  Yet we can be fairly certain that was a man
named Julius Cesear and that he did most of the things attributed to
him.  It's like that with the Bible - you can't just pick out some
verse and insist that it's exactly infallible; you have to evaluate it
with a critical eye."

"So now we come back to Paul, and we note first that he's not Christ,
he's a great Christian leader, possible the greatest misionary in the
history of the church, but he's not Christ.  He didn't come back from
the dead.  He didn't know God.  His teaching doesn't have the same
weight.  And I think we need to be somewhat critical of his philosophy
that government leaders are placed into authority by God.  So people
who lived in the Soviet Union had a moral obligation not to possess
shortwave radios?  Because it was against the law?  Because their
leaders were consistuted by God?"

"First of all, a communist dictatorship..."

Now it was Andrea's turn to interrupt.

"Oh, no, he didn't say that.  He didn't say that our obligation to
obey the laws depended on whether it was a dictatorship or a
democracy!"

In the television studio on Earth, Zee paused for a moment and
collected his thoughts.  Having watched the earlier interviews, he had
expected Mercuriou to be a push-over.  He hadn't expected Andrea Yeats.

"We have a moral obligation to obey the laws of a legitimate government."

"Do you find that somewhere in the Bible, that distinction between
legitimate and illegitimate government?"

"Absolutely.  Legitimate government is government inspired by God."

"I'll agree with that.  But how do we decide if a particular
government is inspired by God?"

"A legitimate government is one that rules with the support of its people."

"You find that in the Bible?  That a government inspired by God is one
that rules with the support of its people?"

Zee flared up.  "Look, Dr. Yeats, if you can't tell the difference
between a democratically elected government and a dictatorship, then I
guess you belong on that ship of theives with their rebel capitan!"

"Governor, I most certainly can tell the difference, but you're
evading the question about Biblical teaching.  There is absolutely
nothing in Christ's teachings which tell us we have some moral
obligation to obey every law promulgated by any government, nothing
that teaches democracy as some holy philosophy, in fact, I think one
of the main themes of _Revelation_ is the presence in this world of
governments that are _not_ ordained by God, and if you take Paul's
philosophy in Romans at face value, it tells us that people in Russian
had a moral obligation to God not to have shortwave radios because
that was the law of the government!"

"So, what, you're trying to tell us that all government is evil, that
we should have anarchy, that people should do whatever they please?"

"No, I'm just pointing our that our _moral_ obligation is not to obey
the laws of government, but to obey the laws of God!"

"And part of the laws of God is obedience to constituted authority!"

"Where do you find that in the Gospel, governor, I'd really like to
know!"

"So there's nothing wrong with murder?!"

"Murder is against the laws of God; _thou_shall_not_kill_!"

"So the only time we have to obey the law is when it's in accord with
our ideas of what God wants?"

"Governor, the _only_ law we _have_ to obey is the _law_of_God_!"

Zee paused and considered this.

"So all these laws we have, people should just pick and choose
whenever they want to obey or not to obey them?"

"People should concern themselves first and foremost with the laws
of God!  The laws of man are secondary!"

"Well, then we'd just have anarchy!  I could just say that my religion
teaches human sacrifice, that I think that's the will of God, right?"

"You can believe whatever you want.  You can believe the world is
flat, but that doesn't change the fact that it's round.  But I'll go
so far as to say that if you truly believed that human sacrifice was
ordained by God, then you'd have a moral obligation to practice it
irregardless of the laws of men!  Which is why the Bible is so
important!  So we can clearly know that human sacrifice is _not_
ordained by God!"

"So let's see, you think men are only obligated to obey the laws of
God, and yet you don't believe the Bible is literally true, so how are
we supposed to determine the law of God?"

"It's not easy.  In fact, I think it's about the hardest thing to do
in life.  You start by making a conscience decision to seek the will
of God, to try and make every decision in your life, big and small,
based not on what you want, but on what God wants, you pray, you
worship, you study the Bible, especially the Gospels, and then you do
the best you can."

"And if that's in conflict with our laws, you just ignore the laws,
then?"

"I think it's more a case of looking somberly at the laws, and looking
somberly at the men who make the laws, and coming to a conclusion that
the men are self-serving materialists far more concerned with their
economic and political theories of capitalism and democracy that with
the Christian gospel, and that most of their laws are convoluted,
misguided, and unjust."

"So our laws are convoluted, misguided, and unjust?"

"Well, look at them.  Go into any law library and ask to see the law.
Just the Code of Federal Regulations alone takes up entire shelfs.
It's tens of thousands of pages of inscrutable legalize.  And people
say that 'ignorance of the law is no excuse'; I personally think it's
a great excuse - who understands all these laws?  Then compare it with
the laws of God - simple things like "don't kill", "don't steal",
"don't lie", "give to all", "do no violence to any man".  That's what
I mean by convulted.  As for misguided, well, look at how much of it
is to somehow 'regulate' people's greed - this capitalist democratic
idea that everyone should just be in it for themselves and we use the
law to build some kind of a 'playing field'.  And unjust!  You've got
to be kidding me!  One guy cuts a deal to testify against his friends
and gets four months; another guy refuses to snitch and it's a ten
year sentence!  You call that justice?"  [Jamal Lewis]

"And if you decide the laws are unjust, then you just take it
upon yourself to ignore them?"

"Well, basically, yes.  That's what people did in Russia, that's
what people did in Germany."

"This isn't Russia, and this isn't Germany!  We have freedom in this
country, and respect for our laws!"

-----

"Genius?!", Burns sneered.  "What is genius?  A lot of it is passion.
I've heard it said that we use less than ten percent of our brain
power, and I believe it.  When I a teenager, I just loved math.  I
read every math book I could get my hands on.  Marc was like that with
literature.  I figured it out from watching him - you want to learn
Greek, get a copy of the _Iliad_ and just plow your way through it;
you want to learn Spanish, read _Don_Quixote_ or something; you want
to be a pianist, just play the piano every day.  If I got behind in a
college class, I'd sit down and put an hour a day into it and be
caught up in no time - and I'd time that hour with a watch.  You put
an hour a day into anything, and you're going to get good at it, but
most people just drift through life.  They have no passion.  Or maybe
their passion is being socially accepted, or making money, or getting
laid.  For whatever reason, they do just enough to get by, and then
they look at someone who has passion, who's just driven to do
something, and they think, 'man, that guy's a genius; I wish I could
be like him.'

-----

"Alister, it's not just democracy.  This has been going on for
thousands of years.  Humanity is barbaric.  Democracy just
demonstrates is what Christ said two thousand years ago, 'the path to
salvation is narrow and those who find it are few'.  People won't live
the way they were taught by Christ, it's just too hard.  Thoreau said
this, too, 'in their sacrifices to humanity they ran no risks.'
People want a watered-down, riskless religion, and that's not what
Christianity is."

-----


idiot routing protocol.  It's just boring, and I always had managers
pushing me to do more and more and more.  If anything, Marc pushes me
to do less and less.  He'll offload anything he can.  And Alister was
a great find.  He's a lot of fun to work with, and a lot of stuff I'm
sick of fooling with, he'll jump into.  Marc hired him, of course."

----

"The difference between capitalism and those other system is
_individual_freedom_.  You can be a capitalist if you choose, you can
be social worker if you choose, you can be an author, you can be a
doctor; it's nothing imposed by the government."

"Well, that's great to hear, Congressman, because I want to be a
librarian!  I got a couple thousand books here in my ship's library,
all electronic, and I've been thinking about putting them up on the
Internet!"

"Stolen books," the congressman dryly noted.  "We've all heard about
your 'library', captain."

"Stolen books!" the astronaut practically spit the words back.  "You
mean stolen 'intellectual property', don't you?"

"It's the same thing.  Theft is theft."

"No, congressman, it's not the same thing.  Theft is physically taking
something that belongs to someone else.  A book, a physical book _can_
be stolen and we stole plenty, you better believe it, but the
information it contains can not."

"Well, we've pretty decisively rejected that idea in this society.
Information _does_ have value, captain, as you very well know,
and it _can_ be stolen, as so much of your entire 'mission' shows."

"That's right, and it just gauls the hell out of you that someone
could steal everything they need to fly into space!  Not just the
information, but the billions and billions of little dollar signs in
your computers that tell your robot workers, 'ok, you can give this
guy anything he asks for', right?"

"'Captain', the fact remains that you are a thief, OK?  A glorified,
glamorized, attension-grabbing thief.  The people who have written
those books have the right to decide what happens to their work, and I
keep telling you, because we have _free_dom!"

"You know, I am so sick of hearing about people's 'rights'!  Whenever
I hear that word 'rights', the next thing I start figuring is 'who's
getting screwed'."  Ecks started to cut in, but Mercuriou wouldn't let
him.  "People always talk about their 'rights' when they want to jam
somebody else's face in the mud.  Your bum leaders want to build an
'information economy', where knowledge is just one more commodity to
bought and sold, and the only way people will pay for it is if it's
kept secret."  Now the space captain morphed sarcastic.  "They talk
about their 'rights'!  They've got the 'right' to keep that
information secret, just the great people's government in Russia did!
And copying books online is illegal for the same reason that
photocopiers and fax machines were illegal in the Soviet Union, or at
least heavily controlled - " Now he slowed dramatically to make this
point.  "The potential of the technology represents too great a threat
to the system's ability to control people's lives."

Ecks waited a bit longer, then returned to a common theme.

"Captain, again, those people have the right to decide what happens to
_their_ work, simply because it is _their_ work.  The authors, they
could decide to put it online like you suggest, they have that
_freedom_."

"Just because you have freedom doesn't turn wrong into right..."

Now it was Ecks' turn to bust in laughing.

"Yes, Captain, it doesn't turn wrong into right, you are still a
_thief_!"

Mercuriou reddened and angered.

"That's right, that what you've got to be to make it in capitalism.
One way or another.  You've got to learn to be a ruthless,
self-serving, money-grubbing bum.  And whether you steal to do it, or
just ride roughshod over the rest of humanity with some nightmare
system."



----

"Communism made a lot of sense - 'class warfare', I mean, look around.
A bunch of people trying to make money off publishing books pushing
the government for all these legal restrictions, the high-school kid
who can't afford the music he wants copying it anyway.  The 'haves'
verses the 'have nots'.  How could it not make sense?  It's the story
of human nature - the rich man and the thief.  Communism tells the
thieves that their theft was justified, that they had been oppressed,
that they could have a people's revolution and expropriate the
expropriators.  Capitalism tells the rich man that his wealth is
justified, that it's his 'right' to decide how it gets spent, that all
these people gripping about it could just go get a job and make the
money they keep begging for.

"Christianity, of course, refuses to justify either man.  God tells
the thief, 'thou shall not steal', and Christ tells the rich man 'if a
man steals your coat, give him your cloak as well'.  So to put that
in a modern context, if a man breaks into your house, holds you and
your family up at gunpoint, takes everything of value that he sees,
you give him the keys to the car and offer to help carry the stereo
out, because it's pretty heavy."

Laughter.

"Well, you laugh because people just don't want to hear it, but that
_is_ what Jesus said.  He also told the thief some things he doesn't
want to hear, either.  In fact, even your majority don't want to hear
it.  Despite all your condemnation of Communism, you still keep trying
to glorify your own revolution.  You keep trying to tell us George
Washington and Thomas Jefferson were justified in an armed revolution
against the British crown.  Yet Christ tells us in the garden to
sheath our swords.  The oppressed are not justified in theft, and they
are not justified in revolution.  If people would live both sides of
that equation, if the 'haves' would give to anyone who begged of them,
and the 'have-nots' would accept whoever was in power, things would
tend to work out.  But the 'haves' always abuse their power, and the
'have-nots' always scream for revolution.  For a democratic
revolution, if they are sufficiently localized geographically to be
able to control one, because democracy really 'legimitizes' it.  If
all the drugs users in the United States were completely localized in
one state, that they could easily control the state government through
democratic elections, you'd see a much different drug policy in the
United States.  I can't tell you exactly what it'd be, but I can tell
you that the dissident groups that get oppressed most in democracy are
the ones that are so broadly spread geographically that they can't
influence even local elections."

----

"It was like that movie 'The Untouchables', in that scene where the
accountant got blown away by the mob, and scrawed on the wall in blood
was the word 'touchable'.  That's what nine-eleven was for this
country - 'touchable' scrawed in blood across the rubble of Ground Zero.

"What changed in nine-eleven is this majority finally figured out that
all the billions they've blown on weapons, weapons, and more weapons,
hasn't had then _untouchable_.  Nine-eleven was just like the scene in
the movie, written in blood on the wall for all the world to see:
'touchable'.  That's why we hear all this crying now about weapons of
mass destruction, because these are the _only_ weapons that can really
target THE MAJORITY.

"Who else you gonna attack?  Who else is really guity?  It's the
people who keep voting militant capitalists back into power, keeping
working for their corporations, keep supporting their system - in a
word, the majority."

"What do you mean by mititant capitalism, you've used the phrase
several times."

"Well, first of all capitalists, men and women who subcribe this
pseudo-religion of greed, that you've got this whole battery of goods
and services you offer, but nobody gets any of it without money, and
secondly militants, people who sit around at cocktail parties and say,
"Man, that technology worked great in Iraq!" and marvel at tanks that
can fire twice as far as any other and do it at forty miles per hour,
people who insist that we've _got_ to have those weapons, to protect
our _freedom_, you know, _militant_capitalists_, or in other words,
_the_majority_.


----

"Do I 'beilive' in democracy?  No.  I mean, do I believe that it
exists, sure!  Do I believe that it's the
greatest-system-of-government- ever-invented-by-man(TM), no.  Do I
believe that it can consistently produce decent leadership, no.  Do I
believe that there's a snowball's chance in hell that it won't be
remembered as one of the most hated systems of government ever...
maybe."

"Well, the fact is that people will follow selfish and violent leaders
- this has been demonstrated time and time again, from the French
Revolution forward."

"You keep saying the French Revolution, what about the American?"

"Well, the nice thing about the French Revolution was that it came to
pieces so quickly - you could directly see what'd you'd get from a
democracy.  It took the American Revolution another two hundred years
to conjuer and annex northern Mexico, rip itself to pieces in the
Civil War, exterminate native Indian society, and generally unlease
capitalism on the planet after it had muddled through fascism and
communism."


----

In 1848, based almost entirely on his name recognizition, the French
elected Louis-Napoleon Bonaparte their president (his uncle was the
famed Little Cornnel), and within five years he had disolved the
Republic and proclaimed himself Emperor Napoleon III, but I digress.


----

Vic: "Well, I don't reject technology outright, but I certainly think
we've got a serious, serious problem with industrialization and the
consequent de-humanization of labor on the assembly line.  In the
twentieth century, we've seen the emergence of labor unions and the
general success of the labor movement to gain improvements in working
conditions through both legislation and contract negotiation.  Yet
those gains are largely confined to the West, and we've also seen
factories essentially exported to third-world nations that don't have
strong labor movements in order to avoid the high costs of labor in
the West.  One thing you don't see is an _international_ labor
movement; labor unions are typically local or national institutions
that are perfectly willing to sacrifice the interests of foreign
workers in order to protect their own; thus you see labor leaders
advocating restrictive immigration policies, for example, while
basically turning a blind eye to the working conditions in those
countries."

"So what's the point?"

"Well, the point is that despite all the much publicized successes of
labor we've still got serious problems with industrialization."

"But hasn't the world gone post-industrial?"

"No, it hasn't.  We still use industrial processes to manufactuer our
cars, our appliances, our food, the concrete, the steel, the plastic
that so much of our society depends on.  The hype and the money has
gone post-industrial, but there's still a lot of people working on
assembly lines in Middle America, and getting a computer certification
so you can quit your job when the factory moves to Thailand isn't the
answer."

"So what is the answer?"

"Well, I think a lot of the answer is technological.  I'm a firm
believer that we need technological solutions to our technological
problems, political solutions to our political problems, and spiritual
solutions to our spiritual problems.  It doesn't do any good to try
and find political solutions to technological problems.  The robotics
technology that we're using to grow our food here has a lot of
potential.  Basically, we can think now about replacing our assembly
line workers with robots.  But we can't do that if replacing the
workers means putting them homeless and jobless on the streets!"

----

during the discussion with Andrea on Launch Day:

Andrea took a deep breath and bit her tongue.

"Captain Mercuriou," she began again in a level tone of voice,

----

"Th age-old propaganda technique - get personal!  Turn the discussion
into a _personal_ attack on your opponent

----

"OK, now let's take a look at the history of democracy!"

"Fine, let's look at it's history.  Let's start with freeing the slaves!"

"In the bloodiest war in American history.  I mean, let's face it -
the Lincoln government had got to be the most disastrous
administration in American history!  Do you ever think that maybe if
he was told by God what was going to happen he might have just say,
'I'll just sit this one out... let someone else be president this
year'"?

"Most disasterous!  Lincoln was one of the countries greatest presidents!"

"OK, fine.  But you have to admit that 'freeing the slaves' is was
least a push.  Not to even go into civil rights, but clearly we can't
afford too many 'successes' like the Civil War!"

"What else was happening to democracy in the nineteenth century?  We
had this thing called 'Manifest Destiny', remember?  Hitler had
something similar called 'Liebingstrum', but I digress.  The point..."

"What the hell are you muttering about?"

"The point is that 'Manifest Density' meant we were going to rule this
continent from sea to shining sea.  The two main groups of people in
the way were the American Indians and the Mexicans.  American Indian
civilization was basically wiped off the face of this planet.  The
_best_ you can say is it was pushed back into reservations on some of
our most worthless land we've got.  The Mexicans were invaded,
conjuered, and California, New Mexico, Arizona, Utah was taken from
them.  President Polk's war, remember?  Henry David Thorugh wouldn't
pay his ten-dollar tax because he was so opposed to it?"

"This is democracy, or at least American democracy.  In Europe, it
gets even better!  In 1848, the French once again overthrow their
monarchy!  The king flees the country, and they proclaim another
Republic!  They produce a constitution that looks on paper like the
most democratic in Europe!  It provides for an elected President and
universal sufferage - all males can vote, and at the time a
revolutionary concept, and I mean revolutionary!  There was exactly
one election under this new constitution [check this] and guess who
won?  Napoleon Bonaparte's nephew!  Napoleon Bonaparte's nephew, who
within five years proclaims France an empire and himself Emperor
Napoleon III!  Now this is pretty good.  Should silence anyone with
any idea that Napoleon Bonaparte wasn't one of the most popular
leaders in French history, and that he came to power in a democracy."

"So I guess democracy is some evil monster imposed on this planet?"

"Something like that.  I think _populist_government_ is a disaster,
and things like democracy show it.  I think things like Communism
and Fascim show it, too!"

[now we do russian and germany]

"And now we come to capitalism, I suppose?"

"That's right.  We come to capitalism.  It isn't an encouraging track
record."

"Well, I've got a web update for you, captain.  The people of this
planet have decided on democracy, and we're not going back."


----

"So what do you really think of democracy?"

Mercuriou paused.

"I think it's another communism."

It was more than X could take.

"Democracy is not another communism!  We have freedom in this country!"

"Really?  Go tell all the people who smoke pot that they've got
freedom.  Democracy isn't about freedom; it's about putting one
particular group of people in control - the majority."

-----

"Christianity _commands_ capitalism!"

It was again Andrea's turn to compete in the televised circus that the
_Icarus_ mission had become.  Her opponent was a minister in a major
Protestant church.

"The civil magistrate has a God-given duty as a minister of justice,
and God's ministers are not to exceed their duties!"

Andrea thought about this, then answered.

"I'm a bit confused.  I stated several days ago that I don't advocate
a welfare system, but that seems to be what you're implying

----


LINGURING ISSUES
----------------
Burns' and Alister's drug use
rape scene
Andrea's response to September 11
launch date
exactly how Andrea gets on the ship



Congressman Ecks - capitalism
Senator Wye - freedom / drug war / border policy / liberties of democracy
Govenor Zee - the religious right



----

Alister jammed his head in time with a beat from a new pop hit,
"games".

		"games"

	games are addictive
	games are insane
	games waste your time
	games waste your brain

	books are addictive
	books drug you, too / books are drugs, too / books hook you, too
	books take your time
	books take your brain

	books are the ticket / books are like weapons
	books are the tool / books are like tools
	books ain't for nerds
	books ain't for fools

	games are like virri
	that sap at your brain
	books are like poems
	that lull sweet refrains
	that lull to sweat dreams / sweet lullaby refrain

	games gloryify violence
	games gloryify pain
	books promote knowledge
	books promote gain

	games gloryify conflict,
	fighting, and gain
	books promote knowledge,
	reason, and ...

	books make great weapons / but books become weapons
	sometimes war is a game / when war is proclaimed / when war passions inflame
	lose books or lose war
	or lose the end-game / or we'll all go insane

	yet books become weapons
	war passions inflame
	lose books or lose war
	or lose the end-game

	yet books become weapons
	when war is proclaimed
	so lose books or lose war
	or lose the endgame



Mercuriou yanked the headphones off.  He had appeared out of nowhere.

"What are you doing?  You're supposed to be looking for Andrea Yeats."

"What are you doing?  You're supposed to be fixing the engines."

"What are you doing?  You're supposed to be taking out the garbage."

"What?!"  Alister sqwalked as he strugged awake.


----

if I blow the budget
if I blow out the speakers
if I go down in flames
...
just remember my name


"World where I live"

That's the world where I live!


"Mr. Nobody"




----

nobody's going allow the vegitarian minority to do this to
the majority.  So why don't you get off my back about drugs?"

----

We are forced to consider the possibility that there is a Great Evil
Spirit, which oposses us at every great turn in our lives.  We
consider that Earth may be a testing ground between Good and Evil, and
that Evil is always present, especially near end turns [near end of
life].  Then we are forced to discern Evil.


We are forced to consider Evil.
We may be opposed at every great turn in our lives.
Earth may be but a joust.
Thus we are forced to discern Evil.

   Evil may be a quest for the naive!
   Good is all there in the universe!
   Just move a little forward,
   You'll get by OK next time.

Maybe you will, God's all of love
But that's not the point.
You do his will now,
the best that you can.

----

I should've been there instead of Vic.
If anyone deserved to go down in flames it was me and Burns.

----

"OK, this actually happened to me.  One day I didn't have any money, I
had just hitchhiked up from Mexico to Corpus Christi, I was walking
down the streets of this city and eventually ending up sleeping behind
an abandoned house, but before that happened..."

"Excuse me, what were you doing hitchhiking up from Mexico?"

"Well, I had gone down to visit a friend of mine who was a Franciscan
monk, I had taken the time to spend a week on a mountaintop in prayer
and then another couple of days recuperating before I went home."

...

"So when I got to Corpus Christi, I walked into this fast-food place,
I think it was a Popeye's Chicken, and I asked for a bowl of their
dirty rice.  I told the woman straight up that I didn't have any
money, she called her manager, and that woman's answer was 'We don't
give out food for free, thank you, have a nice day,' or something like
that.  So I walked out.  Now what do you want to call that?"

"I beg your pardon?"

"What do you want to call that?  Is that capitalism?"

"Well, the woman there has the freedom to give to you or not give to
you.  Capitalism doesn't tell her not to give to you, that's up to
her, she has the freedom to choice."

"No, she has the obligation to give."

"Obligation?  Whose obligation?"

"Her obligation.  She has a obligation to give."

"And who is obligating her to give?"

"Christ.  We're taught by Christ to 'give to all those who beg of
you'.  She has an obligation, imposed on her by God, to give.  Christ
said 'I give you a new commandment', and because that commandment was
to love, sometimes we forget that it wasn't just a request, it really
was a _commandment_.  So if capitalism is telling her she had the
freedom to chose one or other, it's flat-out wrong because she had an
obligation to choose to one over the other."

"Well, Doctor Yeats, whose going to impose that obligation?"

"The obligation is imposed by God."

...

"Does democacy tell us we have to freedom to drive however fast we
want in a car?  I mean, I exceed the speed limit all the time, clearly
we _do_ have that freedom, are we told that?  Do we constantly hear
from our leaders that we have the freedom to drive how fast we
please?"

"But that is prohibited by law!"

"As is the behavior of the woman in the store - it's prohibited by
God's law, despite the fact that we have the freedom to break that law
if we choose!  So are our leaders constantly telling us that we have
to give to all, they're always telling us we have to drive the speed
limit!"


---

when i was all messed up
and i heard opera in my head

a thunderous symbol crash

your love was a light bulb
hanging over my bed

Baby, baby, baby,

Baby, baby, baby,

Baby, baby, baby,

light my way

Baby, baby, baby

light my way.


---------

They're not fighting against freedom,
they're fighting against democracy!

---------

"Alister, most employers check to see if their employees are legal.
We checked, too, and I can tell you that not one of these guys here
has a green card!"

---------

Vic: "I guess I saw myself as the voice of morality in this whole
venture, well, maybe more the voice of spirituality!  But you've got
me beat, Andrea, they didn't need me at all!"

---------

Andrea: I think Henry Kissenger once asked a Chinese diplomat his
thoughts on the French Revolution and the man answered that it was too
early to tell.  I guess I feel that way about both the French and
American Revolutions - two hundred years isn't long when it comes to
earth-shattering political movements - it's just too early to tell.

---------

Andrea to Alister:

"Don't worry about it.  Let Kyle and his engineers back in Houston
figure it out, they understand all the orbital mechanics and can come
up with a burn schedule.  All we've got to do is make sure this ship
stays together."

---------

Back in Earth orbit, the satellite phones were working again,
and Andrea was talking to Kyle.

"As soon you're on the Internation Space Station, we're handing
off to Mission Control, and I'm flying to Flordia.  I'll see you
on the ground."

"Kyle, when you asked me to look at what NuTech was doing, I figured
it was just a favor for a friend.  I never dreamed how much I'd need
you through this."

"Andrea, I never dreamed you'd make such an impact through this.
Everytime I see you on TV, I'm just in awe."

---------

Asked if she supported the government / believed in democracy:

"No, and I'll tell you why.  I'm a Christian, and when you get right
down to it, I don't see where the Christian has hardly any use for
government, at least as we know it.  Government is coercive, and
passivism is a mainstay of Christianity.  Think about it.  The
Christian will 'give to all those who beg of him', the Christian will
give even to thieves - 'if a man steals your coat, give him your cloak
as well', so what use does he have of a court system to sue for
damages?  The only way he'd end up in court is if someone else was
suing him.  He's taught not to resist evil, but to love his enemies;
the soldier is taught to 'do no violence to any man', so what use does
the Christian have for national defense?  If someone nails him to a
cross, with his dying words he'll say, 'forgive them, they know not
what they do', so what utility is a criminal justice system, if he'll
let murderers walk?"

---------

"X, in _Zen_and_the_Art_of_Motorcycle_Maintenance_, described the
Great Books program as the last major attempt to change the course of
a university.  That's probably a pretty accurate description, too."

"Did it work?"

Mercuriou sighed.  "Well, yes and no.  It'd be accurate to say it
changed the course of _some_ universities.  St. John's, for example.
They don't give grades; they don't have exams; it's all based on
reading and writing and discussing what you've read.  But so far it's
been limited to a liberal arts program, and after watching Burns in
action, I think the methodology could be applied to hard sciences as
well.  You study geometry by reading Euclid and Descartes and Hilbert.
You read Faraday to understand how to conduct experiments.  You read
modern authors, too, Maor, and Jackson, and Albert; you pick apart
algebra, and trigonometry, and calculus, and then you go through
physics, and chemistry, and biology.  Of course, you might just end up
producing a generation of Frankensteins crammed full of all this
knowledge without any moral context on how to use it."


---------

... the next day ...

"Every murder ever committed in human history was perpetrated by a
murderer who had freedom!  Every rape, every theft!  Every slave was
enchained by the _freedom_ of his master, yes _freedom_!  I'm
so sick of listening to you people crow on about 'freedom'!
Freedom in the absence of morality is the single most destructive
force this planet has _ever_ seen!"


---------

		CHARACTER BIOGRAPHIES

MARCELIUS MERCURIOU

The tragic hero, in the Greek sense.  His tragic flaw is his ambition,
driven by his hatred for democracy and capitalism.  He has to 'pay'
for this, but it takes form of his friend's death, and not his own,
because he's still around to be 'resurrected' by Andrea Yeats.

BURNS

The amoral technocrat.  Like the men who built the atomic bomb, he
facilitates Mercuriou's ambition without passing judgement on it
because it offers him the ability to excel at his technical skills.

VICTOR ANTONOV

American Indian heritage.

ANDREA YEATS

Symbolizes Christianity.  A super-hero in the Ayn Rand sense,
she has no significant character flaws.

Entered university at 17, majored in mathematics and graduated Cum
Laude in three and a half years.  Traveled to Europe, where she was
nearly killed in a swimming accident when she was trapped under a
wooden platform and became too disoriented to find her way out.
(Tesla'a accident) Nearly out of air, she saw in a vision that there
was a tiny amount of air just under the platform where it floated on
the water and survived.  A week later, she cut her vacation short and
returned home to enter a seminary.

Dropped out of seminary after a year and a half, despite excellent
grades, because it's theology seemed all too mechanical and she had
decided she didn't want to be a minister.  Decided to be an astronaut
instead, applied to NASA and was rejected.

She returned to school, got a Ph.D. in electrical engineering, doing
her thesis on a new mathematical system that could be programmed into
a computer to avoid round-off errors in simulations of microwave
circuitry.  Re-applied to NASA's astronaut program.  This time she was
accepted as a payload specialist and at the age of 34 flew into space
for the first time.

During her second (and last) shuttle mission, she had a religious
epiphany during an EVA when she witnessed a sunrise over the Earth,
was blown away in awe by the majesty and beauty of the planet, and
heard a voice in her head ask "So why are you up here?"  After
returning to Earth, she quit NASA and tried to rediscover religion,
thinking that the meaning of her experience was that there was nothing
for her in spaceflight.  At some point in the _Icarus_ mission, she
realizes that there might be a positive answer to the question in her
head.

Are her parents still alive?  Maybe her father is dead and her Mom
lives up on that farm - that's why she stays there, to take care of
her Mom.  So she should call her Mom first thing in space, then Kyle.

KYLE BECKER

FRIAR DUNSTAN

CONGRESSMAN ECKS

Elected mayor of a major city at 22.  (Jerry Springer)

champion of capitalism

SENATOR WYE

champion of democracy

GOVENOR ZEE

sees himself as Christian moralist



Khalid Shaikh Mohammed - Sept 11 mastermind


-----

"...and then _this_ thing," Mercuriou declared, waving his computer
tablet in the air, "'Declaration of the Rights of Man and of the
Citizen', in translation, of course..."

"The representatives of the French People, formed into a National
Assembly, considering ignorance, forgetfulness or contempt of the
rights of man to be the only causes of public misfortunes and the
corruption of Governments..."

"What a fantastic claim!  That ignorance or contempt of the rights of
man are the _only_ causes of public misfortunes!  What about greed!?
What about violence?!"

"What about ignornace or contempt of God?" Andrea asked.

"No, but let's continue!  Perhaps it's in there somewhere!  Perhaps greed
violates the rights of man!"

Mercuriou continued to quote aloud from the tablet.

"Article 2.  The aim of every political association is the
preservation of the natural and imprescriptible rights of man.  These
rights are Liberty, Property, Safety and Resistance to Oppression."

"Hmmm..." he continued in dramatic fashion, "Nope!  The right of
Property but nothing about greed!  Nothing about the _responsibility_
of those with Liberty and Property - all rights, no responsibilities!"

"And Christ taught us to forgive our oppressors and pray for our enemies,
not that we have a right of Resistance to Oppression," Andrea chimed in.

"Article 12. To guarantee the Rights of Man and of the Citizen a
public force is necessary..."

"Article 13.  For the maintenance of the public force, and for
administrative expenses, a general tax is indespensable..."

"There you have it!  _The_People_ need a public force to guarantee their
Rights and a general tax to pay for it all!"

"But isn't there something to be said for it, I mean don't people have
rights?"

Andrea answered first.

"Alister, the violation of those 'rights' arises because the men in
change have responsibilites, too - love, charity, forgiveness."

"Witness the great, modern Free Man!  He has Liberty, he has
Property, he lives Unoppress'd, and Oppresses not others!  So what if
another man begs the steak in his freezer?!  Has not that other man
Liberty, too?  Can he not aquire his own Property as well?"

Has he not Liberty?  Has he not Property?

"The public misfortunes and corruption of Governments arise not because
men have forgoten/contempt their _rights_," Mercuriou now thundered
from Olympus, "it is because they have forgotten/contempt their
_obligations_!"




======

liberation theology is alive and well in the United States


======

Launch day.

"Why drink and drive when you can bake and fly?"

======

One of the worst aspects of capitalism is how it promotes mediocrity.

======

"And if you could land and take off again, you could claim the X Prize."

It was weak, but Andrea was grabbing at straws.

"The X Prize?  Doctor, I'm after the M Prize."

======

Kyle near the end:

"Well, it's in the hands of the boys over in '39', now.  I'm flying to
Flordia, Andrea, I'll see you on the ground!"


=========

"Look here, I don't know what you're trying to say..." Wye sputtered.

"Well then let me be crystal clear, Senator.  I don't think your
'participatory government' is worth a hill of beans [CA].  The
majority of people - not all the people, mind you, just one group of
people - make all the decisions.  Everybody else gets to 'participate'
about the same way you could 'participate' in Russia!"

...

"Well, senator, I'll agree with you that this is a democracy, but I
don't think that changes things much.  Let's say Russia had had
freedom of speech, and freedom of the press, and free and open
elections every two or four years, and they had still elected the
communists, and still supported the KGB, and still shipped their
citizens off to gulags.  Would that have changed things all that much,
just that they had elections?"

"No sir, the people of these country don't support the KGB, and we
don't ship our citizens off to gulags!"

"Oh, but you do.  Haven't you heard about 'zero tolerance'?  Haven't
you heard about the War on Drugs?  Don't you watch C.O.P.S?  It has
got to be one of the most violent programs on television, and it's all
real!  Remember who you're talking to, senator - a drug user!  Don't
expect me to sit here and crow on about freedom while this whole
society is hell-bent on a war against me and everyone else like me.
You do ship your citizens off to jail, and while you may not torture
them, and your prisons may not be as cold as the ones in Siberia, the
fact remains that fear of the police is just as readily used in this
society as in those others."

"I don't think you can compare the DEA with the KGB."

"I do.  The basic premise is the same.  The solution to our problems
is to have a war against our own people, to send armed men busting
into the homes of people who have done absolutely nothing to harm
anyone, to make people so terrified of what will be done to them that
they'll be too afraid not to just fall in line and do what they're
told when the great majority barks out its orders.  Isn't it funny how
in all of these great _people's_ societies the biggest enemy of all
always ends up being _your_own_people_?"



[Maybe more in here about the FCC and the problems of radio networking.]




=========

talking about St Francis

Andrea had always felt it was a typical message from God: simple,
powerful, and very easy to misunderstand.
